THE  LOW-LEVEL  PLUTONIUM  SPILL
AT  NIST–BOULDER:  CONTAMINATION

OF  LAB  AND  PERSONNEL

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

SECOND  SESSION

JULY  15,  2008

Serial No. 110–115

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.science.house.gov

43–351PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2008

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
LAURA  RICHARDSON,  California
PAUL  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
ANDRE´ CARSON,  Indiana

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION

HON.  DAVID  WU,  Oregon,  Chairman

JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLIE  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
MIKE  ROSS,  Arizona
LAURA  RICHARDSON,  California
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas

MIKE  QUEAR  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

RACHEL  JAGODA  BRUNETTE  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member

MEGHAN  HOUSEWRIGHT  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member

TIND  SHEPPER  RYEN  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

PIPER  LARGENT  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

July  15,  2008

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  David  Wu,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on  Tech-
nology  and  Innovation,  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  U.S.  House
of Representatives ................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Phil  Gingrey,  Ranking  Minority  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Technology  and  Innovation,  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Harry  E.  Mitchell,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Technology  and  Innovation,  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Laura  Richardson,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Technology  and  Innovation,  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................................

Witnesses:

Dr.  James  M.  Turner,  Deputy  Director,  National  Institute  of  Standards  and

Technology, U.S. Department of Commerce

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Charles  L.  Miller,  Director,  Office  of  Federal  and  State  Materials  and
Environmental  Management  Programs,  U.S.  Nuclear  Regulatory  Commis-
sion;  accompanied  by  Dr.  Elmo  E.  Collins,  Regional  Administrator,  Region
IV Office, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Biography for Elmo E. Collins .........................................................................
Dr. Kenneth C. Rogers, Former Commissioner, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Com-

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

mission

Appendix:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Dr.  James  M.  Turner,  Deputy  Director,  National  Institute  of  Standards  and
Technology, U.S. Department of Commerce ......................................................
Dr.  Charles  L.  Miller,  Director,  Office  of  Federal  and  State  Materials  and
Environmental  Management  Programs,  U.S.  Nuclear  Regulatory  Commis-
sion;  accompanied  by  Dr.  Elmo  E.  Collins,  Regional  Administrator,  Region
IV Office, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission ...............................................

(III)

8
8

9
10

11

11

12
14
23

23
25
29
30

30
32
43
46

70

74

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Dr. Kenneth C. Rogers, Former Commissioner, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Com-
mission ..................................................................................................................

Page

78

IV

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

THE  LOW-LEVEL  PLUTONIUM  SPILL  AT  NIST–
BOULDER;  CONTAMINATION  OF  LAB  AND
PERSONNEL

TUESDAY,  JULY  15,  2008

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  11:07  a.m.,  in  Room
2325 of the Rayburn House Office Building, Hon. David Wu [Chair-
man of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

The Low-level Plutonium Spill
at NIST–Boulder: Contamination

of Lab and Personnel

TUESDAY, JULY 15, 2008

11:00 A.M.–1:00 P.M.

2325 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

I. Purpose

On June 9, 2008, researchers working at the National Institute of Standards and
Technology  (NIST)  facility  in  Boulder,  Colorado  were  working  with  a  small  sample
of plutonium when some of the sample spilled from its container and contaminated
the  lab  and  personnel.  Contamination  spread  to  other  areas  of  the  building,  and  a
small amount of the material was washed away in the lab sink. The purpose of this
hearing is to examine the causes of the incident and the subsequent response to the
situation  by  NIST  employees,  and  to  discuss  improvements  to  environmental,
health, and safety practices at NIST.

II. Witnesses
Dr.  James  Turner  is  the  Acting  Director  of  the  National  Institute  of  Standards
and Technology (NIST).
Dr. Charles Miller is the Director of the Office of Federal and State Materials and
Environmental Management Programs at the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission.
Dr.  Kenneth  Rogers  is  one  of  five  independent  investigators  appointed  by  NIST
to  review  the  June  9,  2008  plutonium  spill  and  a  former  Commissioner  of  the  U.S.
Nuclear Regulatory Commission.
Dr.  Elmo  Collins  is  the  Regional  Administrator  of  the  Region  IV  Office,  U.S.  Nu-
clear Regulatory Commission.

III. Brief Overview

• On June 9, 2008, researchers working with a 0.25 gram sample of plutonium
noticed  that  the  glass  vial  had  cracked  and  some  of  the  powder  had  spilled.
Radiological  contamination  was  found  on  the  hands  of  two  people,  the  shoes
of  20  others,  and  the  hallway  and  office  space  near  the  lab.  The  individuals
were  decontaminated  and  given  medical  tests  to  determine  if  any  plutonium
had  been  ingested  or  inhaled.  The  major  health  risk  posed  by  the  plutonium
in this case is an increased long-term cancer risk from internal exposure. The
area around the lab was cleaned and the lab itself sealed.

• Nearly  one  week  following  the  incident,  contamination  was  discovered  in  a
laboratory  sink,  indicating  that  some  plutonium  had  been  washed  down  the
drain  to  the  municipal  sewer  system.  Additionally,  several  new  individuals
were  identified  as  possibly  having  been  exposed  to  the  plutonium  and  traces
of contamination were discovered in other areas of the NIST facility.

• On  June  27,  NIST  reported  that  sensitive  medical  tests  for  multiple  individ-
uals  had  returned  results  positive  for  internal  exposure  to  plutonium.  Under
the  advice  of  radiation  health  physicians,  one  individual  began  prophylactic
treatment  for  exposure;  the  others  are  awaiting  the  results  of  further  tests
to determine if treatment is necessary. In total, 29 people are receiving these
medical tests. However, NIST reports that initial test results show that indi-
viduals did not receive medically significant levels of internal radiation expo-
sure.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

• The  spill  likely  could  have  been  prevented  had  proper  safety  protocols  and
handling procedures been followed. Documentation provided to the Committee
indicates that two individuals working with the plutonium sample—including
one  directly  involved  with  the  accident—had  not  received  the  required  radi-
ation safety training. Discussions with NIST personnel also revealed that the
plutonium  was  not  sealed  in  its  original  protective  packaging,  as  it  should
have been. It is evident from the growing scope of the incident and the inad-
equate  communication  between  NIST  and  State  and  local  officials,  NIST  em-
ployees, and others that NIST did not have a comprehensive, practiced emer-
gency response plan in place at the time of the incident.
• NIST relies on supervisors and lab directors to provide safety training to the
researchers  in  their  lab  and  ensure  all  work  is  undertaken  safely.  This  sys-
tem, clearly failed in this case. The FY 2006 Visiting Committee on Advanced
Technology  (VCAT)  report  noted  a  lax  culture  of  environmental,  health,  and
safety  (EH&S)  at  NIST  and  recommended  that  NIST  management  devote
more  effort  to  engendering  safety  among  the  NIST  staff.  The  Committee  has
asked  for  extensive  documentation  on  EH&S  practices  at  NIST  and  proof  of
current  training  for  all  employees  to  assess  whether  this  incident  reveals  a
larger problem at NIST.1 Thus far, NIST has not provided many of these doc-
uments,  raising  the  concern  that  the  lapses  in  good  EH&S  practice  that  con-
tributed to this incident are not isolated.

IV. Issues and Concerns

While a final account of the incident is forthcoming, initial reports that untrained
personnel  were  working  with  radioactive  material  are  troubling.  In  February  2007,
NIST–Boulder applied to the Nuclear Regulatory Commission (NRC) to amend their
materials  license  for  plutonium.  As  part  of  the  agreement  to  amend  their  license,
NIST stated that personnel handling and working in the area with the nuclear ma-
terial would follow strict training procedures. NIST claims that most of the individ-
uals  who  required  the  two-hour  training  received  it  in  2007,  but  no  documentation
has  been  provided  to  show  that  the  authorized  user  on  the  NRC  license  received
the full eight hours of training required. Also, the NRC license lists two authorized
users  for  the  plutonium,  neither  of  whom  were  supervising  the  experiment  at  the
time of the incident.

On  the  NRC  license  amendment  application,  NIST  references  an  emergency  re-
sponse  plan  and  a  contamination  minimization  program.  NIST  has  not  provided
these documents to the Committee, but the handling of this incident shows poor im-
plementation of both of these aspects of proper incident response. It is unclear from
the training materials provided to the Committee what specific instructions employ-
ees  received  to  minimize  the  extent  of  contamination  and  what  specific  steps  they
were  to  take  in  an  emergency.  The  fact  that  radioactive  material  was  discharged
to  the  municipal  sewer  system—though  the  amount  was  later  determined  to  be  in-
significant—and  was  undiscovered  until  nearly  a  week  after  the  initial  incident  il-
lustrates  that  personnel  did  not  appreciate  the  basics  of  contamination  minimiza-
tion.  Similarly,  it  appears  that  NIST–Boulder  does  not  have  a  comprehensive,  well
practiced emergency plan. Communication with State and local officials was lax, and
the lack of communication with employees working at an adjacent National Oceanic
and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  facility  created  unnecessary  anxiety  for
those individuals.

The FY 2006 VCAT report stated:

NIST  has  made  solid  improvements  over  the  years  to  improve  its  laboratory
safety. . . . However, there are still inconsistencies in application of safety pro-
cedures  across  the  laboratories.  Safety  is  a  leadership  activity  that  the  senior
NIST leadership must be actively involved in.

Although not associated with high-energy radiation, the nuclear material involved
in  this  incident  still  poses  a  serious  health  risk,  as  illustrated  by  the  treatment
measures  currently  being  taken  by  at  least  one  individual  involved.  Given  that
NIST  researchers  also  work  with  material  more  hazardous  than  plutonium,  health
and  safety  practices  should  not  be  taken  for  granted  by  NIST  management.  The
Safety  Office  at  NIST  has  seen  inadequate  funding  in  recent  years  and  the  safety
officers  have  little  authority  to  enforce  safety  procedures.  The  lack  of  oversight  of
safety  by  NIST  management  contributed  to  this  incident,  and  while  NIST  has  en-
gaged outside experts to investigate the incident, they must commission an external
panel to evaluate EH&S practices across all of the NIST laboratories and programs.

1 Letter sent June 19, 2008 requesting these documents is attached.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

This  is  a  necessary  step  to  ensure  safety  for  NIST  employees  and  the  surrounding
communities.

V. Background

The  small  plutonium  sample  was  being  used  in  a  research  project  to  develop  im-
proved  radiation  detectors  for  use  in  applications  such  as  anti-nuclear  proliferation
enforcement,  homeland  security,  and  basic  research.  The  work  was  being  done  in
collaboration with Los Alamos National Laboratories.

The  spilled  plutonium  weighed  approximately  0.25g  and  was  used  as  a  reference
material of known radioactivity. The type of radiation emitted by this sample is pri-
marily alpha particles, which are easily shielded but have significant risks from in-
ternal exposure.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Attachment

6

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

Chairman  WU.  I  want  to  welcome  everyone  to  this  morning’s
hearing.  It  is  not  unusual  for  the  Subcommittee  to  hold  oversight
hearings  about  NIST.  However,  events  over  the  past  six  months
have revealed some serious flaws in the environmental, health, and
safety programs at NIST.

This  subcommittee  has  been  the  strongest  champion  of  NIST  in
Congress,  and  its  Members  have  spent  a  lot  of  time  educating  our
colleagues on the outstanding scientific and technical work of NIST
employees  and  the  tremendous  value  of  NIST’s  work.  On  a  bipar-
tisan  basis,  this  subcommittee  has  championed  increased  funding
for NIST’s scientific and technical activities.

However,  along  with  scientific  and  technical  excellence,  NIST
needs an equal dedication to safe laboratory and general practices.
This is especially true at the NIST labs where staff routinely work
with hazardous materials and high-powered equipment such as ra-
dioactive material and lasers. In the past six months NIST has had
at least two significant accidents.

The  first  involved  the  use  of  laser  in  Gaithersburg,  Maryland,
and the second was the accidental release of plutonium in Boulder,
Colorado.  Initial  investigations  revealed  the  same  basic  issue  in
both cases; a lack of training for the researchers performing the ex-
periments and inadequate laboratory safety policies.

These might sound like minor incidents, but they have had med-
ical  ramifications  for  NIST  employees,  including  one  person  who
experienced  eye  damage  from  the  laser  and  another  who  under-
went prophylactic treatment for radiation exposure.

I am concerned that the laser event did not trigger an immediate
review of all of NIST’s safety training which might have prevented
the  subsequent  incident  in  June.  I  am  also  concerned  that  NIST
did  not  act  on  the  Visiting  Committee  on  Advanced  Technology’s,
or  VCAT’s,  2006  recommendation  that  management  needed  to  be
more  involved  in  and  place  more  emphasis  on  environmental,
health, and safety issues.

I am also deeply concerned that there did not seem to be a sensi-
tivity  and  appropriate  priority  placed  on  communicating  with  the
surrounding  communities  to  prevent  the  dissemination  of  informa-
tion  which  might  be  alarming  and  which  may  or  may  not  be  accu-
rate to the surrounding communities.

The purpose of today’s hearing is not to place blame. It is to un-
derstand  how  this  situation  developed,  and  what  needs  to  be  done
to  instill  a  culture  of  safety  in  the  NIST  laboratories  while  main-
taining scientific excellence.

I  want  to  thank  our  outside  experts  for  assisting  the  Sub-
committee  in  its  endeavors,  and  I  now  would  like  to  recognize  my
friend  from  Georgia,  the  Subcommittee’s  Ranking  Member,  Dr.
Gingrey, for his opening statement.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Wu follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN DAVID WU

I  want  to  welcome  everyone  to  this  morning’s  hearing.  It’s  not  unusual  for  the
Subcommittee to hold oversight hearings of NIST. However, events over the past six
months  have  revealed  serious  flaws  in  the  environmental,  health,  and  safety  pro-
grams at NIST.

This subcommittee has been the strongest champion of NIST in Congress, and its
Members  have  spent  a  lot  of  time  educating  our  colleagues  on  the  outstanding  sci-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

entific  and  technical  work  of  NIST  employees.  On  a  bipartisan  basis,  this  sub-
committee has championed increased funding for NIST’s scientific and technical ac-
tivities.

However,  along  with  scientific  and  technical  excellence,  NIST  needs  an  equal

dedication to safe laboratory practices.

This  is  especially  true  at  the  NIST  labs  where  staff  routinely  work  with  haz-
ardous materials and high powered equipment, such as radioactive material and la-
sers. In the past six months, NIST has had two significant accidents.

The  first  involved  the  use  of  a  laser  in  Gaithersburg,  Maryland,  and  the  second
was  the  accidental  release  of  plutonium  in  Boulder,  Colorado.  Initial  investigations
revealed  the  same  basic  issue  in  both  cases—a  lack  of  training  for  the  researchers
performing the experiments and inadequate laboratory safety policies.

These might sound like minor incidents, but they have had medical ramifications
for  NIST  employees,  including  one  person  who  experienced  eye  damage  from  the
laser and another who underwent prophylactic treatment for radiation exposure.

I  am  concerned  that  the  laser  event  did  not  trigger  an  immediate  review  of  all

of NIST’s safety training which might have prevented the accident in June.

I am also concerned that NIST did not act on the Visiting Committee on Advanced
Technology’s 2006 recommendation that management needed to be more involved in,
and place more emphasis on, environmental, health, and safety issues.

The purpose of today’s hearing is not to place blame; it is to understand how this
situation  developed  and  what  needs  to  be  done  to  instill  a  culture  of  safety  in  the
NIST labs, while maintaining scientific excellence.

I  especially  want  to  thank  our  outside  experts  for  assisting  the  Subcommittee  in

its endeavors.

I now recognize my friend from Georgia, the Subcommittee Ranking Member, Dr.

Gingrey, for his opening statement.

Mr.  GINGREY.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  calling  today’s  hear-
ing to review the details and the causes of the June 9 spill of pluto-
nium that occurred at the NIST labs in Boulder, and of course, you
mentioned also the laser accident at Gaithersburg.

First  and  foremost,  I  am  very  thankful  that  those  in  proximity
of  the  spill  have  thus  far  shown  no  adverse  side  effects  from  their
exposure  to  plutonium,  and  of  course,  as  I  said,  the  other  accident
involving  the  laser.  We—it  will  take  time.  Only  time  will  tell  the
adverse effects of those two incidents.

That is not to say, however, that the sample containing 250 milli-
grams  of  various  plutonium  isotopes  pose  no  health  or  safety  risks
when  it  was  mishandled.  I  am  very  disappointed  that  the  prelimi-
nary  investigations  of  this  incident  to  date  have  revealed  not  just
a  stunning  lack  of  preparation  but  also  a  complete  lack  of  under-
standing  of  the  potential  risks  involved  in  the  use  of  encapsulated
plutonium samples.

It  appears  as  though  researchers  were  unaware  of  the  potential
risks and quickly went forward to obtain and use the samples with-
out appropriate precautions in place. Of even greater concern, safe-
ty  protocol  was  either  not  in  place  or  not  properly  followed,  that
would  have  flagged  this  acquisition  ahead  of  time  or  insured  that
proper training and equipment were available.

Mr.  Chairman,  this  incident  is  absolutely  unacceptable.  It  could
have  been  avoided,  and  it  should  have  been  avoided.  One  of  the
NIST  independent  reviewers,  Dr.  Lester  Slaback,  notes  in  his  re-
port,  the  incident  was  the  inevitable  or  at  least  highly  likely  and
foreseeable  end  result  of  numerous  individual  and  organizational
failures.

I  do  applaud  Dr.  Turner  for  recognizing  the  gravity  of  the  prob-
lem  at  NIST,  and  I  am  cautiously  optimistic  that  employees
throughout the agency will also heed this wake-up call.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

However,  this  incident  makes  clear  that  simply  having  safety
policies on paper does not ensure that they will be adequately exe-
cuted.  And  I  hope  Dr.  Turner  recognizes,  I  am  sure  he  does,  that
a fix will not come through onerous safety directions from top level
officials. Rather, change must involve every employee or visiting af-
filiate  at  NIST  adhering  to  documented  safety  procedures  so  that
an incident like this does not occur again.

I  expect  that  during  the  question  and  answer  portion  of  today’s
hearing we will be able to discuss how NIST can ensure that their
safety  programs,  including  radiological  safety,  become  examples  of
best  practices  instead  of  examples  of  shortcomings  and  inadequate
preparation.  Indeed,  you  know,  when  I  think  of  NIST  and  what  I
have learned of NIST and visited at Gaithersburg in the time that
I have been a Member of this committee, I have come to expect the
very  best  of  this  age-old  organization  that  is  practically  called  for
in our United States Constitution. I mean, it is hugely, hugely im-
portant, and it is just shocking that this would have occurred.

The  Nuclear  Regulatory  Commission’s  investigation  of  this  inci-
dent is, of course, still ongoing, so I am sensitive to the need of the
Commission to complete that work before discussing their findings.
I  am  thankful,  though,  that  Dr.  Miller  and  Dr.—and  Mr.  Collins
have  made  themselves  available  to  explain  the  NRC  licensing  re-
quirements,  safety  guidelines,  and  process  for  responding  to  this
event.  Their  expertise  and  insight  will  be  extraordinarily  useful  to
the  Committee  as  we  place  this  incident  in  its  proper  context  and
seek ways to improve the safety systems at NIST.

Mr.  Chairman,  NIST  has  a  scientific  legacy  of  achievement  for
which we are rightfully proud. I think we all agree that equal effort
must  go  into  safety  considerations  at  NIST.  We  cannot  accept  a
cavalier  attitude  towards  safety.  We  are  not  using  plutonium  as  if
we  are  trying  to  send  a  DeLorean  back  in  time  like  in  the  film,
Back to the Future. There are greater safety concerns for which our
researches  at  NIST  should  be  prepared,  and  moving  forward  this
agency  should  be  better  positioned  to  implement  better  training
and safety protocols.

With that, Mr. Chairman, I yield back to you.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Gingrey follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE PHIL GINGREY

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  calling  today’s  hearing  to  review  the  details  and
causes  of  the  June  9th  spill  of  plutonium  at  the  NIST  labs  in  Boulder.  First  and
foremost,  I  am  very  thankful  that  those  in  proximity  of  the  spill  have  thus  far
shown no adverse side effects from their exposure to plutonium. That is not to say,
however,  that  the  sample  containing  250  milligrams  of  various  plutonium  isotopes
posed no health or safety risks when it was mishandled.

I am very disappointed that the preliminary investigations of this incident to date
have  revealed  not  just  a  stunning  lack  of  preparation,  but  also  a  complete  lack  of
understanding  of  the  potential  risks  involved  in  the  use  of  encapsulated  plutonium
samples.  It  appears  as  though  researchers  were  unaware  of  the  potential  risks  and
quickly went forward to obtain and use the samples without appropriate precautions
in place. Of even greater concern, safety protocol was either not in place or not prop-
erly  followed.  That  would  have  flagged  this  acquisition  ahead  of  time  or  ensured
that proper training and equipment were available.

Mr. Chairman, this incident is absolutely unacceptable. It could have been avoid-

ed, and it should have been avoided.

One  of  the  NIST  independent  reviewers,  Dr.  Lester  Slaback,  notes  in  his  report
that, ‘‘[the incident] was the inevitable (or at least highly likely) and foreseeable end
result’’ of numerous individual and organizational failures. I do applaud Dr. Turner

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

for  recognizing  the  gravity  of  the  problem  at  NIST,  and  I  am  cautiously  optimistic
that  employees  throughout  the  agency  will  also  heed  this  wake-up  call.  However,
this  incident  makes  clear  that  simply  having  safety  policies  on  paper  does  not  en-
sure  that  they  will  be  adequately  executed.  I  hope  Dr.  Turner  recognizes  that  a  fix
will  not  come  through  onerous  safety  directives  from  top  level  officials.  Rather,
change  must  involve  every  employee  or  visiting  affiliate  at  NIST  adhering  to  docu-
mented safety procedures so that an incident like this does not occur again. I expect
that  during  the  Question  and  Answer  portion  of  today’s  hearing,  we  will  be  able  to
discuss how NIST can ensure that their safety programs, including radiological safe-
ty, become examples of best-practices instead of examples of shortcomings and inad-
equate preparation.

The  Nuclear  Regulatory  Commission’s  investigation  of  this  incident  is  still  ongo-
ing,  so  I  am  sensitive  to  the  need  for  the  Commission  to  complete  that  work  before
discussing  their  findings.  I  am  thankful,  though,  that  Dr.  Miller  and  Dr.  Collins
have made themselves available to explain the NRC’s licensing requirements, safety
guidelines, and process for responding to this event. Their expertise and insight will
be extraordinarily useful to the Committee as we place this incident in context and
seek ways to improve the safety systems at NIST.

Mr.  Chairman,  NIST  has  a  scientific  legacy  of  achievement  for  which  we  are
rightfully proud. I think we all agree that equal effort must go into safety consider-
ations  at  NIST.  We  cannot  accept  a  cavalier  attitude  towards  safety.  We  are  not
using  plutonium  as  if  we  are  trying  to  send  a  DeLorean  back  in  time,  like  in  the
film Back to the Future. There are greater safety concerns for which our researchers
at NIST should be prepared, and moving forward, this agency should be better posi-
tioned to implement better training and safety protocols.

With that, I yield back the balance of my time.
Chairman  WU.  I  thank  the  gentleman.  If  there  are  any  other
Members  who  wish  to  submit  additional  opening  statements,  your
statements will be added to the record at this point.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Mitchell follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE HARRY E. MITCHELL

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
On  June  9,  2008,  there  was  an  incident  at  the  National  Institute  of  Standards
and  Technology  (NIST)  facility  in  Boulder,  CO  involving  a  plutonium  sample  spill
which contaminated the lab and personnel.

Today  we  will  examine  the  causes  of  this  incident  and  how  the  NIST  employees

responded.

According  to  documentation  provided  for  this  committee,  two  NIST  employees
working  with  this  plutonium  sample  did  not  receive  the  required  radiation  safety
training,  and  this  plutonium  was  not  properly  stored.  Furthermore,  NIST  did  not
have a comprehensive emergency response plan in place at the time of the incident.
Even  more  troubling,  even  though  the  Committee  has  requested  extensive  docu-
mentation on the environmental, health, and safety practices at NIST, NIST has yet
to  provide  many  of  these  documents,  which  raises  the  concern  that  lapses  that
caused the incident in Boulder are not isolated.

I  find  this  deeply  concerning.  Federal  agencies  like  NIST  have  safety  regulations

in place for a reason.

I look forward to hearing more from our witnesses on what we can do to improve

the environmental, health, and safety practices at NIST.

I yield back.
[The prepared statement of Ms. Richardson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE LAURA RICHARDSON

Thank  you  Chairman  Wu  for  holding  this  very  important  hearing  today,  and  our
witnesses  for  their  appearance.  The  purpose  of  today’s  hearing  is  to  examine  the
causes of the plutonium spill at the NIST laboratories in Boulder, Colorado; the re-
sponse to this spill; and the overall status of environmental, health, and safety prac-
tices (‘‘EH&S’’) at NIST laboratories.

First  and  foremost  let  me  begin  by  stating  that  I  was  concerned  when  I  gained
knowledge  of  this  incident.  I  understand  that  mistakes  happen,  but  what  concerns
me more than anything else was the subsequent response or the lack of an adequate
response  to  the  situation.  This  spill  opened  our  eyes  to  a  host  of  procedures  that,
had they been followed, would have negated the necessity of this hearing. Nonethe-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

less  here  we  are.  Now  let  me  state  this,  NIST  is  an  excellent  organization,  with  a
group  of  scientist  that  are  the  best  in  the  world,  so  I  am  shocked  to  discover  that
EH&S practices do not receive the attention they deserve at NIST laboratories.

When an institution like NIST applies to the Nuclear Regulatory Commission for
a license to handle dangerous materials like plutonium, they make assurances. One
of  these  assurances  is  that  every  individual  who  will  work  with  the  material,  or
come in close proximity to the material, receives adequate safety training. Further-
more,  when  NIST  applied  for  the  license  to  handle  plutonium,  the  representation
was  made  that  only  two  individuals  would  be  allowed  to  handle  the  plutonium.
However,  reports  indicate  that  the  visiting  researcher  who  spilled  the  plutonium
was not one of the individuals designated on the NIST application as a handler, he
did  not  receive  adequate  training,  his  supervisor  may  not  have  received  adequate
training, and the chief scientist with the authorization to handle the plutonium was
not in the room supervising the visiting researcher. In light of these facts it is obvi-
ous why we are here today.

Add  to  this  the  fact  that  the  administrators  at  NIST  failed  to  inform  the  elected
officials  of  Boulder,  and  the  neighboring  NOAA  facility  (National  Oceanic  and  At-
mospheric Administration) of the spill leads me to believe that someone might have
deliberately attempted to hide knowledge of the spill.

Likewise,  the  fact  that  the  Visiting  Committee  on  Advanced  Technology  (VCAT)
noted the lax culture of EH&S at NIST, and recommended that NIST management
address this matter, yet this incident still occurs, demonstrates sub-standard behav-
ior on the part of the NIST administration.

I  know  that  this  hearing  will  produce  results,  and  I  expect  the  administration  of
NIST  to  deliver  those  results.  There  is  NO  room  for  compromise  when  it  comes  to
public safety.

Mr. Chairman I yield back my time.
Chairman  WU.  I  would  like  to  introduce  our  witnesses,  and  I
thank  you  all  for  appearing  before  the  Subcommittee  today.  Dr.
James Turner, who is the Acting Director of NIST, Dr. Charles Mil-
ler, who is the Director of the Office of Federal and State Materials
and  Environmental  Management  Programs  at  the  Nuclear  Regu-
latory Commission.

He  is  joined  from  the  NRC  by  Mr.  Elmo  Collins,  who  is  the  Re-
gional  Administrator  of  Region  IV  based  in  Arlington,  Texas.  Mr.
Collins  is  directly  involved  in  investigating  the  June  9  incident  at
the Boulder Laboratories.

Lastly,  Dr.  Kenneth  Rogers.  Dr.  Rogers  was  asked  by  NIST  to
provide an independent review, one of several individuals asked for
independent  reviews  of  the  June  9  incident,  and  to  offer  rec-
ommendations,  and  Dr.  Rogers  is  also  a  former  Commissioner  of
the Nuclear Regulatory Commission.

As  our  witnesses  know,  spoken  testimony  is  limited  to  five  min-
utes,  after  which  the  Members  of  the  Committee  will  have  five
minutes  each  to  ask  questions.  Your  written  statements  will  be
fully taken into the record.

And with that, Dr. Turner, if you would, please commence.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  JAMES  M.  TURNER,  DEPUTY  DIRECTOR,
NATIONAL  INSTITUTE  OF  STANDARDS  AND  TECHNOLOGY,
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Dr.  TURNER.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  Chairman
Wu, Ranking Member Gingrey, and Members of the Subcommittee,
thank you for the opportunity to appear before you today to discuss
the June 9, 2008, incident involving the release of plutonium at the
National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology,  NIST,  Boulder
Laboratory,  as  well  as  NIST’s  environment,  safety,  and  health
practices.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

Mr.  Chairman,  I  deeply  regret  the  incident.  My  top  priority  has
been,  and  continues  to  be,  the  health  and  safety  of  our  staff  in-
volved in this incident. According to the latest analysis of the med-
ical  testing  of  the  personnel  involved,  the  physicians  have  relayed
that  the  increased  overall  risk  for  cancer  based  on  dose  estimates
are  so  small  they  don’t  expect  there  to  be  any  clinically-significant
impact  on  either  the  short-  or  long-term  health  of  anyone  exposed.
We  will  continue  to  provide  our  personnel  with  access  to  top  med-
ical care as well as we continue testing.

We  have  been  able  to  ascertain  through  numerous  interviews
and reports that the incident involved a guest researcher who han-
dled the radioactive source without appropriate training and super-
vision. My written testimony provides further details about the in-
cident and the immediate response.

The  researcher  handling  the  source  material  at  the  time  most
certainly should have been—should have had the required training
appropriate  to  the  researcher’s  work  and  consistent  with  the  com-
mitments  made  under  the  NRC  license.  Partially  as  a  result  of  a
lack  of  this  training,  actions  taken  during  the  incident  and  imme-
diately  afterward  by  the  researcher  exacerbated  the  extent  of  the
incident and complicated the response.

The  incident  and  the  conditions  that  permitted  this  incident  to
take place are unacceptable. I pledge to you and this subcommittee
my  personal  assurance  that  we  will  do  what  is  necessary  to  find
the  root  cause  or  causes,  take  appropriate  actions,  and  ensure  to
the  best  of  our  abilities  that  such  a  failure  does  not  occur  in  the
future.

The Department of Commerce is establishing a blue ribbon panel
to look broadly at safety and training issues at NIST. Also, the De-
partment’s Office of Inspector General is conducting a broad review
of  management,  training,  safety,  and  response  operations  at  all
NIST facilities.

I  have  welcomed  the  involvement  of  external  individuals  and  or-
ganizations  to  provide  advice,  guidance,  counsel—tough  counsel—
as  to  what  NIST  could  have  done,  can  do  in  the  short-term,  and
must  do  longer-term  to  address  shortcomings  in  our  safety,  train-
ing, and emergency response preparedness.

As  a  direct  result—as  a  direct  follow-up  to  this  incident,  NIST’s
senior management has taken a variety of actions including requir-
ing  that  each  laboratory  director  and  chief  officer  certify  that  all
staff,  employees,  and  associate  have  in  place  the  required  safety
training prior to being allowed to continue their work. Issuing safe-
ty  stand-downs,  creating  new  lab  teams  to  review  hazards  in  the
labs,  initiating  more  systematic  approaches  to  eliminating,  reduc-
ing,  or  controlling  the  risks  of  different  hazards,  including  emer-
gency response and recovery.

I  have  taken  several  immediate  actions,  and  we  are  conducting
our own investigations. I have moved the Office of the NIST Safety,
Health, and Environment Division into the Director’s office so that
it now reports to the NIST Deputy Director, who is our chief safety
officer. I have asked my staff to revamp NIST’s emergency commu-
nications procedures. I have also designated NIST’s Chief Scientist
as  the  Incident  Response  Director  in  order  to  provide  stronger  on-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

site  support  in  Boulder.  He  is  currently  on-site  leading  the  effort
and will be there indefinitely.

I  have  traveled  to  Boulder  and  plan  to  return  there  after  this
hearing.  I  am  attempting  to  arrange  meetings  with  State,  county,
and local officials during this visit. I have ensured that NIST–Boul-
der issue a stop work order for all radioactive materials in use, and
a  preliminary  decision  has  been  made  to  limit  the  use  of  radio-
active materials in Boulder in the future to sealed sources.

At  my  request  five  eminent  experts  in  radiation  health  safety
conducted an assessment of the incident. An author of one of those
reports,  Dr.  Ken  Rogers,  is  on  the  panel  today,  and  you  will  hear
from  him  directly  on  his  findings  and  recommendations.  Their  re-
ports are sobering in their assessment of our challenges, and I take
their  words  seriously.  Their  views  about  our  shortcomings  confirm
my belief of the need to focus our efforts on NIST’s entire environ-
ment,  health,  safety,  and  emergency  response  protocols  and  safety
culture  to  ensure  that  we  are  measuring  up  to  both  the  require-
ments  and  the  highest  expectations  for  a  world-class  organization.
I  expect  that  these  experts  will  continue  to  provide  insights  to  me
and others at NIST in the coming weeks.

The lack of training provided disturbs me greatly, Mr. Chairman.
I  am  committed  to  making  the  changes  necessary  to  reduce  to  the
maximum  extent  possible  the  opportunity  for  such  a  situation  to
occur  in  the  future.  This  includes  reevaluating  our  training  to
make sure it is appropriate, establishing testing mechanisms to en-
sure  that  training  is  mastered,  and  creating  controls  to  document
training.  Our  ongoing  assessment  will  help  us  address  critical
areas for improvement.

Mr.  Chairman,  based  on  the  information  available  at  this  time,
this  incident  was  preventable.  NIST’s  culture  and  organizational
structure  contributed  to  an  environment  in  which  line  supervisors
failed  to  take  adequate  responsibility  for  safety  issues,  and  safety
personnel  failed  to  assert  a  sufficient  level  of  authority  to  ensure
compliance with existing procedures and practices.

I,  again,  pledge  to  you  my  commitment  to  improve  our  safety
practices,  engrain  a  sustainable  safety  culture,  and  thereby  ensur-
ing  the  health  and  safety  of  our  employees  and  local  communities.
I  will  report  to  you  regularly  and  will  keep  you  apprised  of  our
findings and projects.

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I will be pleased to answer any ques-

tions you may have.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Turner follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES M. TURNER

Chairman  Wu,  Ranking  Member  Gingrey,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,
thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  the  June  9,
2008, incident involving the release of plutonium at the National Institute of Stand-
ards  and  Technology’s  (NIST)  Boulder  Laboratory—as  well  as  NIST’s  environment,
health, and safety practices.

Introduction

Mr.  Chairman,  I  deeply  regret  the  incident  that  occurred  at  the  NIST–Boulder
Laboratories  on  June  9,  2008.  First,  my  top  priority  has  been  and  continues  to  be
the  health  and  safety  of  our  staff  involved  in  this  incident.  I  am  pleased  to  report
that,  according  to  the  latest  analysis  of  the  medical  testing  on  the  personnel  in-
volved,  the  physicians  are  relaying  that  no  significant  health  risks  are  expected

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

based  on  the  test  results  to  date.  I  hope  the  affected  individuals  and  their  families
are encouraged by these test results. The physicians are relaying that the estimated
doses,  and  the  increased  overall  risk  for  cancer  based  on  these  estimates,  are  so
small  we  don’t  expect  there  to  be  any  clinically  significant  impact  on  either  the
short-  or  long-term  health  of  anyone  exposed.  We  will  continue  to  provide  our  per-
sonnel with access to top medical care as we continue testing.

However, the incident raises very serious and significant issues at NIST with re-
gard  to  safety,  safety  culture,  training,  and  emergency  response  policies,  protocols,
and  NIST’s  implementation  of  and  adherence  to  them.  The  incident  and  the  condi-
tions  that  permitted  this  incident  to  take  place  are  unacceptable,  Mr.  Chairman,
and  I  pledge  to  you  and  this  subcommittee  my  personal  assurance  that  we  will  do
what is necessary to find the root cause or causes, take appropriate actions, and en-
sure to the best of our abilities that such a failure does not occur in the future.

The Department has taken a number of steps to ensure that independent reviews
of  NIST  training,  safety,  and  response  protocols  are  conducted.  Multiple  investiga-
tions  of  the  incident  have  been  completed,  are  underway,  or  are  to  be  conducted  at
NIST.  These  investigations  include,  but  are  not  limited  to:  (1)  the  NIST  Safety,
Health and Environment Division (SHED) investigation; (2) the NIST Ionizing Radi-
ation Safety Committee (IRSC) investigation; (3) the five preliminary individual ex-
perts’  investigations  ordered  by  the  NIST  Deputy  Director;  (4)  the  Department  of
Commerce  (DOC)  Inspector  General  (IG)  investigation;  and  (5)  the  Nuclear  Regu-
latory  Commission  (NRC)  inspection.  In  addition,  the  need  for  a  blue  ribbon  panel
was  identified  by  the  Department,  at  the  direction  of  Deputy  Secretary  John  Sul-
livan,  and  work  has  already  begun  to  establish  such  a  panel.  In  addition,  on  July
1,  2008,  Deputy  Secretary  Sullivan  requested  that  the  Department  of  Commerce’s
Inspector  General  conduct  a  broad  review  of  management,  training,  safety,  and  re-
sponse operations at all NIST facilities. We look forward to working with you as we
institute these important additional reviews of NIST’s safety practices.

We must be able to assure not just the Subcommittee, but the entire NIST family
and  the  communities  in  which  we  live  and  work  that  NIST  not  only  does  cutting-
edge, world-class research, but that we do so in accordance with the highest stand-
ards for safety, training, and emergency response preparedness. NIST science is re-
nowned  for  its  meticulous  attention  to  detail;  that  same  attitude  must  pervade  our
safety culture.

I am testifying today on the current status of this incident. We have made avail-
able  information  to  this  committee,  our  staff,  the  media,  the  public,  and  the  NRC.
This includes our 30-day report to the NRC and the reports to us by five individual
experts we commissioned. We still have much to do and I will continue to keep you
apprised of our progress as we gather more information.

Since the incident, NIST leadership in Gaithersburg and Boulder has been work-

ing to ensure our employees’ safety and answer three key questions:

1) What happened on that day and how did NIST respond?
2) How could such an incident occur in the first place? and
3) What are we doing to ensure that we have the structure, policies and proce-

dures in place to prevent such an incident from occurring in the future?

Although  we  do  not  have  all  of  the  answers  to  these  questions  yet—and  I  assure
you  that  we  will  continue  to  work  to  get  those  answers,  take  appropriate  actions,
and  keep  you  informed—we  do  know  that  this  specific  incident  was  the  result  of
both significant individual and systemic failures.

An Overview of the Events on June 9th

Before  I  begin  with  an  overview  of  the  events  on  June  9,  let  me  state  that  the
facts  that  I  am  about  to  relay  represent  NIST’s  best  understanding  of  the  facts  at
this  time,  based  on  testimony  of  those  with  first  hand  knowledge,  and  a  review  of
all  the  evidence  available  to  us  currently.  NIST’s  and  other  investigations  are  on-
going, however, and we may learn more, or different, facts as we all continue to clar-
ify our understanding of what happened.

Through  interviews  we  have  been  able  to  ascertain  that  the  incident  involved  a
guest researcher who handled a radioactive source without appropriate training and
supervision.  During  the  course  of  this  handling,  the  vial  cracked  and  a  portion  of
the  approximately  one-fourth  gram  of  plutonium  contained  in  the  vial  spilled  out.
The  affected  laboratory  and  an  adjacent  lab  were  sealed  off  and  personnel  who
were identified as working in or near the lab were asked to remain in the area and
any  radioactive  material  on  their  clothing  or  bodies  was  removed.  The  personnel
were also subsequently given bioassay tests to determine if any internal contamina-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

tion  occurred.  (Since  that  time,  several  additional  personnel  identified  themselves
as having potential exposure and have had these tests conducted.)

External  trace  contamination  was  found  on  some  employees,  and  in  most  cases
this contamination was easily removed using soapy water. The personnel were sent
home  with  the  exception  of  two  individuals  who  evidenced  very  low  levels  of  con-
tamination  on  their  hands.  (These  two  were  provided  with  gloves  to  wear—to  pre-
vent  the  spread  of  the  material—until  repeated  hand  washing  eliminated  the  re-
maining  contamination.)  NIST  radiation  safety  personnel  supervised  the  testing  of
the adjacent areas leading to other parts of the building, a men’s restroom and door-
ways leading out of the building. Some areas of trace contamination were discovered
and  these  areas  were  cleaned  and  retested  to  ensure  they  were  contamination  free.
At  that  time,  there  was  no  evidence  that  there  had  been  any  contamination  aside
from those areas.

The affected laboratory and the adjacent connecting laboratory continue to remain
sealed off for further testing and remain so pending approval of the decontamination
process by the NRC.

As our investigation continued, we conducted subsequent extended interviews and
discovered  trace  contamination  in  other  areas.  These  areas,  too,  were  thoroughly
cleaned and retested to ensure they were free of contamination.

Failures Leading to the Incident

Mr.  Chairman,  NIST’s  safety  culture  is  deficient.  Later  in  this  testimony  I  will

focus on our policy and system for safety and training. Some things are clear:
1) The NRC regulates the use of radioactive materials at all NIST laboratories and
is investigating the plutonium spill at the Boulder Laboratory and NIST’s response.
Specifically,  the  NRC  is  currently  conducting  an  inspection  that  will  result  in  the
definitive account of the spill and its aftermath.
2) In  January  2007,  NIST  filed  an  amended  Application  for  Radioactive  Material,
an  Addendum  to  the  NRC  Form  313,  for  the  purposes  of  using  encapsulated  pluto-
nium  in  research.  In  that  amended  license,  NIST  committed  to  do  certain  things,
particularly in the areas of training. It appears that we did not meet those commit-
ments. Such a failure is a serious breach and must be dealt with accordingly. I must
stress that at this point our main focus is the health of those affected.

The  researcher  handling  the  source  material  at  the  time  most  certainly  should
have had the required training appropriate to his work and consistent with the com-
mitments  made  under  the  NRC  application.  Partially  as  a  result  of  this  lack  of
training,  actions  taken  during  the  incident  and  immediately  afterward  by  the  re-
searcher appears to have exacerbated the extent of the incident and complicated the
response.

While we cannot necessarily extrapolate from a single incident, I am also looking
at issues that this incident raises about cultural barriers in our environment, health
and safety policies and procedures, including our training practices, system-wide.

Response Subsequent to the Incident

Mr.  Chairman,  I  have  already  taken  several  immediate  actions  and  we  are  con-
ducting our own investigations and assisting with external assessments. I have wel-
comed the involvement of the NRC, the Department of Commerce’s Office of Inspec-
tor General, and individual radiation safety experts to provide advice, guidance and
counsel—tough counsel—as to what NIST could have done, can do in the short-term,
and must do longer-term to address shortcomings in our safety, training and emer-
gency  response  preparedness.  I  am  moving  the  NIST  Safety,  Health,  and  Environ-
ment  Division  into  the  Director’s  office  so  that  it  now  reports  to  the  NIST  Deputy
Director,  who  is  the  agency’s  Chief  Safety  Officer.  I  have  asked  my  staff  to  revamp
NIST emergency communications procedures and we are developing a plan for mov-
ing forward which will include external input, participation and review.

In  order  to  provide  stronger  on-site  support  to  Boulder,  I  designated  the  NIST
Chief  Scientist,  Dr.  Richard  Kayser,  as  the  Incident  Response  Director,  who  took
over  for  the  NIST–Boulder  Laboratory’s  Director,  Dr.  Thomas  O’Brian,  who  served
as the Incident Response Coordinator. I directed Dr. Kayser to be on site in Boulder
indefinitely leading this effort. His team is developing—and has already been imple-
menting  portions  of—an  incident  response  plan  which  includes  continuing  to  reach
out  to  employees  who  have  any  concerns  about  their  health,  identifying  any  addi-
tional spaces that may need to be surveyed, better coordination of outreach and re-
sponse  to  the  Boulder  community  and  other  federal,  State,  and  local  agencies,  and
Congress, and moving forward on the development of a decontamination plan. That
decontamination  will  take  place  once  all  the  other  bodies  conducting  their  assess-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

ment  of  the  situation  no  longer  need  access  to  the  lab—and  once  our  decontamina-
tion plan has been reviewed and approved by the NRC.

I  have  traveled  to  Boulder  and  plan  to  return  tomorrow.  In  addition,  the  Chief
of  the  NIST  Safety,  Health  and  Environment  Division,  as  well  as  the  senior  NIST
health physicist from Gaithersburg have been stationed in Boulder for the past sev-
eral  weeks.  Other  NIST–Gaithersburg  personnel  have  also  been  on-site  in  Boulder
as needed and additional personnel have been provided to Boulder by National Oce-
anic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) and by the Department of Commerce.
We  will  continue  to  have  appropriate  resources  on  site  until  this  cleanup  is  com-
pleted.

Results of Internal Investigation

While  we  have  investigations  ongoing,  they  have  at  this  point  revealed  that  the
probable cause of the incident was handler error. Source material was removed from
its secondary containment, and its vial broke after contact with a hard surface.

However,  I  want  to  make  clear  that  overall  organizational  failures  contributed  to

this handler error. Specifically:

• Procedures  for  acquiring  source  material  were  not  followed  as  line  manage-

ment was not always aware of source material acquisition.

• Individuals, both those handling source material and those working in the vi-
cinity,  were  not  provided  proper  training  or  the  necessary  information  to
allow them to evaluate and understand the risks involved.
• Available training was inadequate for the circumstances.
• Lack  of  an  emergency  response  plan  contributed  to  the  potential  spread  of
contamination  beyond  the  spill  zone.  Employees  were  neither  prepared  nor
equipped  to  respond  to  the  situation,  and  safety  personnel  were  forced  to  re-
spond as events unfolded, rather than from established protocols.

NIST’s  organizational  structure  contributed  to  an  environment  in  which  line  su-
pervisors  failed  to  take  adequate  responsibility  for  safety  issues,  and  safety  per-
sonnel failed to assert a sufficient level of authority to ensure compliance with exist-
ing  procedures  and  policies.  In  sum,  a  culture  has  developed  with  respect  to  safety
issues  that  NIST  understands  must  be  addressed  broadly,  beyond  this  specific
event.

Preliminary analysis indicates that multiple organizational failures contributed to
the  incident.  Specifically,  proper  procedures  were  not  followed  for  acquiring  a  radi-
ation  source  and  line  management  was  not  aware  of  the  inappropriate  handling  of
the source material. As a result, a proper risk assessment was not conducted.

There  were  no  procedures  in  place  for  source  handling  and  utilization  nor  was
there  an  incident  response  plan  or  an  audit  program  for  radiation  safety  at  NIST–
Boulder.  Our  investigation  has  revealed  at  this  point  that  the  scope  of  the  haz-
ardous materials programs expanded without reevaluation of the risks involved and
without a commensurate strengthening of the radiation safety program. As a result,
there  was  inadequate  infrastructure  to  support  the  use  of  encapsulated  sources.
This clearly shows that we do not have systems in place to adequately identify and
manage  risks  as  they  change.  As  we  move  forward  and  revise  our  safety  program,
we  must  integrate  risk  management  into  it.  We  must  train  our  personnel  so  that
when  they  are  preparing  to  perform  a  task  or  proposing  a  new  process/procedure
that  they  are  trained  and  have  the  resources  to:  1.  Identify  the  risks  involved;  2.
Identify  the  controls  necessary  to  reduce  or  eliminate  those  risks;  3.  Implement
those controls; and 4. Monitor those controls to ensure the risks are in fact reduced
or eliminated. If the fourth step identifies weaknesses in the controls or if the risk(s)
have changed, our personnel will know they must go back to the first step and begin
this process again.

Available  training  was  inadequate  and  insufficient  with  respect  to  the  number  of
individuals trained. Existing training requirements were ignored by researchers and
not  identified  by  safety  personnel.  Specifically,  three  individuals  involved  received
inadequate  or  no  training.  We  recognize  that  insufficient/inadequate  training  or
training that was ignored, which are examples of management failures. We will in-
tegrate relevant training, with appropriate measures to document and evaluate the
effectiveness  of  that  training  into  our  revised  safety  program.  We  will  also  include
mechanisms to hold supervisors accountable for the training of their personnel.

Use  of  the  posted  radiation  laboratory  as  a  multi-use  laboratory  accessed  by  un-
trained  and  uninformed  individuals  contributed  to  risk,  which  was  exacerbated  by
the lack of an accurate hazard posting on laboratory door.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

In  general,  there  was  weak  engagement  by  line  management  in  overseeing  per-
sonnel,  programs,  and  safety-related  activities.  Similarly,  safety  personnel  failed  to
identify and/or address obvious safety issues.

Timeline Since the Incident

Mr.  Chairman,  this  section  provides  a  summary  of  the  communications  and  ac-

tions taken since the incident occurred.

Dr.  William  Anderson,  Director  of  the  NIST  Electronics  and  Electrical  Engineer-
ing Laboratory, sent an e-mail to the NIST Chief Scientist, Dr. Richard Kayser, and
me,  at  9  p.m.  on  June  9th.  I  did  not  see  that  e-mail  until  the  following  morning.
Clearly,  e-mail  is  not  sufficient  in  case  of  emergencies.  I  understand  that  on  June
10th  the  Director  of  the  Boulder  Labs  called  the  City  of  Boulder  to  inform  them  of
the  situation  and  offered  to  brief  the  City  on  the  incident.  Managers  at  NOAA,
housed  in  a  physically  separate  building  on  the  campus,  and  the  National  Tele-
communications  and  Information  Administration  (NTIA),  which  has  people  in  the
same  building  as  the  affected  lab,  were  also  apprised  of  the  situation  and  offered
a briefing.

In  this  instance,  some  of  the  initial  outreach  was  timely;  in  other  cases  it  was
not.  The  lack  of  a  clearly  articulated  plan  with  names  and  contacts  hampered  the
efforts  by  NIST–Boulder  staff  to  inform  those  who  must  know  or  needed  to  know
the situation. This is why immediately after the incident I directed the NIST Direc-
tor  of  Emergency  Services  to  develop  a  notification  checklist  for  Boulder  similar  to
what  is  kept  in  Gaithersburg.  This  can  be  used  in  an  emergency  to  assure  system-
atic notification and not rely on someone remembering something during a stressful
situation. I will be happy to provide for the record more specifics on our emergency
notifications procedures.

The Boulder staff was advised via an e-mail and has continued to receive updates
as  new  information  becomes  available.  In  addition,  on  June  10th,  NIST  Congres-
sional  and  Legislative  Affairs  notified  this  subcommittee  and  the  staff  of  the  local
Colorado  Representative  and  Senators  of  the  incident.  We  have  and  will  continue
to  provide  updates  as  the  assessment  and  investigation  continues.  In  addition,  a
news release was provided to the local news media and posted on the NIST external
Web site, and the NRC was advised about the incident, within the required 24-hour
period.

The  NRC  arrived  at  NIST–Boulder  for  an  initial  assessment  on  June  11th  and
I  dispatched  a  health  physicist  from  NIST–Gaithersburg  to  assist  the  Radiation
Safety Officer in Boulder.

As  I  mentioned  earlier,  the  health  physicists  initiated  the  first  of  a  series  of  bio-
assay  tests  for  personnel  either  known  to  have  trace  external  contamination  or  de-
termined  to  be  potentially  contaminated,  or  for  personnel  who  self-identified  them-
selves to us as having a possible concern for their risk of exposure. Initial tests indi-
cated  no  evidence  of  significant  internal  contamination  of  individuals.  More  sen-
sitive  follow-up  tests  as  recommended  by  the  Department  of  Energy  (DOE)  physi-
cians and radiation experts showed some internal contamination for a small number
of individuals. But as I mentioned, these results support our current understanding
that  the  exposure  level  is  very  low  and  will  accord  no  significant  health  risk  to  the
personnel affected. We await additional test results.

Even  more  sensitive  testing,  known  as  a  ‘‘TIMS’’  (thermal  ionization  mass  spec-
trometry)  test,  has  been  initiated  for  all  individuals  who  potentially  have  been  ex-
posed  or  who  have  requested  to  be  tested.  In  addition,  several  other  professionals
who  entered  the  lab  as  part  of  the  investigation  have  been  provided  tests—which
is a standard procedure for such radiation workers. These tests are complex and re-
quire  several  weeks  to  receive  results.  We  hope  to  receive  final  results  at  the  end
of this month.

It is reported to me that on-going interviews on June 12th revealed that the guest
researcher  who  had  handled  the  plutonium  had  walked  to  other  parts  of  the  build-
ing  before  being  decontaminated.  Over  the  next  few  hours,  the  potentially  affected
areas  were  then  surveyed.  The  resurvey  showed  trace  amounts  of  contamination  in
one  office  on  one  desk,  a  lab  notebook  on  the  desk,  and  the  chair  associated  with
that  desk,  that  had  been  used  by  the  affected  individual,  as  well  as  in  a  stairway
leading to the office. As a precaution, the room was sealed until more thorough test-
ing  and  evaluation  could  be  completed.  The  hallway  and  stairway  outside  the  af-
fected  room  was  surveyed  and  it  was  reported  that  no  evidence  of  removable  con-
tamination beyond normal background was detected.

NIST provided notice of the new findings to Congressional staff, the City of Boul-
der,  the  media,  the  public,  the  NRC,  and  the  Boulder  NOAA  and  NTIA  site.  We
called  in  and  began  our  first  consultation  with  the  DOE  National  Nuclear  Security
Administration’s (NNSA) Radiological Assistance Program (RAP).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

Over  that  weekend,  NIST  health  physicists  (part  of  our  safety  operation)  made
the initial controlled entry into the sealed lab in order to conduct a radiation survey
as  part  of  NIST’s  internal  investigation.  Late  Saturday,  June  14th,  the  initial  sur-
vey  revealed  contamination  in  the  lab  sink.  It  was  subsequently  learned—through
a  re-interview—that  the  researcher  who  worked  most  directly  with  the  plutonium
sample  washed  his/her  hands  in  that  sink  during  the  incident,  a  critical  fact  that
had not been initially reported.

I  understand  that  a  NIST–Boulder  official  contacted  the  City  of  Boulder’s  waste
water  treatment  plant  manager  early  on  Monday,  June  16th,  to  alert  the  city  that
there was a possible discharge into the city waste water system. NIST was not able
to quantify the amount of the possible discharge at that time.

As a result of the finding in the lab sink, public notice of the discovery that some
unknown amount of plutonium was discharged into the city waste water system also
was made to the DOC Boulder campus, Congress, the media, the public and the City
of  Boulder  City  Manager.  The  Boulder  Director  offered  to  brief  the  City  manage-
ment,  NOAA,  and  NTIA  on  the  incident.  All  NIST–Boulder  staff  was  invited  to  a
briefing  on  the  incident.  We  also  initiated  communications  with  the  Department  of
Commerce OIG on the incident.

NIST worked to develop plans for the DOE RAP team to conduct a full radiation
survey of the affected lab, to assist NIST’s internal investigation, and to help deter-
mine  the  upper  limit  on  the  possible  discharge  of  plutonium  through  the  lab  sink
into the municipal sewer system. A briefing for NTIA staff also was scheduled.

Our  latest  information  from  the  medical  experts,  based  on  the  most  recent  test
results, is that personnel with internal plutonium exposure are not expected to face
significant  health  risks.  As  I  mentioned,  we  are  waiting  on  the  most  sensitive  test,
the  TIMS,  to  confirm  these  findings.  I  am  concerned  for  the  health  and  safety  of
our personnel and we are getting advice from the best medical experts in the coun-
try  and  will  do  everything  we  can  to  ensure  that  the  people  affected  get  the  best
possible medical treatment.

Preliminary Corrective Actions Taken

First  Mr.  Chairman,  I  have  ensured  that  NIST–Boulder  has  issued  a  stop  work
order for all radioactive materials in use, and a preliminary decision has been made
to  limit  the  use  of  radioactive  materials  in  Boulder  in  the  future  to  sealed  sources.
At  my  request,  five  eminent  experts  in  radiation  health  safety  conducted  an  as-
sessment  of  the  incident.  They  were  asked  to  report  their  initial  findings  individ-
ually  directly  to  me.  On  July  9th,  I  received  the  last  of  these  reports.  An  author
of  one  of  those  reports,  Dr.  Ken  Rogers,  is  on  the  panel  today  and  you  will  hear
from him directly on his findings and recommendations. I recently received the last
of these reports and we transmitted them to this committee and made them public.
Their reports are sobering in their assessment of our challenges, and I take their
words  very  seriously.  Their  views  about  our  shortcomings  confirm  my  belief  of  the
need  to  focus  our  efforts  on  NIST’s  entire  environment,  health,  safety,  and  emer-
gency  response  protocols  and  safety  culture  to  ensure  that  we  are  measuring  up  to
both requirements and the highest expectations for a world-class organization. I ex-
pect that these experts will continue to provide insights to me and to others at NIST
in the coming weeks.

Training Protocols for All NIST Employees

The lack of training provided disturbs me greatly, Mr. Chairman. I am committed
to making the changes necessary to reduce to the maximum extent possible the op-
portunity for such a situation to occur in the future. This includes re-evaluating our
training  to  make  certain  it  is  appropriate,  establishing  testing  mechanisms  to  as-
sure training was mastered, and creating the controls to document training.

Mr.  Chairman,  let  me  initially  say  what  our  NIST  policy  is,  and  what  it  is  sup-
posed  to  be.  I  will  then  discuss  what  we  believe  we  know  at  this  time  as  to  how
NIST complied with or acts in accord with its own policy in this matter.

It  is  NIST  policy  to  establish,  coordinate,  and  maintain  a  comprehensive  and  ef-
fective  NIST  Safety  Operational  System  (SOS)  consistent  with  the  standards  pre-
scribed  by  Section  6  of  the  Occupational  Safety  and  Health  Act  of  1970,  ANSI–Z10
Occupational  Health  and  Safety  Management  System  (OHSMS),  and  other  applica-
ble regulations.

Every manager, employee, and associate in the organization has the responsibility
for systematically identifying risks, hazards, or potentially unsafe situations or prac-
tices  and  for  taking  steps  to  ensure  adequate  safety.  Emphasis  is  placed  on  identi-
fication of risks and implementation of measures to control those risks. Implementa-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

tion  of  effective  OHSMS  programs  relies  on  recognition  and  adoption  of  the  fol-
lowing principles by management, employees, and associates:

a. Incidents/Accidents can and should be prevented.
b. Line  management  is  responsible  for  the  safe  conduct  of  operations.  Manage-
ment  systems  can  be  designed  to  avoid  unsafe  acts,  unsafe  conditions,  and
incidents/accidents.  Individuals  are,  however,  responsible  for  their  own  safe
behavior.

c. Management  should  establish  challenging  goals  for  safety,  and  take  the  re-

sponsibility to plan and implement actions to achieve the goals.

d. The  keys  to  effective  line  safety  performance  are  management  procedures
that  create  a  culture  of  safety,  while  defining  and  expecting  accountability
for  results  and  minimizing  hazards.  Safe  behavior  and  actions  are  expected
and should be recognized, while unsafe behavior is discouraged and must be
promptly  corrected.  There  also  must  be  effective  safety  oversight  to  assure
compliance.

e. One  of  the  functions  of  the  safety  staff  is  to  immediately  stop  any  work
where  safety  is  questionable.  Safety  staff  should  be  included  in  discussions
of  current  and  proposed  operations  to  assist  with  identifying  safety  defi-
ciencies  within  those  operations  and  making  recommendation  to  reduce  the
potential for incidents/accidents. Safety staff should develop safety programs
that  include  documented  training  for  line  managers/supervisor,  employees,
and associates.

However, Mr. Chairman, in reality, the culture that existed at least in the labora-
tory  involved  in  this  incident  was  one  in  which  safety  was  not  the  highest  priority
and  led  to  an  untrained  guest  researcher,  improperly  supervised,  handling  a  dan-
gerous radioactive source.

It  is  NIST  policy  that  upon  entrance  on  duty,  new  employees  must  attend  a  gen-
eral  safety  orientation  session  presented  by  the  NIST  Safety,  Health  and  Environ-
ment Division. One of the gaps that we have identified is that new associates (e.g.,
guest  researchers  from  other  institutions)  are  not  currently  required  to  attend  this
orientation.  It  is  the  responsibility  of  line  supervisors  to  instruct  all  new  or  trans-
ferred  appointees  (employees  and  associates)  assigned  to  their  units,  in  the  occupa-
tional  safety,  health  and  environmental  requirements  applicable  to  the  specific  job,
preferably  on  the  first  day,  but  in  any  event  during  the  first  week  of  such  assign-
ment.  Appointees  who  will  be  working  in  a  laboratory  must  be  instructed  in  NIST
laboratory safety practices and be given a copy of the NIST Laboratory Safety Man-
ual by their supervisor.

New or transferred appointees (employees and associates) who will be working in
a laboratory or other hazardous environment, (e.g., mechanical shops), are to be pro-
vided  adequate  laboratory/shop-specific  on-the-job  training  within  one  month  of
their  employment.  We  are  reviewing  this  requirement  which  currently  would  allow
an individual to work in a lab for 30 days without appropriate training. Since func-
tions differ among the laboratories/shops, each laboratory/shop is to develop its lab-
oratory/shop-specific safety-training checklist to ensure that all safety areas are ade-
quately  covered.  The  laboratory/shop-specific  safety  checklist  may  be  used  to  docu-
ment the first month of employment safety training requirement. The safety check-
list  should  identify  the  total  number  of  hours  necessary  to  cover  all  safety  areas.
Line supervisors must ensure that pertinent safety and health instructions, relat-
ing to conditions and practices that may be necessary to eliminate or control specific
job  hazards,  are  routinely  incorporated  into  regular  operating  procedures,  shop  or-
ders, preventive maintenance instructions, etc.

A  minimum  of  four  hours  of  relevant  safety  training  must  be  provided  to  all  em-
ployees and associates on an annual basis. Not less than quarterly in all non-admin-
istrative  units  (typically  including  laboratory  activities;  warehousing;  trades,  craft,
maintenance, labor, protective, and transportation services; etc.) line supervisors are
to  schedule  and  conduct  a  safety  awareness  meeting  with  all  assigned  unit  per-
sonnel, for the specific purpose of discussing safety issues pertinent to the unit’s op-
erations. Brief written reports of such meetings are to be forwarded through the ap-
plicable  division  or  office  chief  to  the  NIST  Safety,  Health  and  Environment  Divi-
sion. Where there is need for specialized safety training beyond the capability or re-
sources of a unit, the scope and method of training is to be determined through the
coordinated efforts of the unit involved, the training personnel, and the safety staff.
That  is  the  policy.  There  must  be  effective  controls  to  flag  deficiencies,  mecha-
nisms  such  as  testing  to  gauge  mastery  of  the  training  material,  and  formal  docu-
mentation  of  training.  Our  ongoing  assessment  will  help  us  address  critical  areas
for improvement.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

Conclusion

Mr. Chairman, based on the information available at this time, this incident was
preventable.  Thankfully,  the  medical  experts  tell  us  that  as  of  this  time  there  are
expected  to  be  no  significant  health  effects  for  the  people  involved.  This  incident  is
a sobering reminder of the importance of establishing clear, comprehensive and ap-
propriate  safety  policies  and  rigorously  adhering  to  safety  protocols.  As  is  abun-
dantly clear, when we do not approach these matters with the necessary rigor, clar-
ity and sense of purpose there can be serious consequences.

I again pledge to you my commitment to improving our environmental, health and
safety  practices,  ingraining  a  sustainable  safety  culture  and  thereby  ensuring  the
health and safety of our employees and local communities. I will report to you regu-
larly  and  will  keep  you  apprised  of  our  findings  and  our  progress.  It  is  crucial  to
our  ability  to  achieve  our  mission  and  ensure  our  workforce  that  they  have  a  safe
working environment.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

BIOGRAPHY FOR JAMES M. TURNER

Dr.  James  M.  Turner  is  the  Deputy  Director  of  the  U.S.  Department  of  Com-
merce’s National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST). He is also carrying
out the responsibilities of the Director. (The NIST Director position is vacant.) Turn-
er  provides  high-level  oversight  and  direction  for  NIST.  The  agency  promotes  U.S.
innovation  and  industrial  competitiveness  by  advancing  measurement  science,
standards,  and  technology.  NIST’s  FY  2008  resources  total  $931.5  million  and  the
agency employs about 2,800 scientists, engineers, technicians, support staff and ad-
ministrative personnel at two main locations in Gaithersburg, MD and Boulder, CO.
Along  with  the  Department  of  Energy  Office  of  Science,  and  the  National  Science
Foundation,  NIST  is  slated  for  substantial  budget  increases  for  its  core  research
programs under the President’s American Competitiveness Initiative.

Prior  to  joining  NIST  on  April  16,  2007,  Turner  served  as  the  Assistant  Deputy
Administrator  for  Nuclear  Risk  Reduction  in  the  Department  of  Energy’s  National
Nuclear  Security  Administration.  In  that  position,  he  was  responsible  for  major
projects  in  Russia  to  permanently  shut  down  their  last  three  weapons-grade  pluto-
nium-production  reactors.  He  also  worked  with  foreign  governments  and  inter-
national  agencies  to  reduce  the  consequences  of  nuclear  accidents  by  strengthening
their capability to respond to nuclear emergencies.

Prior  to  that  assignment,  Turner  held  several  senior  management  posts  at  DOE
concerned  with  laboratory  oversight  and  with  nuclear  safety  and  the  safeguarding
of nuclear weapons both here and abroad.

He  holds  degrees  in  Physics  from  the  Massachusetts  Institute  of  Technology
(Ph.D.)  and  Johns  Hopkins  University  (B.A.),  and  taught  for  five  years  as  an  Asso-
ciate Professor of Physics and Engineering at Morehouse College.

Among  other  honors,  he  has  received  the  U.S.  Government  Presidential  Rank
Award for Meritorious Service, three times received the U.S. Department of Energy
Exceptional Service Award, and earned the Secretary of Energy Gold Award and the
National  Nuclear  Security  Administration’s  Gold  Medal.  Dr.  Turner  is  an  active
member  of  the  American  Physical  Society,  the  American  Chemical  Society,  the
American  Nuclear  Society,  the  American  Association  for  the  Advancement  of
Science, ASTM, the Council on Foreign Relations, IEEE, Phi Beta Kappa, Sigma Xi,
and the World Affairs Council.

Dr.  Turner  is  a  native  of  Washington,  DC,  is  married,  and  has  five  children  and
one grandchild. He enjoys doing yoga and Tai Chi. He and his wife, Paulette, reside
in Olney, Maryland.

Chairman WU. Thank you very much, Dr. Turner.
Dr. Miller, please proceed.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  CHARLES  L.  MILLER,  DIRECTOR,  OFFICE
OF FEDERAL AND STATE MATERIALS AND ENVIRONMENTAL
MANAGEMENT  PROGRAMS,  U.S.  NUCLEAR  REGULATORY
COMMISSION;  ACCOMPANIED  BY  DR.  ELMO  E.  COLLINS,  RE-
GIONAL ADMINISTRATOR, REGION IV OFFICE, U.S. NUCLEAR
REGULATORY COMMISSION
Dr. MILLER. Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee, I am
honored  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  the  U.S.  Nuclear
Regulatory  Commission’s  role  in  regulating  and  inspecting  radio-
active materials facilities. I hope that my testimony will be helpful
to  you  in  understanding  the  regulatory  framework  and  the  over-
sight  of  facilities  such  as  NIST  and  how  NRC  responds  to  events
at these facilities. My written testimony has been submitted for the
record,  and  I  will  use  my  time  this  morning  to  highlight  some  of
the key points.

Following  that  during  the  question  and  answer  period,  Mr.  Col-
lins  and  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any  questions  with  regard  to
our activities, including the inspection.

Under the authorities and responsibilities granted by the Atomic
Energy Act of 1954, as amended, NRC issues licenses for use of ra-
dioactive  material  to  qualified  applicants  that  meet  our  regulatory

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

requirements.  Primary  responsibility  for  safety  and  security  of  the
radioactive  material  lies  with  the  licensees  who  possess  and  use
the material.

NRC  inspects  the  users  of  radioactive  material  for  compliance
with  both  safety  of  the  regulations  and  any  additional  conditions
made during the licensing. Perspective licensees wishing to possess
and  use  radioactive  material  must  submit  a  license  application  to
the  NRC,  showing  how  their  facility’s  personnel  and  program  con-
trols meet the regulations and protect the workers, the public, and
the  environment,  and  provide  adequate  security  of  the  radioactive
material.

Each application is reviewed by NRC technical staff. If the regu-
latory  requirements  are  met,  NRC  issues  a  license  outlining  the
conditions  under  which  the  radioactive  material  can  be  used.  Li-
censees  must  request  and  obtain  from  NRC  a  license  amendment
to change its license or its condition. Because of the potentially se-
rious  consequences  that  can  result  from  the  failure  to  comply  with
NRC  regulations,  every  licensee  must  conduct  its  radiation  safety
program according to the conditions of its NRC license, representa-
tions made in its license application, and NRC regulations.

NIST  is  licensed  to  use  solid  encapsulated  plutonium  in  quan-
tities  less  than  critical  mass.  Use  of  the  material  must  be  done  in
accordance with explicit procedures. NIST’s NRC license requires a
Radiation  Safety  Officer,  whose  role  is  to  ensure  license  conditions
are  met  and  radiation  safety  practices  are  followed.  The  NIST  li-
cense also includes a commitment that all individuals working with
license  sources  or  those  who  frequent  areas  or  license  sources  are
present, shall receive annual radiation safety training at a level ap-
propriate for their assigned duties.

It  is  the  responsibility  of  the  licensee’s  management  and  the  ra-
diation safety officer to ensure individuals who access these sources
or facilities receive appropriate training. NRC conducts periodic in-
spections of licensees to ensure compliance with regulatory require-
ments  and  license  conditions.  The  licensing  decision  was  to  assign
an  inspection  frequency  at  the  NIST–Boulder  facility  of  every  five
years  because  of  its  activities,  which  are  relatively  low  risk  given
the small amount of radioactive material that the lab is authorized
to  possess  and  the  approved  uses  of  the  material  within  the  lab.
NRC  may  supplement  the  periodic  inspections  with  reactive  in-
spections.  A  reactive  inspection  is  a  special  inspection  in  response
to  an  incident,  an  allegation,  or  information  obtained  by  the  NRC
to  focus  on  the  sequences  of  events  leading  up  to  the  incident,  the
contributing  root  causes  of  the  event,  corrective  actions  taken  or
proposed by the licensee, and a discussion of the regulations apply-
ing to the incident, and where they were not met. All NRC inspec-
tions are documented, and the results are provided to the licensee.
With  the  exception  of  some  security  inspections,  they  are  publicly
available also.

Failure  to  conduct  operations  in  accordance  with  the  regulations
and  licensed  conditions  can  result  in  enforcement  action  against
the  licensee  or  even  individuals.  NRC’s  enforcement  program  is
built  upon  a  potential  or  actual  safety  significance  and  considers
program  factors  such  as  repeat  violation,  willfulness  or  disregard
for the requirements.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

The  June—on  June  10,  NIST  informed  the  NRC  of  the  June  9
contamination  event.  Upon  learning  of  the  event,  NRC  dispatched
a health physics inspector to the site on June 12, and followed that
with  a  senior  health  physics  inspector  on  the  19th.  Upon  the  con-
sideration and the feedback from those inspectors, we escalated our
inspection activities to a special inspection team, and that was dis-
patched to Boulder on June 30.

The  team’s  detailed  inspection  is  in  progress.  Results  of  the  spe-
cial  inspection  and  the  team’s  work  will  be  issued  within  45  days
upon  the  conclusion  of  the  inspection.  On  July  2,  we  issued  a  con-
firmatory  action  letter  (CAL),  confirming  the  agreed-upon  actions
that  NIST  took  and  plans  to  take  as  a  result  of  the  event  and  the
order. Pursuant to the CAL, NIST has agreed to take a number of
actions.  Those  actions  are  outlined  in  my  detailed  written  testi-
mony.

Although  we  have  yet  to  identify  any  safety  aspects  of  the  June
9,  event  with  significant  impacts  on  the  worker  or  public  health
safety, we are continuing our evaluation of the circumstances of the
event itself and how NIST’s programs, procedures, and policies con-
tributed  to  the  event.  NRC’s  efforts  will  ensure  that  if  there  were
violations,  NIST  will  develop  and  implement  effective  and  lasting
corrective actions.

I  hope  my  testimony  provides  you  with  an  understanding  of  our
regulatory role at the NRC, how it fits NIST, and how the NRC re-
sponds to events at these facilities and the seriousness with which
we take our duty to protect public health and safety in the environ-
ment.

Dr.  Collins  and  I  will  be  pleased  to  respond  to  your  questions.

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Miller follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHARLES L. MILLER

INTRODUCTION

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee, I am honored to appear before you
today  to  discuss  the  U.S.  Nuclear  Regulatory  Commission’s  (NRC’s)  role  in  regu-
lating  and  inspecting  radioactive  materials  facilities.  I  hope  that  my  testimony  will
be helpful to you in understanding the regulatory framework and oversight of facili-
ties  such  as  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology  (NIST),  and  how
the  NRC  responds  to  events  at  these  facilities.  The  NRC’s  work  in  response  to  the
June 9, 2008 event at NIST’s Boulder facility is ongoing. Mr. Elmo Collins, Regional
Administrator  for  the  NRC’s  Region  IV  office,  and  the  home  base  for  the  agency’s
special  inspection  team  for  this  event,  is  here  with  me  today  to  answer  any  ques-
tions about our inspection activities up to this point.

On  June  10,  2008,  the  NRC  received  a  report  of  a  contamination  event  at  the
NIST  facility  in  Boulder,  Colorado.  The  previous  day,  a  junior  researcher  had  bro-
ken  a  glass  vial  containing  one-fourth  of  a  gram  of  plutonium  powder.  The  junior
researcher  and  other  individuals,  working  both  inside  and  outside  the  specific  lab-
oratory suite were contaminated. The researcher apparently washed his hands to re-
move  the  plutonium  contamination,  thus  introducing  a  small  amount  of  plutonium
into  the  sewer  system.  More  importantly,  analysis  confirmed  that  the  junior  re-
searcher, as well as others, ingested or inhaled some of the plutonium.

The  NRC  dispatched  a  health  physics  inspector  to  the  site  an  June  12,  who
verified  that  the  lab  was  acceptably  isolated  for  the  short-term.  A  second  health
physics  inspector  was  dispatched  by  NRC  an  June  19.  NRC’s  initial  assessment  of
the  event  and  NIST’s  follow-up  actions  indicated  that  there  was  no  immediate
threat  to  additional  workers  or  to  public  health  and  safety.  However  on  the  basis
of  the  inspectors’  observations  on-site,  NRC  management  determined  that  an  en-
hanced  agency  response  was  needed  to  ensure  that  the  licensee  conducted  licensed
activities safely in the short-term and that further inspection follow-up was needed

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

to  more  fully  understand  the  circumstances,  causes,  and  licensee  actions.  Addition-
ally,  on  June  27,  the  licensee  reported  that  the  junior  researcher  received  a  poten-
tially significant radiation dose. On June 30, a five-member Special Inspection Team
(SIT),  dispatched  from  NRC’s  Region  IV  Office  in  Arlington,  Texas,  began  con-
ducting  a  more  detailed  review  of  the  event.  I  will  further  explain  the  SIT  later  in
this  testimony.  The  team’s  inspection  is  in  progress.  As  I  will  discuss  further  else-
where  in  this  testimony,  NIST—in  consultation  with  NRC—has  also  agreed  to  sus-
pend all use of plutonium sources pending NRC approval of the resumption of such
activities.

NRC  REGULATORY  FRAMEWORK  TO  ENSURE  SAFE  USE  OF  RADIO-

ACTIVE MATERIAL

Before  I  address  the  specifics  related  to  the  NIST  license  and  the  event,  I  would
like to briefly describe NRC’s structure and regulatory approach to licensing, inspec-
tion, and enforcement. Through the Agreement States Program, the NRC shares its
regulatory  authority  to  license  and  oversee  the  use  of  certain  types  of  radioactive
material.  Although  Colorado  is  one  of  the  35  Agreement  States,  NRC  retains  regu-
latory  jurisdiction  for  NIST–Boulder  because  it  is  a  federal  facility.  Therefore,  this
testimony  will  focus  on  NRC’s  program  and  not  on  the  role  of  Agreement  States.

OVERALL FRAMEWORK AND MISSION

The mission of the NRC is to license and regulate the Nation’s civilian use of by-
product, source, and special nuclear material to ensure adequate protection of public
health  and  safety,  promote  the  common  defense  and  security,  and  protect  the  envi-
ronment.  The  Atomic  Energy  Act  of  1954,  as  amended,  grants  NRC  the  authorities
and  responsibilities  needed  to  accomplish  this  mission.  NRC  has  issued  regulations
that are designed to protect the public and occupational workers from radiation haz-
ards. NRC issues licenses for use of radioactive material to qualified applicants who
meet  regulatory  requirements.  The  responsibility  for  safety  and  security  of  the  ra-
dioactive  material  lies  with  the  licensees  who  possess  and  use  the  material.  NRC
inspects the users of radioactive material to ensure compliance with both NRC safe-
ty  regulations  and  any  additional  conditions  imposed  during  the  licensing.  Enforce-
ment against licensees as well as individuals can be pursued by NRC for noncompli-
ance with these regulations and conditions.

Within  NRC,  the  Office  of  Federal  and  State  Materials  and  Environmental  Man-
agement  Programs,  of  which  I  am  the  Director,  is  responsible  for  the  development,
implementation,  and  oversight  of  the  regulatory  framework  for  industrial,  commer-
cial  and  medical  uses  of  radioactive  material,  uranium  recovery  activities,  and  the
decommissioning  of  previously  operating  nuclear  facilities  and  power  plants.  NRC
also  has  Regional  Offices  which  conduct  inspection,  enforcement,  investigation,  li-
censing,  and  emergency  response  programs  for  radioactive  material  licensees.  NRC
currently  has  approximately  3,700  licensees  for  radioactive  material,  and  conducts
approximately 1,200 inspections annually.

LICENSING AND REGULATIONS

Prospective  licensees  wishing  to  possess  and  use  radioactive  material  such  as
those  possessed  and  used  by  NIST  must  submit  a  license  application  to  the  NRC
showing  how  their  planned  facilities,  personnel,  program  controls,  and  equipment
meet  NRC  regulations  and  protect  the  workers,  public,  and  environment,  and  pro-
vide  adequate  security  of  the  radioactive  material.  Each  application  is  reviewed  by
NRC staff according to established procedures and criteria, and if the regulatory re-
quirements are met, NRC issues a license outlining the conditions under which the
company  or  individual  can  possess  the  radioactive  material.  In  addition,  licensees
must  request  and  obtain  a  license  amendment  to  alter  a  license  or  its  conditions.
As  mentioned  above,  the  responsibility  for  safety  and  security  of  the  radioactive
material lies with the licensee. Assignment of this responsibility varies from licensee
to  licensee  and  facility  to  facility,  but  is  delineated  in  the  license  application  and
license  conditions.  In  general,  each  licensee’s  environmental  health  and  safety
(EH&S)  officials  and  management  have  the  responsibility  for  establishing  the  poli-
cies  and  procedures  to  ensure  safe  handling  of  radioactive  material  and  compliance
with  regulatory  requirements;  for  ensuring  that  those  individuals  using  radioactive
material have adequate training; and for oversight of the program and users to en-
sure adherence to established policies and procedures. Individuals using radioactive
material have the responsibility to adhere to established policies and procedures, in-
cluding  reporting  any  deviations  or  issues  to  Radiation  Safety  Officer  (RSO)  and/or
management.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

NRC expects licensees to conduct their programs with meticulous attention to de-
tail  and  a  high  standard  of  compliance  and  holds  them  accountable  for  doing  so
through  inspections  and  enforcement.  Because  of  the  potentially  serious  con-
sequences  that  can  result  from  failure  to  comply  with  NRC  regulations,  every  li-
censee  must  conduct  its  radiation  safety  program  according  to  the  conditions  of  its
NRC  license,  representations  made  in  its  license  application,  NRC  regulations,  and
NRC  Orders.  Specifically,  licensees  are  subject  to  NRC  regulations  in  10  CFR  Part
19,  ‘‘Notices,  Instructions  and  Reports  to  Workers:  Inspection  and  Investigations,’’
10 CFR Part 20, ‘‘Standards for Protection Against Radiation,’’ and other applicable
regulations. The regulations also specify reporting requirements to inform the NRC
of  significant  events,  including  loss  of  material,  release  of  material  to  the  environ-
ment,  radiation  exposures  to  workers  or  the  public  that  exceed  limits  specified  in
the regulations, damaged sources or devices, equipment that fails to function as de-
signed, and leaking sources.

The  following  items  are  the  key  requirements  in  NRC  regulations  that  must  be
addressed by applicants before NRC issues a license authorizing possession and use
of radioactive material:

cial nuclear material of the types and quantities requested;

• Applicants must be qualified by reason of training and experience to use spe-
• Applicants must have the facilities and equipment to protect health and safe-
• Applicants  must  have  the  procedures  to  protect  health  and  to  minimize  dan-

ty and minimize danger to life or property;

ger to life or property.

NRC INSPECTION AND ENFORCEMENT PROGRAM

NRC  conducts  periodic  inspections  of  licensees  to  ensure  compliance  with  regu-
latory  requirements  and  license  conditions.  To  enable  NRC  to  apply  its  resources
most  effectively  to  the  highest  risk  activities,  an  inspection  priority  code  from  1  to
5  is  assigned  to  each  type  of  use  authorized  by  a  license.  The  priority  code  equals
the normal inspection interval in years, with code 1 being the greatest potential risk
to  the  health  and  safety  of  workers,  members  of  the  public,  and  the  environment.
In  the  licensing  process,  an  inspection  frequency  of  once  every  five  years  was  as-
signed  to  the  NIST–Boulder  facility  because  its  activities  are  relatively  low-risk
given the small amount of radioactive material that the lab is authorized to possess
and the approved uses of this source within the lab.

If there are licensee performance issues, or events, NRC may supplement the peri-
odic inspections with ‘‘reactive’’ inspections. A reactive inspection is a special inspec-
tion in response to an incident, allegation, or information obtained by NRC (e.g., re-
port  of  a  medical  event  or  other  federal  agency  interest).  The  scope  of  the  reactive
inspections is normally to focus on the sequence of events leading up to the incident,
the  contributing  and  root  causes  of  the  event,  corrective  actions  taken  or  proposed
by  the  licensee,  and  a  discussion  of  the  regulations  applying  to  the  incident  and  if
and  where  they  were  not  met.  Reactive  inspections  can  focus  in  on  one  or  several
issues, using more specialized technical or management expertise than a normal in-
spection,  and  thus  do  not  necessarily  examine  the  totality  of  a  licensee’s  program.
All NRC inspections are documented and the results are provided to the licensee;
with the exception of some security inspections, these documents are publicly avail-
able.  If  deficiencies  are  identified,  the  inspector  brings  them  to  the  attention  of  li-
censee  management  at  the  exit  meeting  and  also  in  the  cover  letter  transmitting
the inspection report or Notice of Violation (NOV). An NOV is a formal notification
to  the  licensee  that  an  apparent  noncompliance  with  regulations  or  conditions  has
been identified. The NOV requires a written response including a description of the
proposed  corrective  actions.  It  is  the  first  step  in  the  NRC’s  enforcement  process.
Failure to conduct operations according to regulations and license conditions may
result  in  enforcement  action  against  the  licensee  as  well  as  individuals.  This  could
include  more  frequent  inspections;  issuance  of  a  notice  of  violation;  imposition  of  a
civil penalty; and/or an order suspending, modifying, or revoking the license. NRC’s
enforcement program is built around potential or actual safety significance, and con-
siders performance factors such as repeat violations, willfulness, or disregard for re-
quirements.

Because  of  its  relevance  to  today’s  hearing  subject,  I  would  like  to  mention  that
one of several tools that NRC uses with its licensees is a confirmatory action letter
(CAL). A CAL documents agreed upon actions that the licensee will take to address
concerns  with  their  activities.  These  actions  can  either  be  permanent  or  can  be  on
a temporary basis to address concerns until a final assessment can be made regard-
ing  the  need  for  permanent  changes.  A  CAL  can  also  ensure  a  clear  understanding
of and commitment to necessary actions to control and assess an unexpected event.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

In  cases  where  a  CAL  is  neither  appropriate  nor  sufficient  to  ensure  safety,  the
NRC may issue an Order requiring mandatory licensee action.

NIST LICENSE

Let  me  now  turn  to  the  specifics  of  the  NIST  facility  in  Boulder  with  respect  to
its  license  conditions  and  requirements,  as  well  as  the  event  that  occurred  on  June
9, 2008.

NRC  initially  issued  a  Byproduct  Material  License  (No–05–03166–05)  for  the
Boulder  facility  to  the  Department  of  Commerce,  National  Bureau  of  Standards  on
December  19,  1968.  The  license  has  been  amended  a  total  of  29  times  since  it  was
issued.  Amendment  No.  28  added  the  special  nuclear  material  (e.g.,  plutonium)  to
the  existing  research  and  development  license  and  Amendment  No.  25  authorized
research  and  development  activities  on  the  license  using  sealed  sources.  The  most
recent  amendment,  Amendment  No.  29,  was  issued  to  NIST  on  June  22,  2007  to
increase the amount of Iron-55 and limit the amount of Nickel-63.

NIST is licensed to use solid, encapsulated plutonium in quantities less than crit-
ical  mass.  Use  of  the  material  must  be  in  accordance  with  procedures.  In  the  case
of the NIST plutonium calibration source involved in the June 9 event, the material
was contained in a glass vial. In addition, the glass vial was heat sealed in a plastic
bag,  and  the  resultant  package  was  heat  sealed  in  a  second  plastic  bag.  This  pack-
age,  composed  of  the  sealed  glass  vial  and  the  two  heat-sealed  plastic  bags,  was  in
turn placed in a third plastic bag by the NIST Radiation Safety Officer.

The  NIST  license  includes  a  commitment  that  all  individuals  working  with  li-
censed sources or those who frequent areas where licensed sources are present shall
receive  radiation  safety  training  at  a  level  appropriate  for  their  assigned  duties.  It
is  the  responsibility  of  the  licensee’s  management  and  RSO  to  ensure  individuals
who access those sources or facilities receive the appropriate training.

NIST’s license requires an RSO whose role is to ensure license conditions are met
and  radiation  safety  practices  are  followed.  Radiation  Worker  Training  is  required
for any individual where there is a reasonable potential for an individual to receive
doses  greater  than  100  millirem  in  a  year.  This  training  must  be  performed  by  the
RSO  or  an  appropriately  trained  designee.  The  RSO  must  assure  documentation  of
Radiation  Worker  Training  and  maintain  a  list  of  trained  and  authorized  radiation
workers.  Individuals  using  special  nuclear  material  must  also  be  trained  pursuant
to  the  conditions  specified  in  NIST’s  letter  dated  February  15,  2007.  NIST  license
conditions state that refresher training must be provided annually.

Radiation  Worker  Training  covers  fundamental  practices  and  concepts  in  radi-
ation  protection,  including:  (1)  basic  regulatory  requirements  in  10  CFR  Part  20
such  as  dose  limits,  posting  and  labeling,  survey  and  monitoring,  radioactive  mate-
rial control and security, and incident or emergency response; (2) radiation risks and
protection strategies such as time, distance, and shielding from the source, and con-
tamination  control;  and  (3)  general  and  job  duty-specific  training  on  the  internal
policies and practices for implementing the radiation safety program.

THE JUNE 9, 2008 NIST EVENT AND RESPONSE

On June 9, 2008, the NIST RSO was notified that a via] containing standard ref-
erence material was discovered broken in one of the research laboratory suites. The
reference material contained plutonium. NIST’s health physics personnel responded
to  the  area  and  determined  that  low  levels  of  contamination  were  spread  outside
of the laboratory suite into the adjoining hallway. The hallway was decontaminated
and  the  lab  was  isolated.  Environmental  sampling  and  bioassays  and  urinalyses  of
individuals affected were initiated.

On June 10, 2008, NIST’s Boulder, Colorado, facility reported the plutonium con-
tamination  event  to  NRC.  This  event  resulted  in  contamination  of  certain  areas
within the facility and radioactive contamination of at ]east two employees.

Once the initial significance of the event was understood by the RSO, NIST’s ini-
tial efforts were to protect workers and the public. NIST restricted access to the lab
suite, and began to evaluate the extent of contamination to the lab and the potential
for  exposure  to  workers  and  members  of  the  public.  NIST  informed  NRC  of  the
event and has cooperated with our agency staff and the other regulatory authorities
in support of inquiries and inspections.

Upon  the  initial  inspectors’  observations  and  consideration  of  risk  significance,
complexity,  and  generic  safety  implications,  NRC  determined,  in  accordance  with
our  internal  procedures,  that  a  Special  Inspection  Team  (SIT)  was  warranted.  The
SIT  process  allows  NRC  to  assess  an  event  and  its  causes  and  to  quickly  elevate
the NRC response if the findings reveal more significant concerns (e.g., an apparent
release  of  plutonium  that  results  in  an  exposure  to  a  member  of  the  public  or  a

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

worker  in  excess  of  the  allowable  limit).  As  mentioned  earlier  in  this  testimony,  on
June  29,  a  five-member  SIT  was  dispatched  from  NRC’s  Regional  Office  in  Arling-
ton,  Texas,  to  conduct  a  more  detailed  review  of  the  event  at  the  Boulder  facility.
The  team  consists  of  the  Region  IV  Division  Director  for  Nuclear  Materials  Safety,
a  Branch  Chief,  for  Nuclear  Materials  Safety,  and  three  health  physicists.  On  July
2,  NRC  staff  executive  management  met  with  the  SIT  and  determined  that  addi-
tional  escalation  was  not  warranted  at  that  point  in  time.  The  team’s  inspection  is
continuing.  A  report  documenting  the  results  of  the  special  inspection  team’s  work
will be issued within 45 days of the team completing their inspection effort.

On July 2, 2008, NRC issued a CAL to NIST confirming the agreed upon actions
that NIST took and planned to take as a result of the June 9 event in order to en-
sure  safety  and  to  adequately  evaluate  the  event  in  a  timely  manner.  Pursuant  to
the  CAL,  NIST  has  agreed  to  take  several  actions,  including:  (1)  suspending  use  of
the plutonium sources pending NRC approval and determination of procedural ade-
quacy  for  safety  and  procedural  compliance;  (2)  thoroughly  determining  the  radi-
ation  doses  to  all  individuals  potentially  exposed  by  August;  (3)  reviewing  and  as-
sessing  training  and  procedural  adequacy  prior  to  using  any  licensed  material;  (4)
providing NRC, for review and approval, a written plan for stabilizing the contami-
nation  within  the  laboratory;  and  (5)  obtaining  authorized  services  for  the  decon-
tamination of the facility and NRC approval of the licensee’s decontamination plan.
Although  our  inspection  team  has  not  completed  its  work  and  we  have  not  final-
ized  our  inspection  conclusions,  the  NRC  staff  is  concerned  about  a  number  of
issues. These include: the amount of radiation dose received by individuals as a con-
sequence  of  the  event;  the  amount  of  radioactive  materials  released  into  the  sewer;
the  use  of  procedures  at  NIST’s  Boulder  facility—particularly  those  related  to  the
handling  and  storage  of  radioactive  material;  and  the  training  of  the  individuals
performing NRC-licensed activities.

SUMMARY

In  conclusion,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  it  is  the  policy  of
the  U.S.  Nuclear  Regulatory  Commission  to  ensure  that  significant  operational
events  involving  reactor  and  materials  facilities  licensed  by  the  NRC  are  inves-
tigated  in  a  timely,  objective,  systematic,  and  technically  sound  manner;  that  the
factual  information  pertaining  to  each  event  is  documented;  and  that  the  cause  or
causes  of  each  event  are  ascertained;  and  that  corrective  actions  are  implemented
to preclude recurrence.

I hope my testimony provides you with an understanding of NRC’s regulatory role
with  regard  to  facilities  such  as  NIST,  how  the  NRC  responds  to  events  at  these
facilities,  and  the  seriousness  with  which  we  take  our  duty  to  protect  public  health
and safety and the environment.

Our  assessment  to  this  point  has  not  identified  any  aspects  of  the  June  9,  2008
event which would result in significant impacts to public and health safety, and we
are continuing our investigation into the circumstances of the event itself, including
whether  NIST’s  programs,  procedures,  and  policies  may  have  contributed  in  some
way  to  the  event.  NRC’s  efforts  will  ensure  that,  if  and  where  violations  occurred,
NIST will be required to develop and implement effective and lasting corrective ac-
tions.

Mr. Collins and I would be pleased to respond to your questions.

BIOGRAPHY FOR CHARLES L. MILLER

Dr.  Miller  is  the  Director,  Office  of  Federal  and  State  Materials  and  Environ-
mental Management Programs. Prior to this appointment he was the Director, Divi-
sion  of  Industrial  and  Medical  Nuclear  Safety,  in  the  Office  of  Nuclear  Material
Safety  and  Safeguards  (NMSS).  Prior  to  that  appointment,  he  was  the  Deputy  Di-
rector, Licensing and Inspection Directorate in the Spent Fuel Project Office, NMSS.
Since  joining  the  NRC  in  1980,  Dr.  Miller  also  held  a  number  of  positions  in  the
Office  of  Nuclear  Reactor  Regulation,  including:  Project  Manger;  Technical  Assist-
ant;  Section  Leader;  Project  Director,  Standardization  Project  Directorate;  Project
Director,  Project  Directorate  I–2;  Chief,  Emergency  Preparedness  and  Radiation
Protection  Branch;  and  Deputy  Director,  Incident  Response  Operations.  He  also
served as the Technical Assistant to former Commissioner Bernthal.

Prior  to  joining  NRC,  he  worked  for  Science  Applications  International  Corpora-
tion  (SAIC)  for  four  years  in  various  nuclear  fuel  cycle  and  defense  activities.  He
began  his  professional  career  at  Bechtel  Power  Corporation,  where  he  spent  two
years working on the design of nuclear power plants.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

Dr.  Miller  received  a  B.S.  degree  in  Chemical  Engineering  from  Widener  Univer-
sity,  and  an  M.S.  and  a  Ph.D.  in  Chemical  Engineering  from  the  University  of
Maryland.

BIOGRAPHY FOR ELMO E. COLLINS

Elmo E. Collins was assigned as the Regional Administrator for the Region IV Of-
fice  of  the  Nuclear  Regulatory  Commission  (NRC)  in  September  2007.  NRC  Region
IV is one of four, large regional offices. NRC Region IV is responsible for overseeing
the inspection of 14 nuclear power plants in 22 States, overseeing the inspection and
licensing  of  medical,  academic,  and  industrial  users  of  radioactive  materials  in
Western  United  States,  overseeing  the  Agreement  States  in  implementing  the
NRC’s  materials  inspection  and  licensing  programs  in  16  of  those  22  States,  and
overseeing  the  licensing  of  operators  of  the  controls  of  nuclear  power  reactors.  Mr.
Collins,  originally  from  Oklahoma,  graduated  from  the  U.S.  Naval  Academy  at  An-
napolis, MD in 1976.

Mr. Collins has broad and extensive experience in the nuclear industry. He served
for  six  years  in  the  U.S.  Navy  as  a  nuclear  trained  submarine  officer,  serving  on
the  USS  Thomas  A.  Edison  (SSBN  610).  Mr.  Collins  completed  his  qualification  to
serve as engineering officer on nuclear powered submarines in May 1980. After leav-
ing  the  Navy,  Mr.  Collins  worked  in  the  commercial  nuclear  industry  as  a  startup
engineer with General Electric from 1983 to 1987, receiving certification as a Senior
Reactor Operator.

Mr. Collins joined NRC Region I in 1987 as a resident inspector at Oyster Creek,
where  he  later  became  the  Senior  Resident  Inspector.  In  1991,  Mr.  Collins  trans-
ferred  to  NRC  Region  IV  as  a  Senior  Project  Engineer.  In  Region  IV,  he  subse-
quently  held  positions  as  Inspection  Team  Leader,  Senior  Reactor  Analyst,  Reactor
Projects  Branch  Chief,  and  Nuclear  Materials  Branch  Chief.  Mr.  Collins  was  ap-
pointed to Senior Executive Service in May 2000 as the Deputy Director for the Di-
vision  of  Reactor  Projects.  In  February  2003,  Mr.  Collins  was  assigned  the  position
of  Director,  Division  of  Nuclear  Materials  Safety  in  Region  IV.  In  July  2004,  Mr.
Collins  was  re-assigned  to  NRC  Headquarters  Office  of  Nuclear  Materials  Safety
and  Safeguards  (NMSS)  in  Rockville,  MD.  as  the  Deputy  Division  Director  for  the
licensing  and  inspection  of  the  high-level  radioactive  waste  repository  at  Yucca
Mountain. In October 2006, Mr. Collins was assigned to the Office of Nuclear Reac-
tor  Regulation  (NRR)  as  the  Director,  Division  of  Inspection  and  Region  Support.
During  his  career,  Mr.  Collins  has  been  involved  in  inspection  and  oversight  of
nuclear  power  plants,  licensing  and  oversight  of  users  of  radioactive  materials,  and
licensing of the high-level radioactive waste repository. In NRR, Mr. Collins was re-
sponsible  for  the  operating  reactor  inspection  and  assessment,  operator  licensing,
and  operating  experience  programs.  Mr.  Collins  has  participated  with  the  Inter-
national Atomic Energy Agency Teams evaluating the performance of nuclear regu-
latory  programs  and  assessment  of  nuclear  plant  operational  safety  performance  in
other countries.

Chairman WU. Thank you very much, Dr. Miller.
Dr. Collins, please proceed.
Dr.  MILLER.  Mr.  Chairman,  Dr.  Collins  is  with  me  today  to  an-
swer  any  questions  that  the  Committee  had  but  our  testimony  at
this time is complete, our oral statement.

Chairman WU. Okay. Thank you, Dr. Miller. Dr. Collins, you are

temporarily spared until the Q and A period.

Dr. Rogers, please proceed.

STATEMENT OF DR. KENNETH C. ROGERS, FORMER

COMMISSIONER, U.S. NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION
Dr. ROGERS. Chairman Wu, Ranking Member Gingrey, and Mem-
bers, because you have already heard a great deal about this, I am
going  to  confine  my  presentation  to  general  findings  and  rec-
ommendations.  And  they  are  preliminary.  They  are  based  on  one
day there and a review of materials that was supplied to us at that
time and since then.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

There  is  no  uniform  system  supported  at  all  levels  of  manage-
ment  to  nurture  and  support  a  culture  of  safety  awareness  as  a
high  priority  in  every  NIST–Boulder  activity.  Policies  and  per-
sonnel  exist  at  NIST  that  might  have  prevented  this  particular
mishap,  for  example,  the  NIST  administrative  manual,  the  NIST
laboratory safety manual, the Safety, Health, and Environment Di-
vision,  the  Division  Safety  Representatives,  and  the  Ionizing  Radi-
ation Safety Committee.

However,  safety  procedures  have  not  been  consistently  under-
stood,  applied,  and  enforced  at  both  Gaithersburg  and  Boulder.
Some parts of the organization appear to have regarded safety for-
malities as interfering with creativity and safety activities as some-
what unwelcome competitors for scarce resources.

The Boulder Safety Organization, particularly its training activi-
ties,  has  been  minimally  supported  and  has  had  to  function  with
inadequate  technical  and  human  resources.  However,  there  has
been some improvement in the last year or so.

There  were  numerous  instances  in  the  evolution  of  this  incident
in  which  important  information  should  have  been,  but  was  not,
communicated  up  one  level  or  down  one  level  or  horizontally.  Peo-
ple  failed  to  ask  essential  questions.  They  made  incorrect  assump-
tions and acted upon them.

Several persons we interviewed felt uncertain as to how the safe-
ty organizations were supposed to work and one described the safe-
ty  culture  at  NIST  as  dysfunctional.  The  NIST–Boulder  Organiza-
tion  has  not  met  a  central  leadership  challenge  to  successfully
blend and maintain the enthusiasm of a collection of very talented
people  for  cutting-edge  research,  with  a  deep  respect  for  personal
and community safety.

My preliminary recommendations are as follows: NIST must pro-
ceed apace with the decontamination, and if necessary, the decom-
missioning  of  all  laboratory  areas  affected  by  the  spill,  employing
experienced, well-regarded professionals.

Consistent, open, and clear lines of communication providing up-
to-date, factual information about the incident must be created and
maintained to the NIST–Boulder staff and to all interested govern-
ment and concerned public interest entities.

A  comprehensive  root  causes  and  lessons  learned  analysis  must
begin  immediately  and  involve  experienced,  recognized  experts  in
such analyses from outside of NIST.

Use  of  radioactive  material  at  Boulder  should  only  take  place  in
laboratories  specifically  qualified  for  such  purposes  in  accordance
with well-established standards and requirements. Room 1–2124 in
which the spill occurred did not meet those standards.

A  new  cost  benefits  analysis  should  be  carried  out  that  includes
continuing conducting the research for the detector program requir-
ing plutonium or other special nuclear material at laboratories well
qualified to work with such materials.

The  use  of  the  plutonium  sources,  CRM  133,  138–1,  and  138–2,
that are on site, should not resume in any research at NIST–Boul-
der, and alternative, safer sealed sources must be used in any fur-
ther work at Boulder.

Resumption  of  the  research  project  should  only  occur  after  all
staff connected with it are thoroughly trained and qualified for the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

safe  use  of  any  radioactive  or  non-radiological  material  or  equip-
ment to be used in their work.

The  Radiation  Safety  Officer  should  be  required  to  routinely
check  on  staff  compliance  with  the  Safety  Procedure  Hazard  Anal-
ysis  Considerations  that  he  lists  in  form  364  as  well  as  the  prac-
tices planned and occurring in the relevant laboratories.

A  systematic  study  of  all  potential  and  actual  hazards  at  NIST
should  be  carried  out  across  the  board  as  soon  as  possible.  On  the
basis of that analysis, a safe practices protocol should be developed
for the guidance of all users of materials and equipment.

The  NIST  staff  training  policies  and  practices  should  be  thor-
oughly reviewed and modified to correct deficiencies. Staff must un-
derstand  the  hazards  and  their  potential  consequences  of  every
new  activity  as  well  as  ongoing  projects  and  become  familiar  with
staff, with NIST administrative procedures as well as the safety re-
quirements related to their work.

All  managers  should  be  held  accountable  for  promoting  a  safety
culture  within  their  purviews,  and  management  performance  re-
views  should  include  a  consideration  of  how  effective  they  have
been in that regard.

The functionality of the line management relationships at NIST–
Boulder  to  NIST–Gaithersburg  should  be  examined  as  a  possible
contributor  to  this  unfortunate  event.  The  study  could  take  place
in  parallel  with  the  root  causes  analysis.  Lines  of  communication
and authority clearly broke down.

Equally  important  is  an  examination  of  the  functionality  of  the
relationships  between  the  Boulder  Safety  Organization  and  the
other Groups, Divisions, and Projects at Boulder and Gaithersburg.
A clear understanding of how those relationships are envisioned by
NIST’s  top-level  management  has  not  been  successfully  commu-
nicated  to  staff  at  Boulder  and  is  a  serious  weakness  that  should
be corrected.

Thank you very much. I am happy to take on any questions.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Rogers follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KENNETH C. ROGERS

Chairman Wu and Members:

Before  joining  the  U.S.  Nuclear  Regulatory  Commission  in  1987  as  a  Commis-
sioner, I spent thirty years in the academic world as a Physics professor and as the
President of an Institute of Technology.

During  my  ten  years  as  a  Commissioner,  I  had  numerous  occasions  to  visit  the
NIST Center for Neutron Research. After leaving the NRC, I have served, on a pro
bono  basis,  on  several  review  committees  for  the  Center.  I  am  quite  familiar  with
the activities and modes of operation of the Gaithersburg Center, but until recently,
I never had any occasion to visit or learn about the work at the Boulder laboratory.
Sometime  during  the  week  of  June  9,  2008  I  received  a  call  from  Patrick  Galla-
gher,  the  Chair  of  the  NIST  Ionizing  Radiation  Safety  Committee,  in  which  he
asked  me  to  serve  with  a  small  group  of  external  experts  to  look  into  the  cir-
cumstances  of  the  June  9  Plutonium  spill  at  the  NIST–Boulder  Laboratory  and  to
provide  comments  and  recommendations  for  avoiding  such  an  event  in  the  future.
I agreed to do so as did four other independent experts in nuclear safety. The charge
to the group was to: identify the causes of the incident and any contributing factors;
evaluate  the  NIST  response;  evaluate  the  report  on  the  incident  that  will  be  pro-
duced  by  NIST;  and  provide  to  the  Deputy  Director  of  NIST  by  June  30  our  indi-
vidual  recommendations  for  corrective  actions  to  avoid  future  incidents  and  to  im-
prove NIST safety performance and incident response.

We all worked from the same documents and testimonies, but we were asked not

to attempt to produce a consensus report.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

On  June  23  and  24  in  Boulder  we  met  as  a  group  with  ten  different  people  for
approximately one hour each, and were given copies of electronic mail exchanges as
well as copies of any documents we requested. There was a high degree of openness
and cooperation in our interactions with the NIST Staff.

I have given the Committee a copy of my report.
Because  the  Committee  has  already  heard  this  morning  about  the  incident  itself

I will confine my presentation to general findings and recommendations.

Preliminary Findings

There  is  no  uniform  system,  supported  at  all  levels  of  management,  to  nurture
and support a culture of safety awareness as a high priority in every NIST–Boulder
activity.

Policies  and  personnel  exist  at  NIST  that  might  have  prevented  this  particular
mishap: for example, the NIST Administrative Manual, the NIST Laboratory Safety
Manual,  the  Safety  Health  and  Environment  Division,  the  Division  Safety  Rep-
resentatives,  and  the  Ionizing  Radiation  Safety  Committee.  However,  safety  proce-
dures have not been consistently understood, applied and enforced at both Gaithers-
burg  and  Boulder.  Some  parts  of  the  organization  appear  to  have  regarded  safety
formalities  as  interfering  with  creativity  and  safety  activities  as  somewhat  unwel-
come competitors for scarce resources.

The  Boulder  Safety  Organization,  particularly  its  training  activities,  has  been
minimally supported and has had to function with inadequate technical and human
resources. However, there has been some improvement in the last year or so.

There  were  numerous  instances  in  the  evolution  of  this  incident  in  which  impor-
tant information should have been, but was not, communicated up one level or down
one level or horizontally. People failed to ask essential questions. They made incor-
rect assumptions and acted upon them.

Several  persons  we  interviewed  felt  uncertain  as  to  how  the  safety  organizations
were  supposed  to  work,  and  one  described  the  safety  culture  at  NIST  as  dysfunc-
tional.

The  NIST–Boulder  organization  has  not  met  a  central  leadership  challenge:  to
successfully blend and maintain the enthusiasm of a collection of very talented peo-
ple for cutting edge research with a deep respect for personal and community safety.

Preliminary Recommendations

• NIST  must  proceed  apace  with  the  decontamination  and  if  necessary  the  de-
commissioning  of  all  laboratory  areas  affected  by  the  spill,  employing  experi-
enced well-regarded professionals.

• Consistent,  open  and  clear  lines  of  communication,  providing  up  to  date  fac-
tual  information  about  the  incident,  must  be  created  and  maintained  to  the
NIST–Boulder staff and to all interested government and concerned public in-
terest entities.

• A  comprehensive  Root  Causes  and  Lessons  Learned  analysis  must  begin  im-
mediately  and  involve  experienced  recognized  experts  in  such  analyses  from
outside of NIST.
• Use of radiological material at Boulder should only take place in laboratories
specifically  qualified  for  such  purposes  in  accordance  with  well-established
standards  and  requirements.  Room  1–2124,  in  which  the  spill  occurred,  did
not meet those standards.
• A  new  Costs/Benefits  analysis  should  be  carried  out  that  includes  continuing
conducting  the  research  for  the  detector  program  requiring  Pu  or  other  SNM
at laboratories well qualified to work with such materials.
• The  use  of  the  Plutonium  sources  CRM  133,  CRM  138–1  and  CRM  138–2
should  not  resume  in  any  research  at  NIST–Boulder,  and  alternative  safer
sealed sources must be used in any further work at Boulder.
• Resumption of the research project should only occur after all staff connected
with  it  are  thoroughly  trained  and  qualified  for  the  safe  use  of  any  radio-
logical or non-radiological material or equipment to be used in their work.
• The  Radiation  Safety  Officer  should  be  required  to  routinely  check  on  staff
compliance  with  the  SAFETY  PROCEDURE/HAZARD  ANALYSIS  CONSID-
ERATIONS that he lists in Form 364 as well as on the practices planned and
occurring in the relevant laboratories.
• A systematic study of all potential and actual hazards at NIST should be car-
ried  out  across  the  board  as  soon  as  possible.  On  the  basis  of  that  analysis

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

a  safe  practices  protocol  should  be  developed  for  the  guidance  of  all  users  of
materials or equipment.

• The NIST staff training policies and practices should be thoroughly reviewed
and  modified  to  correct  deficiencies.  Staff  must  understand  the  hazards  and
their potential consequences of every new activity as well as ongoing projects
and become familiar with NIST administrative procedures as well as the safe-
ty requirements related to their work.

• All managers should be held accountable for promoting a safety culture with-
in their purviews, and manager performance reviews should include a consid-
eration of how effective they have been in that regard.

• The  functionality  of  the  line  management  relationships  at  NIST–Boulder  to
NIST–Gaithersburg  should  be  examined  as  a  possible  contributor  to  this  un-
fortunate event. This study could take place in parallel with the Root Causes
Analysis. Lines of communications and authority clearly broke down.

• Equally  important  is  an  examination  of  the  functionality  of  the  relationships
between the Boulder Safety Organization and the other Groups, Divisions and
Projects at Boulder and Gaithersburg. A clear understanding of how those re-
lationships  are  envisioned  by  NIST  top-level  management  has  not  been  suc-
cessfully  communicated  to  staff  at  Boulder  and  is  a  serious  weakness  that
should be corrected.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

BIOGRAPHY FOR KENNETH C. ROGERS

OVERVIEW

I served as a Commissioner of the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission
(NRC) for ten years. First appointed by President Reagan for a five-year term I was
reappointed  for  a  second  five-year  term  by  President  George  Bush.  Both  appoint-
ments  were  subject  to  Senate  confirmation.  In  my  capacity  as  Commissioner,  I  was
deeply  involved  in  a  wide  range  of  policy  issues  involving  science  and  technology
and public policy. I represented the NRC for nearly ten years at the National Asso-
ciation  of  Regulatory  Utility  Commissioners  and  was  a  member  of  their  Executive
Committee.  I  have  experience  in  working  with  international  organizations  in  nu-
clear safety matters; have met with legislators of several foreign countries to assist
them in formulating national policies on nuclear safety, and served on a small inter-
national  group  of  experts  to  provide  advice  for  the  long-term  to  the  Secretary-Gen-
eral  of  the  international  Organization  for  Economic  Cooperation  and  Development
(OECD).

In  total,  I  have  more  than  forty  years  experience  in  the  conduct  and  successful
management  of  scientific,  technological  and  educational  activities  related  to  tech-
nology.  I  have  had  direct  experience  in  the  oversight  of  nuclear  power  plants’  oper-
ations from the standpoint of strengthening their safety to the public. I have served
on state-wide commissions established to promote the public interest in educational
accountability  and  in  the  employment  of  technology  to  better  serve  the  needs  of  a
state. I have had broad exposure to policy questions relating to the control and use
of  science  and  technology  for  the  improvement  of  the  human  condition.  I  have  con-
stantly  worked  to  emphasize  the  necessity  of  including  humanistic  aspects  in  the
application of technology and have been and continue to be deeply interested in the
professional  education  of  engineers  and  scientists  so  as  to  heighten  their  concerns
in this regard.
DATE OF BIRTH: March 21, 1929
PLACE OF BIRTH: Teaneck, New Jersey, USA

EDUCATION:
Columbia University, NY, NY; 1952–1956, Ph.D. (physics), date of degree: 1956
Columbia University, NY, NY; 1950–1952, M.A. (physics), date of degree: 1952
St.  Lawrence  University,  Canton,  NY;  1946–1950,  B.S.  (physics),  date  of  degree:

1950

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

EMPLOYMENT
Government
2002–2006—Member,  National  Research  Council  Board  on  Assessment  of  the  Na-
tional  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology  (NIST)  Programs  Sub-panel  for
the NIST Center for Neutron Research

2001–2004—Chairman, Screening Panels for new members of the Advisory Commit-
tees  on  Reactor  Safety  and  Nuclear  Waste,  U.S.  Nuclear  Regulatory  Commis-
sion

2001—Member,  External  Audit  Panel  of  Energy  Research  Activities  at  the  Paul

Scherrer Institute, Villigen, Switzerland

2000–2001—Chairman, Expert Advisory Group to the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Com-

mission on The Role and Future Directions for Nuclear Regulatory Research

2000–2002—Reviewer of Proposals to the U.S. Department of Energy in nuclear en-
ergy programs: Innovations in Nuclear Infrastructure and Education (INIE) and
Nuclear Energy Research Initiative (NERI)

1999–2000—Member,  Blue  Ribbon  Advisory  Panel  to  the  Department  of  Energy  to
Analyze  the  Future  of  University  Nuclear  Engineering  and  Research  Reactors
1997–1998—The U.S. Member of an international High Level Advisory Group to the
Secretary-General  of  the  Organization  for  Economic  Cooperation  and  Develop-
ment  (OECD)  on  the  Future  Role  of  the  OECD  Nuclear  Energy  Agency,  Paris,
France

1987–1997—Commissioner,  U.S.  Nuclear  Regulatory  Commission,  Washington,  DC

Academic
1999–2002—Member of the Board of Visitors, A. James Clark School of Engineering,

University of Maryland

1971–1987—President and Chief Executive Officer, Stevens Institute of Technology,

Hoboken, NJ

1971—Provost & Dean of Faculty, Chief Academic Officer, Stevens Institute of Tech-

nology, Hoboken, NJ

1998–1971—Head,  Department  of  Physics,  Stevens  Institute  of  Technology,  Hobo-

ken, NJ

1967–1968—Visiting Research Scientist, Princeton University, Plasma Physics Lab-

oratory, Princeton, NJ

1957–1967—Faculty  Member,  Teaching  &  Directing  Research  Teams  in  Plasma

&Particle Physics, Stevens Institute of Technology, Hoboken, NJ

1955–1957—Research Scientist, Cornell University, Newman Laboratory of Nuclear

Physics, Ithaca, NY

Industry
2002–2006—AECL  Technologies  Inc.  Mississauga,  Ontario,  Canada,  Consultant  on

U.S. Licensing Matters Pertaining to New Reactor design certifications

2000—Nuclear  Energy  Institute,  Washington,  DC,  Consultant  on  Nuclear  Regu-

latory Commission Policies and Procedures

1974–1986—Public  Service  Electric  &  Gas  Co.,  Newark,  NJ,  Director  &  Sole  Direc-

tor Member of Nuclear Oversight Committee

1986–1987—Public  Service  Enterprise  Group,  Newark,  NJ,  Director  and  Chairman

of Membership Committee of the Board of Directors

1973–1987—First Jersey National Bank, Jersey City, NJ, Director
1962–1970—Vitro Laboratories, West Orange, NJ, Consultant
1960–1963—Stanford Research Institute, Menlo Park, CA, Consultant
1962–1963—Grumann  Aircraft  Engineering  Corporation,  Bethpage,  NY,  Consultant
1970–1972—Photochem Industries, Fairfield, NJ, Consultant

HONORS AND AWARDS
President Emeritus, 1987, Stevens Institute of Technology

Honorary Degrees
Doctor of Engineering, 1987, Stevens Institute of Technology
Doctor of Humane Letters, 1983, St. Lawrence University

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

Awards
Elected Fellow of the American Nuclear Society, 2001
Recipient  of  the  Institute  of  Electrical  and  Electronic  Engineers  Millennium  Award

Medal, 2000

Senior Member, Institute of Electrical & Electronics Engineers, 1989
Recipient  of  the  first  Hudson  County  (NJ)  Humanitarian  Award,  National  Con-

ference of Christians and Jews, 1985

Elected  Fellow  of  the  American  Association  for  the  Advancement  of  Science,  1983
Elected Member of the Cosmos Club, Washington, DC, 1975

PROFESSIONAL MEMBERSHIPS
American  Association  for  the  Advancement  of  Science,  Member  &  Fellow,  1968–

Present

Institute for Electrical Electronics Engineers, Senior Member, 1978–Present
American Physical Society, 1954–Present
American  Nuclear  Society  (ANS),  Fellow,  1988–Present.  Vice  Chairman  Public  Pol-
icy  Committee  and  of  the  Local  Sections  Committee,  2002–Present.  Chairman
Washington, DC Local ANS Section, 1999–2000

Honorary  Chairman,  PSA  ’99  (International  Conference  on  Probabilistic  Safety  As-

sessment)

Assistant  Chairman,  Year  2000  Joint  American  Nuclear  Society-European  Nuclear

Society International Conference, Washington DC, November 2000

The  Food  Safeguards  Council  (Treatment  of  Foods  by  Ionizing  Radiation),  Board  of

Advisors, 1998–Present

National  Association  of  Regulatory  Utility  Commissioners  1989–1997,  Member  of

the Executive Committee

Sigma Xi (Honorary Research Society), 1954–Present
Sigma Pi Sigma (Honorary Physics Society), 1949–Present
National Science Teachers Association, 1960–1970
American Association of Physics Teachers, 1960–1970
American Association for Higher Education, 1970–1980
American Society for Engineering Education, 1970–1990
Scientists & Engineers for Secure Energy, 1977–1987
NY Academy of Sciences, 1970–1988
Newcomen Society in America, NJ Coordinator, 1975–1988

MOST RECENT PUBLICATIONS AND TALKS
The  Past  and  Future  of  University  Research  Reactors,  SCIENCE  295,  2217  (2002)
Nuclear  Power  in  a  Regulatory  Environment,  Nuclear  &  Radiological  Engineering
Graduate  Seminar  Talk,  University  of  Cincinnati/The  Ohio  State  University,
2002

PUBLICATIONS (prior to 1988)

Approximately  fifty  refereed  publications  in  Particle  Physics,  Nuclear  Instrumen-
tation, and Plasma Physics and holder of two patents on stabilized high electric cur-
rent arc discharges.

MEMBERSHIPS (prior to 1988)
Appointed
Governor’s  Commission  on  Science  &  Technology  (NJ),  Chairman,  Task  Forces  on

Telecommunications, 1983–1985

New Jersey Governor’s Commission on Science & Technology, Commissioner, 1985–

1987

New Jersey Commission on Academic Accountability in Higher Education, Commis-

sioner, 1979–1980

New Jersey Science & Technology Center, Advisory Board, 1980–1987
Regional Plan Association, Member of the New Jersey Committee, 1982–1987
Research & Development Council of New Jersey, 1980–1987

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

Ex Officio
Association of Independent Technological Universities, President (1976–1978), 1972–

1987

Independent College Fund of New Jersey, Trustee, 1972–1987
Associated Colleges & Universities of New Jersey, Trustee, 1973–1982
Hudson County Community College Consortium, Trustee, 1972–1976
New Jersey State Chamber of Commerce, Director, 1976–1987
Christ Hospital Foundation, Jersey City, NJ, Trustee 1980–1986
Christ Hospital Foundation, Jersey City, NJ, Vice Chairman, 1980–1986
Hoboken Chamber Orchestra, Hoboken, NJ, Trustee, 1985–1987
Royal Society of Arts (London), 1970–1990
The University Club (of NY), 1972–1987

Other
Cosmos Club, 1975–Present
American Association of University Professors, 1958–1972
American Civil Liberties Union, 1970–1980, 2000–Present
Phi Sigma Kappa, Social Fraternity 1947–Present

DISCUSSION

Chairman WU. Thank you very much, Dr. Rogers.
It is traditional at this point for the Chairman to recognize him-
self  for  the  first  five  minutes  of  questioning.  I  do  so,  and  I  now
yield my time to Mr. Udall, the gentleman who represents the Con-
gressional  District  directly  affected  by  this  spill.  He  is  a  Member
of  the  Full  Science  and  Technology  Committee  and  Chair  of  the
Space Subcommittee.

Mr. Udall, please proceed.
Mr. UDALL. Thank you, Chairman Wu, and welcome to the panel.
I want to thank you, Chairman Wu, for holding this hearing today
on this incident that occurred in my district in Colorado. I am very
disappointed,  just  like  the  Ranking  Member  and  the  Chairman,
that  we  are  here  today.  This  incident  shouldn’t  have  occurred  in
the  first  place,  and  I  am  far  from  satisfied  with  NIST’s  response,
both  initially  and  as  the  situation  has  continued  to  develop.  The
apparent lack of an adequate emergency response plan and clearly
inadequate  protocols  for  handling  toxic  materials  are  just  a  few  or
the  first,  I  should  say,  of  many  serious  problems  that  NIST  must
resolve.

Now,  let  me  just  make  it  clear.  NIST  has  done  great  work,  and
I  am  proud  to  represent  the  labs  and  its  employees  here  in  Con-
gress. But I intend to see these problems addressed.

I  want  to  turn  my  line  of  questioning,  if  I  might,  to  Dr.  Turner.
Dr.  Turner,  the  communication  from  NIST  to  the  public  and  the
State  and  local  officials  was  inadequate.  You  didn’t  contact  the
State or county officials until I specifically asked you to a week and
a half after the incident.

And  I  would  like  to  find  out  more  about  your  communication
with  your  employees.  The  incident  occurred  on  the  afternoon  of
June  9,  but  for  some  reason  NIST  and  the  other  Department  of
Commerce  employees  were  not  informed  until  almost  24  hours
later.  That  makes  no  sense.  Why  did  it  take  so  long  to  inform  em-
ployees about the incident?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

and——

Dr.  TURNER.  Yes,  sir.  First  of  all,  let  me  say  I  fully  agree  with
you  that  our  response  was  inadequate  and  was  one  of  the  major
failures that we had. There is no question about that.

I  have  done  several  things.  One,  I  have  directed  our  head  of
Emergency  Services  to  prepare  an  emergency  notification  checklist
that would apply to Boulder. It would include things like State and
county  officials  on  it,  because  I  think  during  an  event  is  not  the
time  to  have  to  think  about,  you  know,  who  to  call,  when  to  call,
and  so  forth,  but  to  have  that  checklist  in  front  of  them  so  they
would know it right away. So we have taken that step.

Also——
Mr. UDALL. Dr. Turner, if I might, let me, I appreciate what you
are  putting  in  place,  but  if  I  could  just  continue,  and  I  would  wel-
come other additional information in that, along that line. But I am
just  curious,  why  couldn’t  you  just  have  been  frank  with  your  em-
ployees, even a simple announcement that a spill had occurred and
that  we  are  going  to  move  to  understand  what  happened  as  soon
as possible? That would have been helpful.

Do you have a plan in place if something similar occurs?
Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir. The whole incident was very slow to evolve

Mr. UDALL. If I could interrupt you one more time. What if some-
thing  happened  tomorrow?  Do  you  have  a  plan  in  place?  A  yes  or
no answer would be sufficient.

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir. We have certainly streamlined our commu-
nications.  I  have  made,  I  have  directed  that  changes  be  made  in
our  emergency  communications  process  so  that  senior  managers
like myself are immediately made aware of situations as they occur
that warrant our attention.

Mr.  UDALL.  The  reason  I  ask  is  that  I  have  heard  from  a  lot  of
constituents in Boulder and those who work at NIST that they are
not confident that you have fixed all these communication and safe-
ty  problems.  And  after  I  hear  Chairman  Wu  mention  the  serious
laser  incident  that  occurred  in  Gaithersburg  in  December,  I  would
have  thought  that  that  would  have  made  you  as  the  head  of  the
agency  aware  that  critical  safety  protocols  were  not  being  followed
at the NIST laboratory complex.

And  on  that  note  I  would  like  to  request  that  you  provide  all  e-
mails between Boulder and Gaithersburg relating to how and when
employees,  the  press,  and  local  and  State  government  will  be  noti-
fied and what needed to be clarified as you said.

Dr. TURNER. Well, sir, let me answer your question in two parts.
First of all, one of the ways that we can assure ourselves of wheth-
er we have fixed the problem or not, is to do exercises. And so that
is one of the things that we will plan to do, and I will play in those
exercises to make sure that, you know, I am aware of what is going
on and what is happening.

Mr.  UDALL.  That  is  a  yes?  You  are  saying  a  yes  that  you  are

going to put that all in place and——

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir. Absolutely. Because, again, I think, as with

anything else, the plans are only as good as the execution.

Mr. UDALL. Certainly.
Dr. TURNER. And if our execution is flawed, you know, we should
find that, and if there are flaws in the execution or lessons learned,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

doing an exercise is the venue where you can find those things out
before you, in fact, are in an actual situation.

Mr. UDALL. Let me move to another line of questioning. I see my

time is going to expire fairly soon.

I  would  like  to  know  what  you  and  the  rest  of  the  leadership  at
NIST plan to do to restore the trust of the employees given, in par-
ticular, that I have, since I have learned that NIST is already plan-
ning  to  terminate  certain  individuals  in  response  to  the  incident?
Now,  the  investigation  isn’t  even  complete,  yet  it  seems  like  you
are beginning to assign blame. Do you plan to make any personnel
changes before the analysis is complete?

Dr. TURNER. Sir, let me first of all, if I could give a fairly detailed

Mr.  UDALL.  I  know  my  time  is  running  out,  so  maybe  a  yes  or

answer to your question.

no would be——

Dr.  TURNER.  Well,  first  of  all,  there  will  be  no  personnel  actions
against  anyone  until  I  have  had  an  opportunity  to  make  sure  that
whatever—that the process is fair and consistent.

Mr. UDALL. That is what I wanted to hear. Thank you.
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for yielding.
Chairman  WU.  I  thank  the  gentleman  and  now  the  Ranking

Member, Dr. Gingrey.

Mr. GINGREY. Mr. Chairman, thank you.
Dr.  Miller,  let  me  go  back  to  your  testimony  if  I  can.  You,  I
think, said that, I think I heard you say that the NRC, the Nuclear
Regulatory  Commission,  has  inspections  about  every  five  years  or
on a five-year basis.

First of all, I want to know if that is accurate, and when the last
inspection  of  NIST–Boulder  occurred,  and  were  there  any  defi-
ciencies  found  at  that  particular  time,  and  if  so,  was  a  corrective
action plan submitted to NIST–Boulder?

Dr.  MILLER.  Thank  you,  Congressman.  I  guess  I  would  start  to
answer your question in that the five-year inspection frequency, we
have  a  graded  approach  to  our  inspection  frequency  based  upon
the—what we consider to be the safety and the risk aspects of any
licensee using materials. And that ranges from: we have inspectors
at  certain  facilities,  they  are  on  site  every  day,  to  a  five-year  fre-
quency.  The  quantities  and  material  that  NIST  was  authorized  to
use  were  considered  of  low  safety  risk,  so  the  inspection  frequency
was five years.

The  license  by  which  they  were  given  an  amendment  to  get  the
plutonium was only within the last couple years, and so the inspec-
tion  frequency  hasn’t  triggered  to  actually  go  out  there  yet.  How-
ever, before that NIST had a license with the NRC for doing small
amounts  of  work  that  would  not  have  required  us  to  actually  do
anything other than a telephone type of inspection activity.

So  they,  when  they  changed  their  license,  it  triggered  the  five-
year frequency. So the NRC actually hadn’t been to the Boulder fa-
cility for a large number of years, I think going back to some time
in the 1990s.

Mr. GINGREY. In the light of—in light of this incident, would you,
any  of  you  agree  that  possibly  even  with  this  minimal  licensee  in
regard to the amount of nuclear material that they would be work-
ing with, obviously they don’t have an active reactor on-site——

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

Dr. MILLER. Right.
Mr.  GINGREY.—and  I  can  understand  that  you,  your  explanation
of  that,  but  would  any  of  you  think  that  maybe  every  five  years
was not sufficient? I want you to answer that question.

And  then  let  me  ask  one  last,  which  I  think  is  particularly  im-
portant in light of what my colleague from Colorado was saying in
regard  to  the  timeliness  of  the  response  of  NIST–Boulder  and  its
Acting  Director,  you  knew  about,  I  think  I  heard  you  testify  that
you were aware of this spill on June the 9th, and that an inspector
was actually sent on June the 12th. This is an occurrence on Mon-
day, going to the site to inspect on Thursday. If I am right on that
timeline, that seems a little bit slack, if I may say so. Can you ex-
plain that for me as well?

Dr.  MILLER.  I  will  start,  and  I  will  let  Dr.  Collins,  who  was  di-
rectly involved in dispatching the inspector augment, the reporting
requirements  for  an  event  of  this  type  would  require  that  it  be  re-
ported  to  the  NRC  within  24  hours,  and  this  met  that  obligation.
So I believe that it was on June 10 that we actually learned about
it.

And Dr. Collins can tell you the deliberation that he took in dis-

patching an inspector to the site.

Mr.  GINGREY.  Well,  yes.  You  are  saying  that  NIST  met  the  24-

hour reporting requirement.

Dr. MILLER. Right.
Mr. GINGREY. Now, what is the requirement for you to physically
respond  to  an  incident,  have  somebody  on  site?  Is  it  more  than  24
hours?

Dr.  MILLER.  It  depends  on  the  incident,  and  it  depends  on  the
travel  arrangements,  depending  upon  what  we  determine  we  need
with regard to the response.

Mr.  GINGREY.  Well,  I  would  think  travel  arrangements,  you

know, I can get a flight any time——

Dr. MILLER. Right.
Mr.  GINGREY.—day  or  night.  I  might  have  to  wait  awhile,  and

you guys probably can attest about——

Dr. MILLER. Dr. Collins can tell you his deliberative process.
Mr. GINGREY.—transportation than I do.
Dr.  MILLER.  Right.  He  can  tell  you  his  deliberative  process  and

how he chose to respond.

Dr.  COLLINS.  After  we  received  notification  of  the  incident  from
NIST  on  June  10,  we  based  our,  I  mean,  we  knew  we  needed  to
send  in  an  inspector,  that  we  needed  some  on-site  confirmation  of
the  circumstances.  We  based  that  at  the  time,  and  that  is  all  we
have  is  the  description  of  the  event  and  the  extent  and  the  exist-
ence  of  any  immediately  safety  issues  associated  with  that  event.
We  would  not  wait  to  get  an  inspector  on-site  to  make  sure  imme-
diate  safety  issues  are  addressed  had  they  been  described  to  us
that day.

The  description  we  got  was  that  the  rooms  were  isolated,  that
people  had  been  identified,  and  that  NIST  had  initiated  actions  to
ensure  that  the  radiation  doses  or  potential  radiation  doses  for
those people were determined.

So that became the basis for our timeline.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

Mr. GINGREY. My time is about expired, Dr. Collins, but I would
say  that  since  you  extended  or  NRC  extended  this  license  to  NIST
to be able to handle this low-level amount of plutonium, there had
not  been  a  periodic  inspection  to  make  sure  that  they  were  doing
the  job  right,  that  they  were  adequately  trained  and  following  all
the  protocol,  guidelines  whatsoever.  And  so  what  they  told  you  I
don’t  think  you,  I  would  be  reluctant  to  rely  on  that,  having  no
track record in regard to their prior performance.

So  I  am  just  going  to  close  by  saying,  you  don’t  have  to  respond
but maybe later you can, that maybe your response wasn’t quite as
timely as it should have been.

Chairman WU. I thank the gentleman.
The  gentlelady  from  California,  Ms.  Richardson,  recognized  for

five minutes.

Ms. RICHARDSON. Yes. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
First  of  all,  let  me  start  off  with  my  question  to  Dr.  Turner.  I

am sorry. Dr. Turner. How long have you been Acting Director?

Dr. TURNER. I have been Acting Director since around Labor Day

of 2007.

Ms. RICHARDSON. Okay. And do you agree with the recommenda-

tions of Mr. Rogers, Dr. Rogers?

Dr.  TURNER.  Yes,  ma’am,  I  do.  I  am  in  substantial  agreement
with  him.  I  certainly  would  like  to,  I  would  welcome  the  oppor-
tunity to discuss it with him further just to make sure that we both
have  a  similar  understanding,  but  I  have  no,  I  see  nothing  in  his
report that I would disagree with.

Ms.  RICHARDSON.  Do  you  have  the  adequate  funding  to  meet

those recommendations?

Dr. TURNER. We will provide the funding, because safety is going
to be a priority for us, and that is one of the reasons why we moved
the  Safety  Office  into  the  Office  to  report  to  the  Director  so  that
we could make sure that they had the resources they needed.

Ms.  RICHARDSON.  Who  oversees  the  safety  personnel?  How  does
the recent reductions in funding for the Safety Division affect their
duties?  And  at  the  time  when  NIST’s  funding  has  been  increased
significantly,  why  hasn’t  NIST  devoted  more  resources  to  environ-
mental, health, and safety?

Dr.  TURNER.  Well,  the  resources  that  they,  they  basically  have
the same situation that all the rest of our labs were in. We received
a modest increase in fiscal year 2008, which did not cover the sala-
ries  and  raises  for  all  our  employees,  and  so  that  covered—all  our
employees  received  the  raises  that  they  were  entitled  to,  but  we
had to take some of that out of the base programs.

But,  again,  I  would  like  to  emphasize,  though,  that  one  of  the
reasons why I moved the Safety Division to report now into the Di-
rector’s  office  is  to  assure  that,  one,  we  are  aware  of  what  their
needs are, two, they are properly prioritized, and three, again, they
have the adequate resources that they need.

Ms. RICHARDSON. Are all your labs the same?
Dr. TURNER. I am not sure if I——
Ms.  RICHARDSON.  In  terms  of  the  work  that  is  done.  Are  all  of

your labs the same?

Dr. TURNER. No. Our labs are quite different and diverse.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

Ms.  RICHARDSON.  Well,  then,  will  you  be  evaluating  the  dif-
ference in terms of—you said that, first of all, you said they all got
basically the same amount of money, and so if they are not all the
same,  and  if  they  are  all  doing  different  duties,  shouldn’t  it  be
somewhat different?

Dr. TURNER. No. What I meant, what I intended there was, that
the  amount  of  increase  that  we  received  in—we  needed  about  $13
million  in  fiscal  year  2008  to  cover  the  increase  in  salaries  and
wages.  We  got  about  $6.5  million.  And  so  everyone  took  some  of
that out of their base and so that——

Ms.  RICHARDSON.  I  am  not  talking  about  the  nuts  and  bolts  of
if  a  person  received  a  two  percent  increase.  I  am  talking  about  if
a lab has a difference in terms of its responsibility which has been
discussed now in this committee, and so if now you are doing work
that  you  weren’t  doing  before,  have  there  been  changes  done  in
terms  of  your  safety  personnel  for  those  labs  appropriately  is  the
question.

Dr. TURNER. Well, first of all, we wanted to impress on all of our
laboratories  that  the  responsibility  of  safety,  for  safety  starts  with
line  management  and  that  they  are  responsible  for  that.  Each  lab
has a Division Safety Representative.

Ms.  RICHARDSON.  Dr.  Turner,  I  apologize.  I  don’t  know  if  this  is
the  first  time  you  testified,  but  as  Members  we  only  get  five  min-
utes to ask questions.

Dr. TURNER. I am sorry.
Ms. RICHARDSON. So my question is very specific to you. I under-
stand  safety  is  important.  I  understand  it  all  goes  to  line  manage-
ment.  I  get  all  that.  However,  I  just  asked  you  the  question,  are
all  the  labs  the  same?  You  said,  no.  If  the  labs  are  different  and
if  they  have  different  levels  of  responsibility  and  danger,  my  ques-
tion to you is has that now been met at this particular lab and any
other  labs  that  might  have  a  unique  situation?  And  have  you  ap-
propriated the appropriate funds to do so? That is my question.

Dr. TURNER. Yes, ma’am, we have. We have done a hazards anal-

ysis, and that has been done.

Ms. RICHARDSON. Okay.
Dr. TURNER. I apologize for that.
Ms.  RICHARDSON.  I  understand.  I  understand.  When  did  you

learn of the incident?

Dr. TURNER. I learned the morning of June 10.
Ms.  RICHARDSON.  Okay.  What  process  do  you  have  in  place  to

rectify that?

Dr.  TURNER.  I  directed  that  some  changes  be  made  in  our  emer-
gency  response  capability  for  communication,  that  our  24-hour,
seven  days  a  week  Emergency  Services  Office  in  Gaithersburg,  if
they  received  a  call  that  should  have  been  forwarded  to  me,  there
would be a mechanism set up for the office to patch them through.
Ms. RICHARDSON. Are you now going to be notified immediately?
Dr. TURNER. Yes, ma’am, I am.
Ms. RICHARDSON. Okay.
Dr.  TURNER.  And  the  important  thing  is  that  there  is  one  num-

ber that anyone needs to remember.

Ms.  RICHARDSON.  Okay.  My  last  question  is  to  Dr.  Rogers,  and
I think I have got about 15 seconds. You had an opportunity to go

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

Chairman.

to this location, do an evaluation. How often would you recommend
that  inspections  should  incur  so  that  that  way  we  don’t  have  this
same situation again.

Dr.  ROGERS.  Well,  I  don’t  know  how  often.  Regularly-scheduled
inspections  should  occur,  but  it  does  seem  to  me  that  the  license
changes,  the  changes  in  the  NRC  license  should  have  triggered  an
inspection.

Ms. RICHARDSON. Immediately or within——
Dr.  ROGERS.  Yes.  With  the  introduction  of  special  nuclear  mate-
rial  and  plutonium  sources  on-site,  even  though  they  were  small
quantities,  even  though  they  were  in  encapsulated  form,  and  en-
capsulated is not a well-defined, technical term, it seems to me that
there  should  have  been  a  question  about,  well,  now,  this  is  some-
thing  new.  This  is  really  a  totally  different  situation  from  what
they were dealing with before in my opinion.

The  introduction  of  plutonium  was  totally  new,  and  the  type  of
source  that  they  were  going  to  use  was  totally  new,  and  in  my
opinion  NRC  should  have  paid  more  attention  to  any  possible
changes  that  were  taking  place  in  the  laboratory  and  how  those
materials were going to be used.

Ms. RICHARDSON. Thank you, sir, and I appreciate your time, Mr.

Chairman WU. I thank the gentlelady.
The gentleman from Nebraska, Mr. Smith, five minutes.
Mr.  SMITH.  Thank  you.  Dr.  Rogers,  several  of  your  colleagues
who  provided  independent  reviews  to  Dr.  Turner  singled  out  the
Radiation  Safety  Officer  for  responding  commendably  given  the
scope of the incident and the shortage of resources. How would you
characterize  the  containment  and  cleanup  effort  by  Boulder  safety
personnel?

Dr.  ROGERS.  Well,  first,  let  me  say  that  my  expertise  really  lies
in  the  general  management  of  nuclear  safety  of  organizations.  I
have  a  technical  background,  and  I  know  something  about  these
matters,  but  I  would  say  that  I  would  have  to  really  rely  on  my
expert—the  expertise  of  my  colleagues  on  whether  the  specific  ac-
tions,  one-by-one,  day-by-day,  minute-by-minute,  were  the  best  or
were appropriate. It seems to me that they were a little slow, they
were a little confused, but they did get back on track and proceeded
in  a  reasonable  way  once  that  took  place.  But  it  did  take  a  day  or
two.

Mr.  SMITH.  Okay.  Thank  you.  In  your  testimony  you,  I  wasn’t
sure  whether  it  was  your  own  words  or  words  of  others  that  you
said  the  safety  culture  at  NIST  is  dysfunctional.  Were  those,  was
that your characterization?

Dr.  ROGERS.  That  was  a  quotation.  That  was  not  my  own  anal-
ysis  necessarily,  but  it  was  a  quotation  of  one  of  the  people  in-
volved with safety at NIST.

Mr. SMITH. Involved in safety at NIST and admitted to his or her

own dysfunction in relation to that?

Dr.  ROGERS.  That  this,  that  in  other  words—I  think  the  state-
ment  has  to  be  interpreted  in  this  way,  that  there  were  pockets  of
very, very fine attention to safety at NIST, and there were pockets
of—where  it  was  just  the  opposite,  that  the  safety  organizational
people  had  difficulty  getting  the  attention  of  some  of  the  middle-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

level managers with regard to safety issues with others they found
very excellent cooperation.

So  I  think  the  judgment  of  dysfunctional  is  perhaps  to  be  inter-

preted as not uniformly good.

Mr.  SMITH.  But  the  individual  did  try  to  raise  the  issue  prior  to

the incident?

Dr.  ROGERS.  I  don’t  know  about  that.  That  was,  that  came  out
in our interviews with people. I don’t know to what extent. I think
there was a level of frustration.

Mr. SMITH. I mean, if it was self-identified and nothing was done

about it, that would seem——

Dr.  ROGERS.  Well,  I  have  to,  Congressman,  all  I  can  say  is  that
I  did  not  have  an  opportunity  to  spend  enough  time  to  pursue  it
in  any  depth  but  really  took  it  to  be  a  signal  that  a  hard  look  has
to  be  taken  at  safety  organization  and  how  it  is  responded  to  by
the researchers at NIST.

Mr.  SMITH.  But  the  comment  was  made  that  it  was  dysfunc-

tional, and you chose not to look into it further?

Dr.  ROGERS.  Well,  I  didn’t  make  any  choice  on  this  one  way  or
the  other.  We  spent  as  much  time  as  we  had  to  and  available  to
us, and we interviewed ten individuals that day, each for an hour.
This was something that came out in one of the interviews.

Mr. SMITH. More anecdotal in nature?
Dr. ROGERS. Yes.
Mr. SMITH. Okay. Thank you.
Dr. Miller, back to my previous question. How would you charac-
terize  the  containment  and  cleanup  effort  by  Boulder  safety  per-
sonnel?

Dr.  MILLER.  Dr.  Collins  has  got  a  team  on  site.  He  can  tell  you
the  current  activities  that  are  going  on  and  how  we  characterize
that, sir.

Dr.  COLLINS.  I  think  the  highest  priority  for  the  Special  Inspec-
tion  Team  was  to  make  sure  that  NRC  had  a  good  understanding
and that the right actions were being taken to evaluate the extent
of the spread of contamination, understand what the situation was,
whether or not it was stable, understand the radiation doses which
could be associated with that.

What we have found to date is while our work is still in progress,
NIST has reasonably determined the extent of the plutonium spill.
Rooms  which  are  contaminated  have  been  isolated,  and  we  have
commitments  from  NIST  in  our  confirmatory  action  letter  to
present  to  the  NRC  a  stabilization  plan  and  decontamination  plan
for approval before those activities begin.

Mr. SMITH. Okay. Thank you. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman  WU.  I  thank  the  gentleman,  and  now  in  the  regular
order  it  is  appropriate  to  recognize  the  gentleman  from  Colorado,
Mr. Udall.

Mr.  UDALL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Again,  I  want  to  turn
back  to  Dr.  Turner,  and  Dr.  Turner,  I  was  eager  to  get  a  number
of questions in, and I didn’t, to confirm that you will provide to use
the e-mails that occurred after the incident here to the Committee.
Will you do that?

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir. Absolutely.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

Mr.  UDALL.  Thank  you.  Before  I  was  elected  to  the  Congress,  I
served  as  the  CEO  and  previous  to  that  the  COO  of  the  Colorado
Outward  Bound  School.  We  had  some  60,000  days  a  year  in  the
mountains  of  Colorado,  the  rivers,  and  in  the  canyon  country,  and
safety was bottom line, top line, it was everything.

And  you  have  to,  as  the  leader,  be  ultimately  responsible  for

what happens——

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir.
Mr. UDALL.—even if you aren’t in the field yourself, and you said
this incident is unacceptable, and I wholeheartedly agree with that.
But  what  do  you  mean?  Are  you  taking  full  responsibility  for

what happened?

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir, I am.
Mr.  UDALL.  That  is  terrific.  Specifically,  where  do  health  and
safety  standards  fit  in  your  priorities,  and  what  changes  are  we
going  to  see  from  your  office?  The  initial  reviews  I  think  clearly
point out that the incident was the result of an overall institutional
failure——

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir.
Mr.  UDALL.—to  properly  train  employees.  That  is  your  responsi-

bility.

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir.
Mr. UDALL. The NIST safety operational system is your responsi-
bility.  Have  you  read  that  document,  and  how  does  it  need  to
change to reflect the lessons learned in this incident?

Dr.  TURNER.  Sir,  I  think  there  are  gaps  that  certainly  are  evi-
dent.  There  are  some  things  in  the  operations  and  safety  manual
that  are  good,  other  things  are  gaps;  for  example,  the  fact  that
right  now  there  is  a,  people  have  up  to  30  days—I  guess  new  re-
searchers  have  up  to  30  days  before  they  need  to  get  training.  We
need  to  close  that  gap  and  make  that  appropriate.  Then  nobody
works on anything until they are appropriately trained for that.

So there are a number of things that we are going to do, but we
also want to take in and have the benefit of the evaluations of the
outside  experts.  The  Department  of  Commerce  is  also  putting  to-
gether  a  blue  ribbon  panel.  The  Inspector  General  is  also  looking
as there is feedback that we would get from the NRC. So we want
to be able to incorporate all that.

But  let  me  assure  you,  sir,  I,  first  of  all,  take  responsibility  for

this, and I am determined to fix it.

Mr.  UDALL.  I  also  appreciate  hearing  that,  number  one,  and
number two, I appreciate when Congresswoman Richardson talked
about  budgets,  that  you  made  it  clear,  I  believe  you  made  it  clear
that  even  though  your  agency  has  had  some  cutbacks,  as  have  all
federal  agencies,  that  you  are  going  to  find  the  dollars,  you  are
going to find the resources.

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir.
Mr. UDALL. Because there is no excuse to jeopardize——
Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir. Absolutely.
Mr. UDALL. How many safety officials work the Boulder labs, and

who do they report to?

Dr. TURNER. I don’t know the exact number, sir. We can certainly
get that back to you, but they report to the head of the Safety, En-
vironment, and Health Division in Gaithersburg.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

Mr.  UDALL.  Gaithersburg.  Why  don’t  they  report  to  someone  in
Boulder? That doesn’t really make sense to me as a long-time safe-
ty  officer  in  my  old,  my  last  career.  I  would  encourage  you  to  look
at  changing  that  as  NIST  learns  from  the  incident,  and  I  would
like  to  also  encourage  you  as  I  did  a  few  weeks  ago  to  respond
quickly  and  directly  to  requests  by  my  staff  and  the  Committee
staff.  We  still  haven’t  received  some  simple  things  we  have  re-
quested  like  a  timeline.  It  has  been  more  than  a  month  since  the
incident.

Dr.  TURNER.  Yes,  sir.  Let  me  just  say  that,  first  of  all,  I  apolo-
gize,  you  know,  if  we  have  been  slow  in  responding,  but  also,  I
have,  I  will  be  leaving  for  Boulder  this  evening,  and  one  of  the
things I want to do when I am there is to have a discussion about
the rules and responsibilities and reporting structure that we have
for  our  Site  Director  out  there,  because  quite  frankly,  I  think  that
was  a  contributing  cause  for  the  slowness  of  our  responses,  you
know,  the  incommensurate  responsibility  without  authority.  And
that is one of the things that we are looking to fix.

Mr. UDALL. That may go to my point about maybe having a Safe-
ty  Officer  on  the  ground  in  Boulder,  but  we  want  to  pursue  that
further as you, if you——

Dr.  TURNER.  But  let  me  just  mention,  I  apologize  for,  I  hope,  I
didn’t  mean  to  cut  you  off,  but  we  do  have  a  Safety  Office  there
in Boulder. They report to the Safety Division in Gaithersburg.

Mr.  UDALL.  Who  know  that  NIST  has  plutonium  in  the  lab  be-
fore  the  incident?  I  have  heard  that  some  people  that  work  there
didn’t know, and I am just curious why. Did employees fully under-
stand  what  they  were  dealing  with?  I  know  a  Committee  staff
member  was  there  a  few  weeks  before,  and  she  was  in  that  very
room, and she was not aware that that was what was being under-
taken,  that  research  with  plutonium  and  the  other  materials  that
were there.

Dr. TURNER. Well, the plutonium was there to do work on devel-
oping  detectors  that  weapons  inspectors  could  be  using,  and  as  I
understand it, NIST has about, in order of magnitude, better capa-
bility for those detectors than anywhere else in the country.

But clearly, it was a major failing that there was research going
on with plutonium in that laboratory, and other people doing other
business in that laboratory were not aware.

Mr.  UDALL.  Can  I  ask  that  you  will  get  us  that  information  for
the record when it is available, and we can get the exact questions
to you after the Committee hearing.

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir.
Mr.  UDALL.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  thank  you  for  the  time  and  yield

back the time I have remaining, which is no time.

Chairman WU. I thank the gentleman.
Mr. Smith.
Mr. SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Dr.  Miller  and  Dr.  Collins,  if  you  would,  either  of  you,  in  your
testimony  you  state  that  the  confirmatory  action  letters  document
mutually  agreed-upon  corrective  actions.  How  did  the  NRC  and
NIST come to an agreement on the actions taken through the July
2,  letter,  and  how  would  you  characterize  NIST’s  cooperation  with
the NRC since the event?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

Dr.  MILLER.  Dr.  Collins  will  answer  that  question  because  he
was directly responsible in issuing the confirmatory action letter to
NIST.

Dr. COLLINS. We became aware of the need for a confirmatory ac-
tion  letter.  That  is  a  mechanism  we  have  to  put  in  place  actions
and commitments immediately when we feel they are warranted to
make sure that the situation is safe and remains safe.

We  became  prompted  to  do  that  the  more  we  became  aware  of
what appeared to be broad breakdowns in the procedures and pro-
grammatic  radiation  safety  program  controls  at  NIST.  We  began
our  discussions  with  NIST  before  the  Special  Inspection  Team  ar-
rived on site, and after that team arrived on-site and began its ini-
tial work, we had continuing discussions and were able to dialogue
face  to  face  with  NIST  officials  to  obtain  their  commitments  prior
to the finalization of that letter on July 2.

Mr.  SMITH.  Okay.  Thank  you.  And  Dr.  Rogers,  other  than  safety
training  and  education,  what  else  do  you  believe  could  be  done  to
insure that guest researchers certainly fully appreciate the implica-
tions of their actions?

Dr.  ROGERS.  Well,  supervision  certainly  is  an  important  aspect
there  of  their  initial  work.  A  guest  researcher  is  someone  who
comes  with  high  credentials,  but  it  has  been  my  long  experience
that  an  excellent  technical  credential  does  not  necessarily  confer
with  it,  either  common  sense  or  detailed  knowledge  that  is  not  in-
volved with the work that is to begin.

So  that  it  seems  to  me  immediate  supervision  of  any  new  guest
researcher by experienced people at the lab would be an important
addition to training and whatever else you mentioned.

Mr.  SMITH.  Okay.  Did  you  want  to  repeat,  no,  I  am  just  joking,

what you said earlier.

And perhaps you kind of answered this partially, but would there
be  any  specific  recommendations  on  how  to  insure  that  the  sci-
entists  at  NIST  facilities  are  adequately  prepared  for  dealing  with
the radioactive sources?

Dr.  ROGERS.  Well,  there  is  a  great  deal  existing  in  the  way  of
policies,  procedures,  organizational  structures,  and  so  on  and  so
forth.  They  just  haven’t  been  used  consistently.  To  me  the  central
question is developing an attitude of safety on the part of every sin-
gle  person  in  the  place.  And  that  is  a  very  big  challenge.  It  is  not
simply  imposing  a  collection  of  new  requirements.  It  is  something
that  has  to  come  almost  automatically  when  people  start  to  work,
that  they  think  of  safety  along  with  whatever  else  they  are  doing.
And  in  this  particular  instance  it  seemed  to  me  that  elementary
questions  were  not  asked.  There  wasn’t  sort  of  a  sense  of  intellec-
tual curiosity on the part of key individuals that they would under-
stand  what  it  is  they  were  dealing  with.  Maybe  not  having  the
training  was  important,  an  important  flaw  but  also  not  having  an
inquiring  mind  to  ask,  well,  what  is  this  stuff  I  am  dealing  with?
Is it dangerous or not? It is plutonium. What is that?

And  these  are  people  with  scientific  backgrounds  that  should  sit

down and go and do a little reading before they begin working.

Mr. SMITH. Well, I have a memo here that I think would be par-
ticularly  instructive  based  on  what  is  at  stake  here,  and  I  appre-
ciate the hearing today, and I would assume that most folks would

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

understand,  especially  those  with  excellent  credentials  would  un-
derstand the implications of what has happened or what could hap-
pen.

So I appreciate that. Thank you.
Chairman  WU.  I  thank  the  gentleman.  I  understand  the

gentlelady does not have any questions at this point in time.

Then the Chair recognizes himself for five minutes.
We  are  dealing  with  a  situation  with,  about  .25  grams  of  pluto-
nium.  Dr.  Miller,  did  I  hear  you  correctly  that  the  terms  of  the  li-
cense between the NRC and the NIST, and NIST would potentially
permit NIST to ask for up to any sub-critical amount of plutonium?
Dr.  MILLER.  I  don’t  believe  that  I  said  that,  Congressman,

but——

Chairman WU. I thought I heard it.
Dr. MILLER.—the terms of the license do have specific provisions
in  them,  and  I  can  tell  you,  I  can  turn  to  the  license  and  tell  you
exactly what they are. But they are not authorized critical amounts
of material.

Chairman WU. No. I said sub-critical. I thought you said——
Dr. MILLER. But it is less——
Chairman WU.—amounts——
Dr.  MILLER.—the  terms  of  their  license  is,  there  is  a  margin  be-
tween  the  terms  of  their  license  and  what  would  be  authorized  for
criticality. It is not right up to it.

Chairman  WU.  But  potentially  it  could  be,  it  could  have  been  a

much larger amount of plutonium that was——

Dr.  MILLER.  The  terms  of  their  license  not  only  restrict  them
with  regard  to  the  total  amount  of  plutonium  they  are  authorized
to  possess  and  use,  but  there  is  restrictions  in  the  license  with  re-
gard  to  what  each  individual  source  that  is  used  can  contain.  So
they  could  not  contain  that  amount  of  plutonium  in  any  one  given
source given the terms of the license.

Chairman WU. Okay. Well——
Dr.  MILLER.  The  total  amount  of  plutonium  that  they  were  au-
thorized to possess on that license was significantly less than what
would be that critical amount.

Chairman  WU.  It  is  bad  enough  when  we  are  dealing  with  .25
grams.  I  am  concerned  about  the  terms  by  which  the  laboratories
may have multiple sources adding up to significantly more and per-
haps  our  staffs  can  get  together  to  see  precisely  what  those
amounts——

Dr. MILLER. Yes.
Chairman WU.—might add up to.
Dr.  MILLER.  Yes.  And  we  can  certainly  answer  that  information.
They  have  that  information,  and  we  can  tell  you,  you  know,  why
the terms of the license for what they were given the amounts that
they were possessing.

Chairman WU. Thank you, Dr. Miller. And you referred to a five-

year period of——
Dr. MILLER. Yes.
Chairman WU.—inspection. In either, it is either a NIST internal
rule or an NRC term of the license, I believe that there is supposed
to  be  annual  trainings  for  personnel  handling  these  materials.  Is
that correct?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

ing.

Dr. MILLER. I can, the terms of the license require annual train-

Chairman WU. Yes.
Dr.  MILLER.  The  terms  of  the  NRC  license  impose  that  require-

ment on this through the license.

Chairman  WU.  Okay.  Well,  Dr.  Turner,  Dr.  Rogers,  do  you  have
at  hand  the  last  time  that  the  personnel  involved  were  actually
trained?

Dr.  TURNER.  I  can  get  that  for  you,  sir,  but  one  of  the  things  I
wanted  to  mention  was  that  the,  all  work  with  radioactive  sources
has been stopped at NIST in Boulder.

Chairman WU. Yes. Yes.
Dr. TURNER. Until we get assured that——
Chairman WU. I understand.
Dr. TURNER.—we are meeting all the terms of the license.
Chairman  WU.  I  understand  that  you  have  taken  those  steps,
cautionary  steps  appropriately  going  forward.  I  am  looking  back
now before this incident, and it is my understanding that there was
one  training  in  2007,  and  that  prior  to  that  the  prior  training  was
in 2005, but no one has records as to the intensity, duration, or the
content of those trainings. At least that is what I have been briefed
on,  and  if  you  all  have  any  contrary  information  or  supplemental
information, I would be interested in that.

Dr.  TURNER.  I  would  be  happy  to  provide  it.  I  saw  a  list  of  the
training.  Most  of  the  training  was,  at  least  on  the  list  that  I  saw,
up to date. There were a few cases, you know, for example, the re-
searchers  involved  in  this  situation  where  the  training  had  not
taken place.

Chairman WU. So other folks were up to date, but the subject in-

dividuals were not up to date?

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir.
Chairman WU. Okay. The consequence of this management envi-
ronment, if you will, there are a couple of things that I saw in the
train  of  events  which  at  least  to  me  seem  like  it  could  have  been
prevented  by  adequate  training.  In  one  of  the  documents  prepared
by  NIST  as  a  report  to  the  NRC,  I  believe  that  post-incident  a
number of the employees decided to stay in a hallway and then one
person suggested that they take their shoes off.

It  is  commendable  to  not,  to  think  about  not  tracking  materials
around on their shoes, but net, net by taking the shoes off, you ex-
pose  socks  and  feet  to  the  materials.  The  other  one  was  washing
hands over an open drain.

Dr.  Rogers,  Dr.  Turner,  Dr.  Miller,  do  you  agree  with  me  that
those are some of the things that are prevented by adequate train-
ing and a complete program and culture of training?

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir. I totally agree and also I think the assump-
tion  of  responsibility  and  leadership  on  the  part  of  my  manage-
ment, as well as having in place a firm, aggressive, positive safety
culture.

Dr.  ROGERS.  Well,  I  quite  agree  that,  you  know,  elementary
training would have avoided some of this. Information was not con-
veyed  to  the  person  most  directly  involved  with  this  incident,  that
I  would  say  could  have  been  figured  out  by  that  individual,  but  it
was not transmitted to that individual.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

So that you had a situation where the guest researcher, who was
unfamiliar  with,  one,  the  laboratory,  general  administrative  man-
agement requirements of the lab, and two, not familiar with the de-
tails  of  the  technical  aspects  of  the  work  involving  radioactive  ma-
terials which that person was going to be engaged.

Chairman  WU.  Thank  you.  I  see  that  my  time  has  expired.  My

understanding is that Mr. Udall has a follow-up question.

Mr. UDALL. I do. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for yielding, and be-
fore  I  ask  my  question,  I  would  ask  unanimous  consent  that  a  let-
ter from the city of Boulder be entered into the record. It expresses
the city of Boulder’s concerns about the incident and what they be-
lieve should be the path forward.

Chairman WU. So ordered.
[The information follows:]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

Mr. UDALL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I  want  to  turn  to  both  Dr.  Miller  and  Dr.  Turner  and  ask  you
is  there  anything  in  the  NIST  protocols,  anything  in  NIST  proce-
dures  that  would  prevent  NIST  from  releasing  a  list  of  radioactive
and  hazardous  material  at  the  labs  to  the  city  of  Boulder  and  the
public in general?

Dr. Miller or maybe someone else here would be better prepared

to answer the question.

Dr.  MILLER.  From  the  NRC’s  perspective  traditionally  NRC’s  li-
censes  have  all  been  public  except  for  aspects  which  are  security
matters.  Following  the  events  of  9/11,  we  had  to  take  a  look  at
what  information  would  be  public  and  what  would  not  be.  And  to
some  degree  as  a  result  of  all  that  we  have  not  publicized  those
amounts.

However,  that  said,  we  certainly  at  every  turn,  the  NRC  has  al-
ways cooperated with State and local government officials to make
sure  that  they  are  fully  informed  and  have  access  to  that  informa-
tion.  Colorado  itself  is  an  NRC-agreement  state.  Because  this  is  a
federal facility, we regulate it, but we have a relationship with our
State  partners  in  the  State  of  Colorado.  We  certainly  would  be
happy to share any information with them.

But  there  is  a  certain  amount  of  what  we  are  now  doing  that  is
not  made  publicly  available  with  regard  to  these  types  of  licenses.
And, again, it goes back to national security matters, Congressman.
Mr. UDALL. What I hear you saying if there isn’t a national secu-

rity concern, and that is important, we all——

Dr. MILLER. Uh-huh.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

Mr. UDALL.—acknowledge, then there is nothing that would pre-
vent  NIST  from  releasing  the  list  of  these  radioactive  and  haz-
ardous materials? Depending on the state, depending where the ac-
tivity is occurring.

Dr.  MILLER.  Yes.  I  mean,  they  certainly,  certainly  the  local  offi-
cials  should  have  access  to  that  information.  Okay.  Because  of  a
number  of  reasons,  including  their  duties  as  it  would  relate  to
emergency response.

Mr. UDALL. Uh-huh. Dr. Turner, you care to respond?
Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir. I became aware of the letter this morning,
and I asked one of my staff in Boulder to see if they could arrange
a  meeting  between  me  and  some  of  the  city  officials  so  that  we
could discuss the content of that letter and what an appropriate re-
sponse  would  be.  And  also,  you  know,  we  have  had  so  many
missteps  because  of  lapses  in  communication,  and  I  really  wanted
to  make  sure  that  this  was  not  another  situation  where  we  had  a
misstep because of a lapse of communication. That is why I wanted
to  meet  directly  with  city  officials  to  make  sure  we  had  an  agree-
ment  on  exactly  what  was  being  requested  and  what  an  appro-
priate response would be.

Mr.  UDALL.  So  what  I  hear  you  saying  is  you  would  be  willing
to consider their request. You want to sit down and talk with them.
You  want  to  complete  your  analysis,  the  various  reviews  that  are
underway, and I would, and you will consider that.

What  I  would  add  is  we  certainly  have  a  tradition  in  the  world
of  public  policy  and  public  information,  everything  from  FOIA  to
other  protocols  of  letting  the  public  know  as  much  as  we  possibly
can about materials that could affect the safety or welfare or health
of  the  public.  And  I  think  in  the  long  run  we  all  agree  this  is,  it
is better to err on that side than——

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir.
Mr. UDALL.—to keep these materials hidden from view or lessen

the awareness that communities may have of those materials.

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir. We want to be a good, responsible neighbor

to the community that has been so good to us.

Mr.  UDALL.  Yeah.  Well,  let  me,  I  want  to  thank  the  Chairman

again for holding the hearing. Let me just end on this note.

This  is  a  very  serious  incident.  As  I  have  said  here  today,  I  am

very disappointed in the way it has been handled.

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir.
Mr.  UDALL.  And  I  have  assurances  from  you  that  you  are  going

to move with dispatch, that you are going to be——

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir.
Mr.  UDALL.—open  and  that  we  are  going  to  find  out  what  hap-
pened  and  then  we  are  going  to  put  protocols  in  place  and  even
take a look at the culture in this because——

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir.
Mr. UDALL.—that may be a part of what has to change, and NRC
personnel  who  hear  are  very  well  versed  in  that.  But  I  did  want
to  also  emphasize  the  very  important  work  that  NIST  does,  how
proud  we  are  to  have  you  in  our  community,  how  proud  we  are  to
have so many, all of the scientists and the engineers and the great
personnel there. And to underline the work you do in a whole host
of  areas  that  make  modern  life  what  it  is  and  the  important  work

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

that was being done in this situation, which is to better understand
how  to  prevent  proliferation  of  nuclear  materials,  nuclear  weap-
onry. And we want that work to go ahead. We want to understand
how we can even be better at analyzing and identifying people who
are comporting with international standards and those who aren’t.
So  that  is  why  it  is  so  important  to  get  this  figured  out  and  get
back on track, because that work has to continue.

Dr.  TURNER.  Yes,  sir.  Absolutely,  and  let  me  just  say  that  this
has  shaken  NIST  to  its  core.  As  you  are  aware,  our  employees  are
fiercely  proud,  as  am  I,  of  being  NIST  employees,  and  this  has
shaken  all  of  us.  I  have  been  personally  very  heartened  by  the  re-
sponse  of  our  Laboratory  Directors.  Also  I  met  yesterday  with  the
group that represents the researchers as well as NIST fellows, and
I  really,  I  outlined  to  them  the  importance  of  what  we  are  doing
and, you know, that we needed their help. And I was really heart-
ened by their response, that they are taking this seriously and that
they are committed, as am I, to fixing this.

Mr. UDALL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for holding this important

Chairman WU. I thank the gentleman from Colorado.
Mr. Smith.
Mr. SMITH. Yeah. I was just wondering if it would be possible for
the minority to review the letter. I don’t necessarily want to object,
but if it would be possible for the minority to review the letter and
then allow for the consent at a later time.

Chairman  WU.  Is  the  gentleman  referring  to  the  letter  from  the

city of Boulder?

hearing.

Mr. SMITH. The city of Boulder. Yes.
Chairman  WU.  I  would  be  happy  to  make  the  letter  available  to
the  gentleman,  but  I  believe  that  without  a  timely  objection  it  is
entered in the record. But if you, if the gentleman has any concerns
about the letter, please enter that into the record also.

Mr. SMITH. Well, this is just the first I have seen it, and I would

like, you know, to review it a little further.

Chairman WU. I would be delighted to make the letter available

to the gentleman.

Mr. SMITH. Okay. Thank you.
Chairman  WU.  I  thank  the  gentleman,  and  the  Chair  recognizes

himself one last time.

Dr.  Turner,  you  referred  to  an  e-mail  notice  to  you,  which  I  be-
lieve  came  in  on  a  Monday  night,  and  then  you  did  not  see  that
e-mail until Tuesday morning. E-mail has terrific utility in permit-
ting  us  to  time  shift  our  communication,  but  there  is  some  things
which I think we all agree, can rise above that and need immediate
attention.  And  you  have  referred  to  fixing  these  communication
systems within NIST.

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir.
Chairman  WU.  And  I  am  going  to  ask  you  just  very  briefly  that
I  assume  that  this  form  of  e-mail  communication  for  exigent  cir-
cumstances  has  been  replaced  by  something  which  for  all  of  us  in
these jobs can reach us 7 by 24.

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir. That is why there is one number for people

to remember to call, and that is it.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

Chairman  WU.  And  that  number  ultimately  winds  up  at  an  ap-

propriate place in the chains of notification and command?

Dr.  TURNER.  Yes.  It  goes  directly  to  our  Emergency  Services  Of-
fice  and  then  they,  in  turn,  relay  the  call  to,  whether  it  is  me  or
whatever the appropriate official is, but there is one, the important
thing  is  there  is  one  number  to  call  and  then  they  will  do  the  rest
to contact us.

Chairman WU. Well, this committee, this subcommittee, the Full
Committee,  and  the  Committee  staff  will  continue  to  work  with
NIST to make sure that these, that the information is reported ap-
propriately,  both  within  NIST,  to  other  agencies,  and  to  oversight
bodies such as this one.
Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir.
Chairman  WU.  I  want  to  turn  back  to  the  laser  incident  in  Gai-
thersburg,  and  what  is  troubling  to  me  about  the  laser  incident  is
that  I  did  not  know  about  the  laser  incident,  and  it  appears  that
no  one  in  an  oversight  position  was  aware  of  the  laser  incident
until this plutonium incident came to light.

Did NIST take any steps to notify its own employees or Congress

or anyone else about the Gaithersburg laser incident?

Dr.  TURNER.  Yes,  sir.  Let  me  describe  the  process  that  we  have
done. One of the things that I did after I became the Acting Direc-
tor was to institute a standing policy at our NIST leadership meet-
ings  where  we  begin  each  meeting  with  a  five-minute  safety  topic.
Each  one  of  our  leaders  has  to  report  on  something,  so,  again,  it
is  to  infuse  in  them  the  idea  that  they  are  responsible,  as  a  line
manager  for  safety.  We  also,  for  accidents  which  occur,  we  also
have the Lab Director who was involved——

Chairman  WU.  Dr.  Turner,  I  am  asking  specifically  about  the

laser incident in Gaithersburg.

Dr.  TURNER.  Yes,  sir.  And  the  Lab  Director  who  was  involved
gave  a  presentation  to  our  leadership  board  because  there  are  la-
sers  used  throughout  NIST,  and  so  that  way  we  are  able  to  make
sure information is exchanged and also were changes made, for ex-
ample, in the set up at our facility that we shared with the Univer-
sity  of  Colorado,  because  they  had  a  very  similar  set  up.  And  so
that information, lessons learned and information sharing resulted
in precautions being taken at other laboratories as a result of hear-
ing  about  and  learning  about  the  causes  and  the  actions  taken  in
the laser——

Chairman  WU.  You  are  saying  that  that  did  occur  with  respect
to  the  Gaithersburg  laser  incident.  It  is  just  that  it  did  not  rise  to
the  level  that  there  would  be  any  notification  of  this  committee  or
Committee staff?

Dr. TURNER. Yes, sir. If we had a misstep in informing this com-

mittee, I apologize for that, sir.

Chairman  WU.  Now,  these  are  different  devices,  but  could  that
first incident have had lessons learned beyond laser uses that could
have helped with the plutonium incident?

Dr.  TURNER.  Yes,  sir.  I  think  this  is  one  of  the  things  that  we
have done. Yeah. We are not looking at this situation as a Boulder
only. We are looking across NIST because of this. We are not look-
ing at this as a radiation safety issue only. We are looking at radi-
ation  safety,  hazardous  materials.  We  are  also  looking  at  equip-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

ment,  we  are  also  looking  at  machinery,  things  which  pose  risks.
You  know,  we  are  including  that  in  our  comprehensive  review  of
safety and safety policies.

Chairman  WU.  Going  forward,  and  Dr.  Turner,  you  have  made
many  commitments  today  to  start  making  changes  appropriate  in
procedure  and  in  the  culture  of  safety  at  NIST.  What  are  your  ex-
pectations  about  the  timeline?  What  are  your  expectations  about
appointing  appropriate  panels  in  addition  to  the  folks  that  you
have already appointed to look into this incident?

Dr. TURNER. Well, first of all, I have made clear to everyone that
this is a high priority for us. Our highest priority. I have also made
it clear to everyone that this is not a short-term problem. This, you
know,  changing  cultures  is  a  long,  difficult  thing  to  do  as  Dr.  Rog-
ers  referred  to.  So  I  have  made  that  clear  that  this  is  something
that we are going to be, you know, that is going to be on our radar
screens  for  quite  some  time  to  come  and  that  I  am  determined  to
fix  it  and  make  it  right.  And  so,  you  know,  people  are  aware  of
that. People understand the enormity of the challenge that we face
and  our  determination  to  fix  it,  and  I  think  our  colleagues  in  this
share that same determination that it get fixed.

We wanted to make clear. This is not a temporary, fleeting issue.
This  is  something  that  we  need  to  engrain  and  have  sustainable.
Chairman  WU.  Dr.  Rogers,  since  you  are  the  one  outside  rep-
resentative  group  or  Dr.  Miller,  if  you  would  care  to  comment,  to
this  point  in  time  should  we  be  feeling  good  about  the  steps  that
NIST has initially taken to change the safety culture, or should we
have further concerns or some combination of each?

Dr.  ROGERS.  Well,  with  respect  to  NIST  it  seems  to  me  every-
thing  I  have  heard  has  been  very  positive,  very  professional.  It  is
going to take some time, and there are steps along the way. It does
seem  to  me  that  Dr.  Turner’s  explanation  of  how  NIST  is  viewing
this  incident  is  exactly  correct,  that  it  is  not  just  a  small  incident
in  one  laboratory.  It  is  a  manifestation  of  an  underlying  problem
that needs to be worked on.

But  there  is  not  going  to  be  a  quick  fix  totally.  We  are  talking
here about a cultural issue. It is not just rules and regulations, and
culture is something that is engrained in people. So that it is going
to  take  some  time  to  be  absolutely  confident,  if  ever  one  can  be,
that  this  cultural  change  has  taken  place.  But  it  does  seem  to  me
that  Dr.  Turner’s  explanation  of  the  approach  that  is  being  taken
is entirely correct.

Chairman WU. Thank you, Dr. Rogers.
Dr.  MILLER.  Mr.  Chairman,  the  NRC  is  very  happy  to  hear  Dr.
Turner’s  remarks  and  commitments.  However,  we  were  very  con-
cerned  about  the  nature  of  this  event  also.  That  is  why  we  re-
sponded in the way that we do.

As  you  know  from  our  testimony  we  have  currently  suspended
NIST’s  authority  through  the  confirmatory  action  letter  to  use
these materials, and we want to be convinced that they have these
things  in  place  and  gain  our  trust  before  we  are  going  to  allow
them to renew any use of that.

But the statements that Dr. Turner has made today and his com-
mitments  are  a  beginning,  convincing  the  NRC  that  NIST  is  seri-
ous  about  doing  this.  I  can  assure  you  that  the  NRC  will  stay  on

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

top  of  this  until  we  feel  comfortable  and  that  they  have  our  con-
fidence to renew any use of these materials.

Chairman  WU.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  want  to  touch  on  one
final topic, because I think we are all agreed, and Dr. Turner, I am
gratified to hear about the steps that you are taking and as we all
agree,  this  is  a  long-term  process  of  cultural  change  and  building
in, and educating for appropriate, prompt action.

I  want  to  as  forcefully  as  I  can  state  in  my  own  quiet  way  that
I  would  be  deeply  concerned  about  viewing  this  situation  as  one
where  picking  out  one  or  a  couple  of  wrong  actions  and  one  or  a
couple of wrong actors and then taking punitive steps in that direc-
tion would be viewed as, ‘‘solving the problem.’’

I  think  that  that  is  something  which  would  be  demoralizing  to
an excellent agency. You might lose good people that way. The gen-
tleman  from  Colorado,  Mr.  Udall,  referred  previously  to  employee
morale  issues.  I  think  that  inculcating  a  culture  of  learning  from
past  mistakes  and  incorporating  lessons  learned  into  a  changed
culture is the hallmark of a good or great organization.

I  have  certainly  appreciated  the  work  that  NIST  has  done  over
many  years.  I  am  fond  of  saying  that  in  economics  or  in  science  if
you can’t measure it, it’s not real, and NIST helps us do that. NIST
helps us standardize things, and without your good work we would
be  doing  things  in  faith  where  we  need  to  be  doing  things  in  tech-
nology  or  science.  Nothing  wrong  with  faith.  It  is  just  it  doesn’t
necessary move blocks where we need to move blocks.

So  this  committee,  this  subcommittee  and  the  Full  Committee,
will  continue  to  work  with  NIST,  with  the  NRC,  and  with  outside
review  panels  for,  I  believe,  a  good  while  to  come,  to  insure,  Dr.
Turner,  that  you  and  perhaps  your  successors  to  come  over  many
years, continue to build a better culture of safety in addition to the
intellectual  and  technical  excellence  that  you  all  have  clearly  built
at NIST.

So  as  we  bring  this  hearing  to  a  close,  I  want  to  thank  each  of
the  witnesses  and  Dr.  Collins  for  being  here  today  and  testifying
before  the  Subcommittee.  The  record  will  remain  open  for  addi-
tional  statements  from  Members  and  for  answers  to  any  follow-up
questions  the  Committee  may  ask,  and  there  will  be  further  ques-
tions  from  me  and  from  other  Members  and  from  Committee  staff
for you all and the agencies that you all represent.

And with that I thank you very much for being here on this very
important  and  very  difficult  subject.  This  hearing  is  adjourned.
Thank you.

[Whereupon, at 12:35 p.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(69)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  James  M.  Turner,  Deputy  Director,  National  Institute  of  Standards

and Technology, U.S. Department of Commerce

Questions submitted by Chairman David Wu
Q1. How do you believe an atmosphere developed at NIST where, as you stated, ‘‘line
supervisors  failed  to  take  adequate  responsibility  for  safety  issues,  and  safety
personnel  failed  to  assert  a  sufficient  level  of  authority  to  ensure  compliance
with existing procedures and practices’’?

A1. Several  factors  contributed.  First,  there  are  many  NIST  line  supervisors  who
take  safety  seriously.  Obviously  there  are  some  who  do  not.  Some  saw  it,  correctly,
as line management’s responsibility to provide a safe workplace; others believed that
it was the Safety Division’s job to make everyone safe. The Safety Division had not
always  been  paid  attention  to  over  the  years  and  some  in  that  division  felt  that
management  did  not  fully  support  them.  There  is  some  justification  for  this  view.
Thus they were not assertive in elevating concerns.
Q2. In  Dr.  Rogers’  testimony  he  stated  that  Room  1–2124,  where  the  spill  occurred,
did not meet standards and requirements to qualify a lab space for use of radio-
active materials. Did the management that assigned the lab space consider that
this  research  group  would  be  working  with  radioactive  materials?  When  lab
space is assigned at NIST, how is safety and the adequacy of the workspace con-
sidered?

A2. The lack of a rigorous safety culture provided the atmosphere in which neither
line management nor safety officials took the necessary steps to ensure that all ap-
propriate  officials  knew  what  approved  materials  were  being  used  in  laboratories,
whether  or  not  those  laboratories  were  appropriate  for  the  materials  being  used,
and  what  training  was  or  was  not  required  and  taken  by  the  individuals  handling
the materials and working in the immediate area. If there had been a rigorous safe-
ty  culture  at  NIST,  then  precautions  to  isolate  the  work,  to  ensure  appropriate
training  and  preparedness  measures,  to  restrict  traffic  through  and  near  the  area,
and to respond to the incident in a safe manner should have been in force.

Once  hazards  are  identified,  steps  should  be  taken  to  reduce  the  risk-before  the
work  begins.  These  steps  could  include  protective  equipment,  special  handling  in-
structions, access controls, work procedures, training of all workers, and procedures
for  emergency  situations.  Line  Management,  supported  by  the  Safety  Division,
would then take actions to assure that the lab space, including access controls, was
safe.  Line  Management  is  also  expected  to  do  ‘‘walkdowns’’  (announced  and  unan-
nounced)  to  assure  that  work  is  being  done  according  to  procedures  and  training
and  to  question  the  workers  on  their  jobs,  use  of  protective  equipment,  and  what
they  should  do  in  an  emergency.  Line  management  last  conducted  a  walkdown  of
Room 1–2124 in January of 2008 with the Safety Office. Clearly, the reviews under-
taken  and  communications  between  line  management  and  the  safety  division  staff
were inadequate.
Q3. Dr.  Rogers  suggested  that  performance  reviews  should  hold  managers  account-
able  for  promoting  a  safety  culture  within  their  purview.  Since  safety  perform-
ance is already a required part of these reviews, how will the criteria be changed
to  make  sure  it  is  prioritized  and  that  it  provides  factual  and  useful  informa-
tion?  Please  provide  the  current  safety  related  criteria  used  in  performance  re-
views.

A3. As  it  currently  appears  in  many  employee  performance  plans,  safety  is  one  of
several  activities  under  a  broad  critical  element.  The  Chief  Human  Capital  Officer
has  recently  been  charged  with  developing  a  separate,  stand-alone  critical  element
dealing with safety for all performance plans for the 2009 rating year, which begins
October 1, 2008. The new safety critical element will provide incentive and state ex-
pectations  for  NIST  staff  to  work  safely,  raise  safety  issues  and  concerns  promptly,
and  take  appropriate  actions  to  resolve  unsafe  conditions  or  practices.  The  safety
critical  element  will  also  provide  a  basis  for  holding  line  managers  and  employees
accountable  for  increased  safety  awareness  and  performance  through  results-based
measures  and  outcomes  that  permit  element  ratings  of  exceeds  expectations,  fully
successful, minimally meets expectations, or unsatisfactory.

The  current  safety  related  criteria  vary  by  position  and  organization.  The  table,

below, contains typical criteria used in performance reviews of NIST researchers.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

Q4. Please provide the Committee with a full account of the laser safety incident that
occurred  in  Gaithersburg,  as  well  as  a  description  any  follow-up  activities  per-
formed regarding the incident’s implications for health and safety at NIST.

A4. Laser Incident Overview

• On  March  5,  2008,  there  was  an  injury  to  the  right  eye  of  a  NIST  research
associate in the Atomic Physics Division of NIST’s Physics Laboratory. There
were  two  NIST  associates  involved  in  the  incident.  A  third  researcher  was
present in the lab but in another area behind a curtain.

• The  injury  was  caused  by  a  lack  of  communication  between  the  researchers
present  that  resulted  in  the  associate’s  exposure  to  a  laser.  The  second  asso-
ciate  was  not  experienced  with  the  hands  on  procedures  of  this  experiment
and was assisting. Normally, the injured associate performed the entire proce-
dure  alone.  At  an  undetermined  point  the  laser  was  left  on  when  it  should
have been off. The injured research associate was placing a slide onto a micro-
scope  stage  and  putting  a  drop  of  immersion  oil  onto  the  objective  lens.  This
NIST  associate  believed  the  laser  to  be  off  and  therefore  inadvertently  ex-
posed the right eye to the laser without protective eyewear.

• The incident occurred during the conduct of a joint project between the Chem-
ical Science and Technology Laboratory and the Physics Laboratory. The goal
of  the  project  is  to  study  certain  aspects  of  mitochondria,  which  are  mem-
brane  enclosed  organelles  found  in  the  cells  of  most  complex  life  forms.  The
DNA  of  mitochondria  is  distinct  from  the  DNA  in  the  cell  nucleus  and  is  in-
herited exclusively from the mother, which means it can be used to trace ma-
ternal lineage far back in time. Optical tweezers are used to isolate individual
mitochondria  in  order  to  quantify  the  variation  of  the  genetic  information
among mitochondria from a single cell.

Remedial Actions Taken in Response to Report on Laser Incident Investigation

• A  detailed  hazard  and  mitigation  analysis  of  all  of  the  optical  instruments
(microscopes)  that  use  Class  3B  and  Class  4  lasers  has  been  conducted.  Re-
vised  standard  operating  procedures  have  been  developed,  and,  where  pos-
sible, engineering controls to eliminate the risk of exposure have been imple-
mented.

— Each  laser  system  has  been  inspected  to  ensure  that  it  is  in  proper
working  condition,  that  laser  power  levels  are  as  indicated  on  the  de-
vices,  and  that  the  laser  emission  on/off  switches  are  working  properly.
— A laser curtain has been installed to separate the wet chemistry side of
the  laboratory  from  the  optical  instrumentation  side.  This  separation
eliminates the risk of laser exposure to any researcher on the wet chem-
istry side of the laboratory, and also prevents any researcher from inad-
vertently walking from the wet chemistry area to the laser area without
proper laser-safety eyewear.

• Under  the  recently  adopted  Health  and  Safety  Instruction  for  Laser  Safety,
NIST is working to ensure that all optical instruments that use Class 3B and
Class 4 lasers have their own warning light indicating that the lasers are on.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

— The signs will be prominently displayed so that they can be seen by any
operator  of  a  particular  instrument  during  normal  use  of  that  instru-
ment.

— Standardized  signage  and  warning  lights  will  be  prominently  displayed

to prevent entry into the laser side without proper safety eyewear.

• Interlocks have been installed on all optical instruments where the condenser
can be tilted back allowing line-of-sight access to the objective lens. The inter-
locks shutters or blocks the laser beam when the condenser is tilted back.
• Laser  safety  inspections  have  been—and  will  be  routinely—performed  by  the
Group  Laser  Safety  Representative  to  ensure  that  necessary  laser  safety
measures and standard operating procedures are in place.

— A  laser  safety  inspection  will  be  performed  by  the  Group  Laser  Safety

Representative prior to any new system being put into operation.

— A laser safety inspection was made during the 3rd week of April, 2008—
and  will  be  made  annually—by  the  Division  Laser  Safety  Representa-
tive.

— Occasional inspections by the Laser Safety Officer of the Safety, Health,

and Environment Division are being scheduled.

Q5a. When will the Department of Commerce (DOC) appoint the Blue Ribbon Panel
to  perform  a  review  and  analysis  of  environmental,  health  and  safety  proce-
dures and practices at the NIST labs?

Q5b. When  will  they  begin  their  work  and  how  long  is  the  assessment  expected  to

take?

A5a,b. The Department of Commerce is working to establish the NIST Blue Ribbon
Commission  on  Management  and  Safety  and  have  it  complete  its  work  as  expedi-
tiously as possible. Attached is a Federal Register Notice of the establishment of the
Commission.
Q5c. Also, when will the DOC’s Inspector General issue its report on NIST manage-

ment, training, safety and response operations?

A5c. The  DOC  OIG  has  requested  that  inquires  regarding  their  report  be  made  to
Mr.  Dan  Bechtel,  the  Assistant  Regional  Inspector  General  for  the  Denver  Region,
303–312–7660  or  John  Bunting,  Regional  Inspector  General  for  the  Denver  Region,
at 303–312–7663.
Q6a. Prior  to  the  June  9th  incident,  to  whom  did  the  Safety,  Health,  and  Environ-
ment  Division  (SHED)  report  at  NIST’s  Gaithersburg  and  Boulder  Facilities?

A6a. SHED reported to the Chief Human Capital Officer.
Q6b. What have the operating budgets been for SHED and the Boulder Safety Office

for fiscal year 2004 through fiscal year 2008?

A6b. SHED  and  the  Boulder  Safety  Office  operating  budgets  for  fiscal  year  2004
through fiscal year 2008 are reflected in the table below:

Q6c. How have budgets cuts impacted the number of staff employed by these offices?
A6c. The number of staff has remained fairly constant as laboratory programs grew,
resulting in more work for the staff on hand. However, NIST has decided to imme-
diately add seven specialists to work under contract for the next six months to sup-
plement NIST’s own safety and health staff.
Q7. Committee  staff  learned  that  the  initial  medical  tests  done  on  the  affected  per-
sonnel to determine if they had received internal exposure to plutonium were ei-
ther incorrectly performed or performed too late to give useful results.

Q7a. Who  was  initially  responsible  for  ensuring  the  medical  safety  of  these  individ-

uals?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

A7a. It is always line management’s responsibility to ensure medical safety.
Q7b. When were radiation health experts contacted?
A7b. At  16:43  a  call  came  into  the  Office  of  Safety,  Health  and  Environment.  At
17:15  the  NIST  Boulder  Radiation  Safety  Officer,  who  was  on  annual  leave,  re-
sponded to a message left on his cell phone and arrived on campus at 18:00 to pro-
vide  additional  support.  The  Gaithersburg  Radiation  Health  Physicist  arrived  in
Boulder on Wednesday, June 12th.

Questions submitted by Representative Phil Gingrey
Q1. On pages 9 and 10 of your testimony, you list five different safety principles that
you expect NIST personnel to embrace. These include the need for effective safety
oversight,  requirements  that  safety  staff  immediately  stop  questionable  work,
and that individuals are responsible for their own safe behavior. Dr. Turner, can
you explain to the Committee who you would consider as ‘‘safety staff’’? Does this
include  all  line  management  or  only  those  with  specific  safety  functions?  Where
does the responsibility of individual researchers and that of ‘‘safety staff’’ begin?
A1. Safety staff would include all staff within the Safety, Health, and Environment
Division  (SHED).  Their  role  is  to  develop  NIST-wide  safety  policy  and  identify  the
means by which Line Management can show it is complying with the policy. SHED
also conducts annual site inspections as required by 29 CFR 1960 and provides tech-
nical  assistance  and  support  to  Line  Management  in  order  to  anticipate,  recognize,
evaluate,  and  control  hazards  in  their  work  areas.  Line  Management  has  the  pri-
mary responsibility for safety of work within their facilities.
Q2a. What functions are performed at the two NIST labs by the Safety, Health, and

Environment Division?

A2a. Functions performed: Occupational Safety and Health, Radiation Safety, Envi-
ronmental  Management,  Employee  Assistance  Program,  Fire  Safety,  Continuity  of
Operations Planning, Safety Engineering and Industrial Hygiene.
Q2b. What is the annual budget for this division, and how many staff do they have?
A2b. The annual budget for the Safety, Health, and Environment Division in fiscal
year  2008  is  $5,041.7K  and  current  staffing  consists  of  23.5  FTEs,  of  which  there
are currently three vacancies.
Q2c. Do  you  believe  that  this  division  has  had  the  resources  during  the  past  two

years to effectively complete their responsibilities?

A2c. No.  SHED  has  recently  assessed  its  staffing  and  has  submitted  a  prioritized
list of additional resources it needs. It is currently under consideration by NIST.
Q2d. Do  you  believe  it  is  appropriate  for  this  division  to  be  held  responsible  for  the

safe design and execution of laboratory experiments?

A2d. While  SHED  assists  with  safety  design  on  individual  experiments,  the  line
management  in  the  individual  labs  is  responsible  for  the  proper  design  and  execu-
tion of experiments.

Questions submitted by Representative Mark Udall
Q1. Please  provide  the  Committee  with  copies  of  all  of  the  e-mails  between  Boulder
and  Gaithersburg  relating  to  how  and  when  employees  and  city,  county  and
State officials would be notified of the incident.

A1. NIST is in the process of complying with this request.
Q2. Please  provide  the  number  of  current  full-time-equivalent  employees  in  NIST–

Boulder’s Safety Office. To whom does the Boulder Safety Office report?

A2. Five employees are in the NIST Boulder Safety Office. The NIST Boulder Safe-
ty  Office  reports  to  the  Safety,  Health,  and  Environment  Division  which  is
headquartered in Gaithersburg, MD.
Q3. Please  provide  a  list  of  all  radioactive  and  hazardous  materials  used  at  the

NIST–Boulder facility.

A3. Lists provided to the Committee; deemed too lengthy to print.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Charles  L.  Miller,  Director,  Office  of  Federal  and  State  Materials  and
Environmental  Management  Programs,  U.S.  Nuclear  Regulatory  Commission;
accompanied by Elmo E. Collins, Regional Administrator, Region IV Office, U.S.
Nuclear Regulatory Commission

Questions submitted by Chairman David Wu
Q1. It  was  noted  by  several  witnesses  that  no  one  at  NIST  seemed  to  appreciate  the
difference  between  a  sealed  source  and  an  encapsulated  source,  which,  as  Dr.
Rogers noted, is not a technical term.

Q1a. Was  the  failure  to  pursue  precise  information  regarding  the  source  consistent

with the lax manner in which NIST handled these materials?

A1a. NIST did not procure the plutonium source in question until approximately six
months  after  the  U.S.  Nuclear  Regulatory  Commission  (NRC)  approved  NIST’s  li-
cense  amendment  request  to  use  and  possess  special  nuclear  material  of  less  than
a  critical  mass,  including  plutonium  in  any  solid,  encapsulated  form.  The  NRC  is
still  reviewing  the  circumstances  associated  with  NIST’s  procurement  of  the  pluto-
nium  sources,  including  NIST’s  efforts  to  verify  that  the  model  numbers  137  and
138 plutonium sources met the conditions of its license. However, the NRC prelimi-
narily  has  determined  that  NIST  personnel  did  not  apply  the  appropriate  controls
to  which  NIST  committed  in  its  license  amendment  request  and  which  are  rec-
ommended by the source supplier (U.S. Department of Energy New Brunswick Lab-
oratory). Specifically, the source supplier asked NIST whether or not the plutonium
sources  would  be  removed  from  the  outer  cardboard  tubes  in  order  to  conduct  the
subject  research.  New  Brunswick  Laboratory  staff  understood  that  the  sources
would not be removed from the outer cardboard tubes. The supplier cautioned NIST
in  an  e-mail  message  that  if  the  plutonium  sources  were  removed,  then  the  pluto-
nium  reference  material  sealed  in  plastic  bags  should  be  considered  contaminated
and  should  only  be  handled  in  a  glove  box.  Similar  written  information  was  pro-
vided  to  NIST  in  the  form  of  a  material  safety  data  sheet.  The  NIST–Boulder  staff
did  not  develop  specific  handling  procedures  for  the  plutonium  sources,  contrary  to
its  commitment  to  the  NRC.  At  some  point  after  obtaining  the  plutonium  sources
in  October  2007,  one  or  more  members  of  the  NIST–Boulder  staff  removed  the
sources  from  the  outer  cardboard  tubes.  On  June  6,  2008,  NIST  researchers  re-
moved the two plastic bags that contained the plutonium source in question. A glove
box was not used, nor was a handling procedure or instruction provided for this ac-
tivity.
Q1b. How do you think this lack of distinction between sealed and encapsulated con-
tributed  to  this  accident?  Does  the  definition  of  the  term  ‘‘encapsulated’’  need
to be clarified?

A1b. The  term  ‘‘sealed  source’’  is  defined  in  10  CFR  Part  30.4,  Definitions,  as  ‘‘any
byproduct  material  that  is  encased  in  a  capsule  designed  to  prevent  leakage  or  es-
cape  of  the  byproduct  material.’’  The  definition  requires  the  capsule  to  be  designed
to  prevent  contact  with  and  dispersion  of  the  radioactive  material  under  the  condi-
tions  of  use  for  which  it  was  designed.  The  term  ‘‘encapsulated’’  is  not  defined  in
the  regulations.  However,  NRC  maintains  a  database,  NUREG/CR  5569  Health
Physics Positions (HPPOS), of NRC staff positions on a wide range of topics involv-
ing  radiation  protection,  including  encapsulated  sources.  HPPOS–311  states  that
certain low energy and low activity calibration and reference sources have been con-
fined  by  using  glass  vials  for  numerous  years.  The  staff  concluded  that  glass  am-
poules,  flame  sealed  to  prevent  leakage  or  escape  of  its  contents,  can  be  considered
‘‘sealed  sources’’  as  long  as  the  radionuclide  content  is  small  and  the  impact  on  de-
commissioning of the facility, if one or a few were to fail, is minor. While the NIST
event  is  still  under  review,  the  NRC’s  preliminary  finding  is  that  the  plutonium
sources in question were unsealed material. This preliminary finding is made based
on the following: (1) the plutonium material was in a screw top micro-bottle specifi-
cally  designed  to  allow  the  material  to  be  readily  accessible  (e.g.,  poured  out  of  the
bottle);  and  (2)  the  material  content  was  in  a  configuration  such  that  breakage  of
the  micro-bottle  could  reasonably  be  assumed  to  cause  more  than  minor  impact  on
decommissioning  of  a  facility.  Consistent  with  our  practices  in  reviewing  the  cir-
cumstances  surrounding  an  event  or  incident,  the  NRC  plans  to  conduct  a  review
of  agency  guidance  relative  to  this  incident  to  determine  whether  enhancements  or
clarifications are needed.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

Q2. The  NRC  learned  of  the  release  at  NIST–Boulder  on  Tuesday,  June  10th,  and

sent inspectors to Boulder on Thursday, June 12th.

Q2a. What  guidelines  and  requirements  does  the  NRC  follow  to  determine  when  to

dispatch inspectors?

A2a. NRC  has  guidance  documents  that  address  the  course  of  action  to  be  taken
in response to radioactive material incidents. The pertinent documents for the pluto-
nium  contamination  event  at  NIST–Boulder  are  Management  Directive  8.3,  ‘‘NRC
Incident  Investigation  Program,’’  and  NRC  Inspection  Manual  Chapter  1301,  ‘‘Re-
sponse  to  Radioactive  Material  Incidents  That  Do  Not  Require  Activation  of  the
NRC  Incident  Response  Plan.’’  Section  06.03  of  Manual  Chapter  1301  directs  re-
gional management to evaluate the need to dispatch one or more regional inspectors
to  conduct  a  special  inspection  of  an  incident  site.  Section  06.03.c.1.  further  defines
‘‘immediate  dispatch’’  to  be  typically  within  two  days  of  a  reported  event.  In  this
case,  the  NIST–Boulder  licensee  discussed  the  circumstances  with  Region  IV  per-
sonnel and, at the urging of the NRC staff, reported the event to NRC Headquarters
Operations  Center  late  Tuesday  afternoon,  June  10,  2008.  No  on-going,  immediate
safety  issues  were  described  on  this  call  with  the  Operations  Center.  Specifically,
the licensee reported that the laboratory was isolated, contaminated and potentially
contaminated  personnel  had  been  decontaminated,  bioassay  on  these  individuals
was  initiated,  and  there  was  no  indication  that  contamination  had  spread  beyond
the laboratory building. Region IV management reviewed the event information and
decided  to  dispatch  an  inspector  to  gain  first  hand  knowledge  of  the  event  and  to
observe the licensee’s response activities.

Regional  management  briefed  the  inspector  on  Wednesday,  June  11.  He  arrived
on-site at NIST–Boulder the morning of Thursday, June 12. A second inspector was
dispatched the following week on June 19. After reviewing the preliminary observa-
tions  stemming  from  these  two  inspection  follow-up  activities,  in  combination  with
additional  information  obtained  from  NIST  through  telephonic  briefings,  the  NRC
expanded its inspection follow-up to a five-person team, which was dispatched to the
site  on  June  29.  This  is  consistent  with  Management  Directive  8.3  for  operational
events of this level of significance.
Q2b. When  NIST  first  informed  the  NRC,  did  they  appreciate  the  magnitude  of  the

incident? Was the description of the event presented to the NRC accurate?

A2b. NIST first notified a Region IV materials license reviewer of the event, which
was immediately referred to regional management. NIST described the event details
that were known at the time, and indicated that they were not certain whether the
event  was  reportable.  Regional  management  advised  NIST  to  immediately  report
the  event  to  NRC  Headquarters  Operations  Center,  which  NIST  did  at  3:11  p.m.
EDT on June 10, 2008.

The information provided in the initial notification to Region IV management and
the  NRC  Headquarters  Operations  Center  was  limited.  However,  that  information
was generally consistent with our preliminary observations during the initial on-site
inspection. NIST provided additional details of the event (e.g., that the associate re-
searcher washed his hands in the laboratory sink prior to notifying the principal in-
vestigator  that  the  source  bottle  was  cracked)  to  Region  IV  staff  as  information
evolved during the progression of the licensee’s investigation.

Although  their  findings  are  preliminary,  the  NRC’s  special  inspection  team  has
identified  a  number  of  elements  required  by  the  NIST’s  license  for  the  possession
and  use  of  special  nuclear  material  of  less  than  a  critical  mass  that  were,  in  some
cases, never developed or implemented, or were not adequately implemented. Exam-
ples  include:  insufficient  training  of  occupational  workers  and  laboratory  fre-
quenters;  procedures  that  were  never  developed  or  fully  implemented;  security
measures  that  were  not  implemented;  safety  modifications  that  were  not  made  to
the  laboratory  where  the  plutonium  sources  were  stored  and  used;  required  audits
of  the  radiation  safety  program  that  were  not  conducted;  not  assigning  a  radiation
monitoring device to personnel who should have had one; personnel not wearing an
assigned  radiation  monitoring  device;  and  inadequate  emergency  procedures.  Addi-
tionally, the scope of the licensee’s efforts to bound the number of people that were
potentially contaminated and the extent of the spread of contamination was insuffi-
cient. While the NRC agrees with the findings and conclusions of the licensee’s Ion-
izing  Radiation  Safety  Committee  Initial  Report  of  Plutonium  Contamination  at
NIST–Boulder,  other  causes  and  contributors  of  these  apparent  performance  defi-
ciencies are the subject of NRC’s ongoing special inspection.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

Questions submitted by Representative Phil Gingrey
Q1. Your testimony describes a range of enforcement actions that are available to the
NRC  that  apply  to  a  federal  laboratory  like  NIST–Boulder,  including  civil  pen-
alties.

Q1a. Can you elaborate on what enforcement tools the NRC has at its disposal?
A1a. The  NRC’s  enforcement  authority  is  contained  in  the  Atomic  Energy  Act  of
1954,  as  amended,  and  the  Energy  Reorganization  Act  of  1974,  as  amended.  These
statutes provide the NRC with broad authority. The Agency implements its enforce-
ment  authority  through  Subpart  B  of  10  CFR  Part  2  and  as  reflected  in  the  NRC
Enforcement  Policy.  The  NRC  Enforcement  Policy  sets  out  the  general  principles
governing NRC’s enforcement program and provides a process for implementing the
agency’s  enforcement  authority  in  response  to  violations  of  NRC  requirements.  The
Enforcement Policy applies to all NRC licensees, to various categories of non-licens-
ees, and to individual employees of licensed and non-licensed firms involved in NRC-
regulated activities.

Because  violations  occur  in  a  variety  of  activities  and  have  varying  levels  of  sig-
nificance,  the  NRC  Enforcement  Policy  contains  graduated  sanctions.  Enforcement
authority  includes  the  use  of  Notices  of  Violation  (NOVs),  civil  penalties  (current
statutory  maximum  of  $130,000  per  violation  per  day),  Demands  for  Information
(DFIs),  and  Orders  to  modify,  suspend,  or  revoke  a  license,  Enforcement  actions
against  individuals  include  NOVs  and  Orders  prohibiting  the  individual  from  par-
ticipating  in  NRC  licensed  activities.  The  NRC  typically  does  not  issue  civil  pen-
alties  to  individuals.  Discretion  may  be  exercised  in  determining  the  appropriate
final enforcement sanction to be taken.

Based  on  their  safety  and  regulatory  significance,  violations  are  categorized  into
one  of  four  severity  levels,  with  Severity  Level  I  being  the  most  significant  and  Se-
verity  Level  IV  being  the  least  significant.  Severity  Level  IV  violations  are  consid-
ered  very  low  significance  in  nature  and  are  not  considered  for  escalated  enforce-
ment.  Severity  Level  I,  II,  and  III  violations  are  considered  for  escalated  enforce-
ment  and  a  civil  penalty  will  be  considered  as  part  of  the  final  sanction.  For  viola-
tions  at  academic  or  research  facilities  similar  to  NIST,  a  base  civil  penalty,  cur-
rently  $6500,  is  considered  when  escalated  enforcement  action  is  taken.  If  a  viola-
tion is considered particularly egregious, an Order modifying, suspending, or revok-
ing  a  license  may  be  issued.  In  determining  the  proper  sanction  and  severity  level,
the  NRC  will  consider  factors  such  as  (1)  was  the  violation  a  result  of  a  willful  act
by the licensee or an employee/contractor of the licensee, (2) was the violation com-
mitted by an official of the licensee, and (3) is it necessary to increase any civil pen-
alty to deter further recurrence of a serious violation.
Q1b. Can you fine a federal agency or individuals involved in a mishap?
A1b. The  NRC  typically  does  not  issue  civil  penalties  to  individuals.  However,  dis-
cretion may be exercised in determining the appropriate final enforcement sanction
to  be  taken.  The  NRC  has  taken  escalated  enforcement  actions  that  included  civil
penalties against federal facilities and research laboratories in the past.
Q1c. In the past, what type of actions has the NRC taken to respond to research mis-

haps involving small amounts of regulated material?

A1c. Three  examples  of  escalated  enforcement  taken  against  licensees  involving
events similar to the event which occurred at NIST are summarized below:

• In  1996,  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services,  National  Institute
of Health (NIH) was issued a Severity Level III NOV and a $2,500 Civil Pen-
alty for failure to secure from unauthorized removal or limit access to licensed
materials  that  were  stored  in  unrestricted  areas.  In  this  case,  an  increase  to
the base civil penalty for a Severity Level III violation was not warranted be-
cause the licensee took effective corrective action to prevent recurrence of the
violation.
• In  2000,  Oklahoma  State  University  was  issued  a  Severity  Level  III  NOV
without a civil penalty because the licensee willfully used radioactive material
in an unauthorized location within the facility and the person using the mate-
rial was neither properly trained nor authorized to use the material. Although
the violation resulted in contamination of areas not authorized for use of the
licensed  material,  no  individual  exposures  greater  than  regulatory  limits  oc-
curred. Due to the low safety significance of the incident, this violation would
normally  have  been  categorized  as  Severity  Level  IV.  However,  since  there
was  willfulness  associated  with  the  violation,  in  accordance  with  the  enforce-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

ment policy, it was categorized as Severity Level III. Although the application
of the civil penalty assessment process would have typically resulted in a civil
penalty being proposed, the NRC decided to exercise discretion and not assess
a civil penalty based on the licensee’s effective corrective actions and the fact
that  the  violation  involved  the  use  of  small  amounts  of  tritium  representing
a low risk to the health and safety of workers.
• In  2001,  a  Severity  Level  I  Notice  of  Violation  and  an  $11,000  civil  penalty
was  issued  to  Southeast  Missouri  State  University  for  an  event  which  re-
sulted in a radiation dose to the bone of a contract employee greater than the
regulatory  limit  of  50  rem.  In  accordance  with  the  Enforcement  Policy,  this
overexposure  was  categorized  as  a  Severity  Level  I  violation  and  discretion
was used to increase the base civil penalty for a Severity Level I violation by
100 percent because of the particularly poor performance by the licensee.

Q2. How  would  you  characterize  the  NRC’s  role  and  responsibility  in  oversight  of
small  laboratory  research,  as  compared  with  facilities  with  nuclear  reactors?
Does  the  NRC  provide  guidance  for  structuring  safety  regimes  in  research  envi-
ronments? How do you foster a safe operating regime in a complex and dynamic
setting  where  prescriptive  rules  may  be  insufficient  or  counterproductive  to  the
underlying research?

A2. The  NRC  regulates  all  facilities  within  its  jurisdiction  based  on  the  require-
ments  within  Title  10  of  the  Code  of  Federal  Regulations  (CFR).  Small  laboratory
research  facilities  are  very  different  from  nuclear  reactors  and  are  licensed  under
a  different  part  of  these  regulations.  Small  laboratory  research  facilities  use  small
quantities  of  radioactive  materials  and  the  magnitude  of  risk  is  significantly  lower
than  for  nuclear  reactors.  All  NRC  licensees  are  required  to  have  adequate  equip-
ment and facilities to protect the public health and safety, and the environment. Ad-
ditionally, licensees must be qualified by training and experience to use the material
for the purpose requested.

It  is  the  responsibility  of  the  licensee  to  foster  a  safe  working  environment.  NRC
regulations  establish  minimum  radiation  safety  requirements  that  are  generally
performance-based.  Licensees  have  flexibility  in  how  to  meet  these  regulations  in
developing their programs and accomplishing their own specific activities. However,
NRC  does  provide  guidance  for  applicants  and  licensees  to  use  in  developing  their
radiation  safety  programs.  This  guidance  is  found  in  the  multi-volume  technical
guidance  document  series  entitled,  ‘‘NUREG–1556:  Consolidated  Guidance  About
Materials  Licenses.’’  Each  volume  in  this  series  is  tailored  to  the  radiation  safety
requirements for that type of program and use of radioactive material. The guidance
provides  information  on  all  aspects  necessary  for  the  safe  use  of  radioactive  mate-
rial.  For  example,  NRC’s  guidance  includes  information  on  topics  such  as  training,
facilities and equipment, radiation safety program, safe use of radioactive material,
and  emergency  response.  NRC  radioactive  materials  licensees  are  inspected  by  the
agency  on  a  routine  basis.  The  frequency  of  inspections  is  commensurate  with  the
risk to public health and safety posed by radioactive material that licensees possess.
NRC inspectors review a licensee’s program against its license, requirements in the
regulations, and sound radiation safety practices.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Kenneth  C.  Rogers,  Former  Commissioner,  U.S.  Nuclear  Regulatory

Commission

Questions submitted by Representative Phil Gingrey
Q1. On  pages  9  and  10  of  Dr.  Turner’s  testimony,  he  lists  five  different  safety  prin-
ciples that he expects NIST personnel to embrace. These include the need for ef-
fective safety oversight, requirements that safety staff immediately stop question-
able work, and, that individuals are responsible for their own safe behavior. Dr.
Rogers, would you describe these principles as a sufficient starting point for de-
signing an effective safety program? In your opinion, what are the strengths and
weaknesses of these policies?

A1. The safety principles that Dr. Turner has listed are all good starting points. He
particularly  emphasized  training  and  specific  steps  that  the  Safety  Staff  and  Man-
agement  must  follow  to  build  a  safety  culture.  He  committed  to  a  review  of  the
training  requirements  that  will  be  imposed  on  new  or  transferred  appointees.  He
stated that NIST is reviewing the time period during which they could work before
having  undergoing  laboratory  specific  safety  training,  and  also  the  development  by
each  laboratory/shop  of  a  safety  checklist.  The  current  thirty-day  period  that  new
employees  can  work  without  appropriate  training  is  too  long  in  my  opinion.  These
training requirements must also apply to visiting researchers who are not NIST em-
ployees but are afforded freedom to take scientific initiatives at the laboratories.

One  important  step  that  Dr.  Turner  has  taken  immediately  is  to  move  the  NIST
Safety,  Health,  and  Environment  Division  so  that  it  now  reports  directly  to  the
NIST  Deputy  Director.  This  should  elevate  the  status  of  that  Division  and  give  it
more authority. I hope that it will be a permanent change.

The organizational structure, which treats NIST–Boulder as if it were an integral
part  of  NIST–Gaithersburg  with  the  Boulder  Laboratory  Director  having  no  overall
line  management  authority,  may  have  some  useful  features,  but  I  failed  to  appre-
ciate what they might be. The Director title appears to be largely a ceremonial one.
This  arrangement  creates  an  unnecessary  degree  of  uncertainty  particularly  in  an
emergency  situation.  I  would  recommend  that  serious  consideration  be  given  to  re-
viewing and possibly revising the role of the Boulder Laboratory Director.

In  short,  I  believe  that  Dr.  Turner  has  put  in  place  an  action  program  that  has
the potential for creating a strong safety culture at all of NIST, and I see no signifi-
cant  weaknesses.  However,  its  success  will  take  time  and  continuity  of  leadership
committed  to  emphasizing  safety  in  all  of  NIST’s  activities  will  be  very  important.
I understand that in the past changes in the NIST Director’s office have sometimes
resulted  in  a  loss  of  momentum  in  strengthening  the  Institute’s  safety  commit-
ments. That should not happen again.
Q2. How  would  you  characterize  the  effectiveness  and  applicability  of  NRC’s  license

requirements for small, research-oriented licensees?

A2. In  general,  NRC’s  extensive  radioactive  source  material  license  requirements
are  applicable  and  have  been  effective  in  protecting  the  health  and  safety  of  the
public  and  the  users  of  the  materials.  However,  there  are  very  many  types  of  uses
(approximately  two  million  devices  use  NRC  licensed  radioactive  sources  in  the
U.S.).  The  licensing  and  oversight  of  these  devices  is  carried  out  through  NRC  Re-
gional Offices not the Washington Headquarters. The Regional staff required to per-
form the necessary oversight would be hard pressed to inspect and follow up inspec-
tions  at  every  single  licensee  unless  a  strict  priority  system  for  these  activities  is
established  and  maintained,  and  unless  licensees  conscientiously  obey  the  require-
ments  of  their  licenses.  NRC  has  established  such  a  priority  system  that  takes  ac-
count  of  the  potential  as  well  as  actual  hazards  posed  by  the  application  of  the  ra-
dioactive  material  covered  by  the  license.  However,  judgment  decisions  have  to  be
made  in  applying  the  priority  system  and  unless  the  NRC  staff  involved  are  well
informed  as  to  the  licensees  intentions  and  capabilities,  NRC  may  not  be  aware  of
the  need  to  reschedule  an  on  site  inspection  or  to  explore  more  deeply  the  written
or  verbal  information  submitted  to  them  relative  to  the  license.  I  believe  that  lack
of timely and complete information at NRC was one of the problems that led to the
Boulder incident.
Q2a. Do the requirements and guidelines provided by the NRC realistically apply to

a dynamic and innovative research setting?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

A2a. I believe that they do and can be met without seriously hindering the quality
of the work and the enthusiasm of the researchers, provided a culture of the impor-
tance  of  safety  is  established  and  valued  throughout  the  organization.  However,
NRC should take the Boulder incident as an indicator that its guidelines should be
reviewed  for  precision  and  clarity.  For  example,  there  is  too  much  imprecision  in
the  definition  of  encapsulated  sources.  Some  individuals  regarded  encapsulated  as
identical  to  sealed.  This  led  to  a  false  sense  of  safety  and  was  a  contributor  to  the
incident.
Q2b. How  would  you  characterize  the  NRC’s  role  and  responsibility  in  oversight  of
small  laboratory  research,  as  compared  with  facilities  with  nuclear  reactors?
A2b. In  my  opinion  there  are  really  three  not  two  situations  that  should  be  identi-
fied  as  different:  [1.]  Small  Scale  Research,  Medical  and  Commercial  applications;
[2.] Research and Test reactors and [3.] Power reactors. The first and the third cat-
egories are the most difficult regulatory challenges for NRC. The first because of the
huge  number  and  diversity  of  licensees  and  the  third  because  of  the  large  amount
of  nuclear  material  on  site  and  the  vital  importance  of  excellent  well  maintained
and  highly  competent  licensee  staffs.  Close  (essentially  daily)  regulatory  attention
must  be  maintained.  I  believe  that  NRC  has  performed  well  in  discharging  its  re-
sponsibilities in situations [1.] and [3.] but needs to continue processes of self-exam-
ination  to  ensure  that  its  performance  is  sustained  in  both  of  these.  Situation  [2.],
Research and Test Reactors, poses a different set of challenges to NRC for it is there
that  an  overly  heavy  regulatory  hand  can  be  seriously  counter  productive  and  sti-
fling. NIST has laboratories falling into Situation [1.] at Boulder, and Situations [1.]
and [2.] at Gaithersburg Center for Neutron Research. While imposing licensing re-
quirements  appropriate  to  Situation  [1.]  across  the  board  on  Gaithersburg  poses  no
problem,  simply  carrying  over  without  modification,  requirements  appropriate  to
Situation  [3.]  could  negatively  impact  the  research  conducted  at  the  Gaithersburg
Center for Neutron Research without any appreciable improvement in public health
and safety.

Æ

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 22:49 Sep 28, 2008 Jkt 043351 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\071508\43351 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

